Patent EP1391484A1 - Curable composition - Google PatentsucheHinweis zum Datenschutz bei GoogleJetzt ansehenIch möchte das später lesenMein KontoSucheMapsYouTubePlayNewsGmailDriveKalenderGoogle+ÜbersetzerFotosMehrShoppingDocsBooksBloggerKontakteHangoutsNotizenNoch mehr von GoogleAnmeldenAusgeblendete FelderEinfaches HTML laden (für langsame Verbindungen)PatentsucheThe object of the present invention is to significantly improve weather resistance over a long period of time of the cured product of the invention, while maintaining physical properties, such as tensile properties and rubber-like elasticity, at levels required of sealing compositions for use in general...https://www.google.de/patents/EP1391484A1?cl=en&utm_source=gb-gplus-sharePatent EP1391484A1 - Curable composition Erweiterte PatentsucheTry the new Google Patents, with machine-classified Google Scholar results, and Japanese and South Korean patents. VeröffentlichungsnummerEP1391484 A1PublikationstypAnmeldung AnmeldenummerEP20020724620 PCT-NummerPCT/JP2002/003917 Veröffentlichungsdatum25. Febr. 2004Eingetragen19. Apr. 2002 Prioritätsdatum19. Apr. 2001Auch veröffentlicht unterDE60214367D1, DE60214367T2, EP1391484A4, EP1391484B1, US7297743, US20040127631, WO2002085985A1 Veröffentlichungsnummer02724620, 02724620.6, 2002724620, EP 1391484 A1, EP 1391484A1, EP-A1-1391484, EP02724620, EP1391484 A1, EP1391484A1, EP20020724620, PCT/2002/3917, PCT/JP/2/003917, PCT/JP/2/03917, PCT/JP/2002/003917, PCT/JP/2002/03917, PCT/JP2/003917, PCT/JP2/03917, PCT/JP2002/003917, PCT/JP2002/03917, PCT/JP2002003917, PCT/JP200203917, PCT/JP2003917, PCT/JP203917 ErfinderYuka Kanamori, Junji Takase AntragstellerKaneka CorporationZitat exportierenBiBTeX, EndNote, RefManPatentzitate (4), Nichtpatentzitate (3),  Referenziert von (9), Klassifizierungen (10), Juristische Ereignisse (25) Externe Links:  Espacenet,  EP RegisterCurable composition
EP 1391484 A1 Zusammenfassung
The object of the present invention is to significantly
improve weather resistance over a long period of time of the
cured product of the invention, while maintaining physical
properties, such as tensile properties and rubber-like
elasticity, at levels required of sealing compositions for use
in general buildings.
The curable composition of the invention is a curable
composition which comprises a vinyl polymer having a reactive
silicon containing group (a), such as a (meth)acrylic polymer
having a reactive silicon containing group, a polyoxyalkylene
polymer having a reactive silicon containing group (b), such
as a polyoxypropylene having a reactive silicon containing
group, and a plasticizer having an acrylic component (c) , such
as an acrylic polymer, and is reacted and crosslinked in the
presence of moisture to provide a rubbery cured product.

Bilder(2)Suchbericht (1) Suchbericht (2)  Ansprüche(27)
 
A curable composition
   which comprises a vinyl polymer having a reactive silicon
containing group (a), a polyoxyalkylene polymer having a
reactive silicon containing group (b) , and a plasticizer having
an acrylic component (c).

  
The curable composition according to Claim 1,
   wherein the vinyl polymer having a reactive silicon
containing group (a) is a (meth)acrylic polymer.

  
The curable composition according to Claim 1 or 2,
   wherein the polyoxyalkylene polymer (b) is at least one
member selected from the group consisting of poly(ethylene
oxide), poly(propylene oxide), polypropylene oxide-ethylene
oxide copolymer, and poly(butylene oxide).

  
The curable composition according to any one of Claims
1 to 3,
   wherein the main chain skeleton of the polyoxyalkylene
polymer (b) is a polymer synthesized by using a double metal
cyanide complex catalyst.

  
The curable composition according to any one of Claims
1 to 4,
   wherein the number average molecular weight of the
polyoxyalkylene polymer (b) is 500 to 50,000.

  
The curable composition according to Claim 5,
   wherein the number average molecular weight of the
polyoxyalkylene polymer (b) is 1,000 to 30,000.

  
The curable composition according to any one of Claims
1 to 4, 
   wherein the number average molecular weight of the
polyoxyalkylene polymer (b) is not less than 12,000.

  
The curable composition according to Claim 7,
   wherein the number average molecular weight of
polyoxyalkylene polymer (b) is not less than 15,000.

  
The curable composition according to Claim 8,
   wherein the number average molecular weight of
polyoxyalkylene polymer (b) is not less than 16,000.

  
The curable composition according to any one of
Claims 3 to 9,
   wherein the polyoxyalkylene polymer (b) is a
polyoxypropylene polymer.

  
The curable composition according to Claim 10,
   wherein the main chain skeleton of the polyoxyalkylene
polymer (b) is a substantially straight-chain polymer.

  
The curable composition according to any one of
Claims 1 to 11,
   wherein the reactive silicon containing group of the
polyoxyalkylene polymer (b) is a group comprising one silicon
atom and two hydrolyzable groups attached thereto.

  
The curable composition according to Claim 12,
   wherein the reactive silicon containing group of the
polyoxyalkylene polymer (b) is dimethoxymethylsilyl group.

  
The curable composition according to any one of
Claims 1 to 13,
   wherein the number average molecular weight of the vinyl
polymer having a reactive silicon containing group (a) is 5, 000
to 30,000. 

  
The curable composition according to any one of
Claims 1 to 14,
   wherein the weight ratio of the vinyl polymer having a
reactive silicon containing group (a) to the polyoxyalkylene
polymer having a reactive silicon containing group (b) is 25/75
to 45/55.

  
The curable composition according to any one of
Claims 1 to 15,
   wherein the number average molecular weight of the
plasticizer having an acrylic component (c) is 500 to 15,000.

  
The curable composition according to Claim 16,
   wherein the number average molecular weight of the
plasticizer having an acrylic component (c) is 1, 000 to 8,000.

  
The curable composition according to any one of
Claims 1 to 17,
   wherein the amount of use of the plasticizer having an
acrylic component (c) is 5 to 150 weight parts relative to a
combined total of 100 weight parts of the vinyl polymer having
a reactive silicon containing group (a) and polyoxyalkylene
polymer having a reactive silicon containing group (b).

  
The curable composition according to Claim 18,
   wherein the amount of use of the plasticizer having an
acrylic component (c) is 10 to 120 weight parts relative to a
combined total of 100 weight parts of the vinyl polymer having
a reactive silicon containing group (a) and polyoxyalkylene
polymer having a reactive silicon containing group (b).

  
The curable composition according to Claim 19,
   wherein the amount of use of the plasticizer having an
acrylic component (c) is 20 to 100 weight parts relative to a 
combined total of 100 weight parts of the vinyl polymer having
a reactive silicon containing group (a) and polyoxyalkylene
polymer having a reactive silicon containing group (b).

  
The curable composition according to any one of
Claims 1 to 20,
   which further comprises another plasticizer in addition
to the plasticizer having an acrylic component (c).

  
The curable composition according to Claim 21,
   wherein the weight ratio of the plasticizer having an
acrylic component (c) to said other plasticizer is not less than
70/30.

  
The curable composition according to any one of
Claims 1 to 22,
   which is for use as a siding board joint sealant.

  
The curable composition according to Claim 23,
   wherein the siding board is a ceramic siding board.

  
The curable composition according to any one of
Claims 1 to 24,
   which further comprises a scaly or particulate substance
not smaller than 0.1 mm in diameter.

  
The curable composition according to any one of
Claims 1 to 24,
   which further comprises a balloon.

  
The curable composition according to Claim 26,
   wherein the diameter of the balloon is not less than 0.1
mm.

 
 Beschreibung
TECHNICAL FIELD
 [0001]  The present invention relates to a novel curable
composition comprising a polyoxyalkylene organic polymer
having a reactive silicon containing group.
 BACKGROUND ART
 [0002]  Room temperature-curable compositions based on
polyoxyalkylene organic polymers having a reactive silicon
containing group are not only inexpensive but also have various
meritorious properties making them suitable for use as, inter
alia, architectural sealants (called modified silicone
sealants). While these are required to be satisfactory enough
in various properties, weather resistance over a long period
of time is no less important than mechanical properties, such
as modulus, elongation at break, strength at break, etc., and
many studies were undertaken in these respects. It has been
found that, as far as mechanical properties such as modulus,
elongation at break, and strength at break are concerned,
addition of a phthalic ester or a polyether plasticizer results
in the expression of characteristics suitable for sealing
materials. With regard to weather resistance, it is disclosed
in, inter alia, Japanese Kokai Publication Sho-59-122541 and
Sho-60-031556 that weather resistance can be improved by
blending a vinyl polymer having a reactive silicon containing
group with a polyoxyalkylene organic polymer having a reactive
silicon containing group as compared with the exclusive use of
such a polyoxyalkylene organic polymer having a reactive
silicon containing group alone.
  [0003]  For the purpose of obtaining a curable composition
providing satisfactory mechanical properties and weather
resistance over a long period of time, the inventors of the 
present invention prepared a curable composition by adding a
phthalic ester or polyether plasticizer to a blend of a vinyl
polymer having a reactive silicon containing group and a
polyoxyalkylene organic polymer having a reactive silicon
containing group on the basis of the above known technologies,
investigated the composition, and found that whereas mechanical
properties were improved in fact, there was still room for
improvement in weather resistance.
 SUMMARY OF THE INVENTION
 [0004]  The obj ect of the present invention is to provide a curable
composition having the tensile properties and rubber-like
elasticity required of sealing compositions for general
architectural use and markedly improved weather resistance over
a long period of time as well.
  [0005]  The inventors explored in earnest for means of realizing
improvements in weather resistance over a long period of time
and found that the above object could be accomplished with a
composition comprising a vinyl polymer having a reactive
silicon containing group (a) , a polyoxyalkylene polymer having
a reactive silicon containing group (b), and a plasticizer
having an acrylic component (c). The present invention has been
developed as a consequence.
  [0006]  The present invention, therefore, comprises the
following inventions.
 (1) A curable composition
   which comprises a vinyl polymer having a reactive silicon
containing group (a), a polyoxyalkylene polymer having a
reactive silicon containing group (b) , and a plasticizer having
an acrylic component (c). (2) The curable composition according to paragraph (1),
   wherein the vinyl polymer having a reactive silicon
containing group (a) is a (meth)acrylic polymer. (3) The curable composition according to paragraphs (1)
or (2), 
   wherein the polyoxyalkylene polymer (b) is at least one
member selected from the group consisting of poly(ethylene
oxide), poly(propylene oxide), polypropylene oxide-ethylene
oxide copolymer, and poly(butylene oxide). (4) The curable composition according to any one of
paragraphs (1) to (3),
   wherein the main chain skeleton of the polyoxyalkylene
polymer (b) is a polymer synthesized by using a double metal
cyanide complex catalyst. (5) The curable composition according to any one of
paragraphs (1) to (4),
   wherein the number average molecular weight of the
polyoxyalkylene polymer (b) is 500 to 50,000. (6) The curable composition according to paragraph (5),
   wherein the number average molecular weight of the
polyoxyalkylene polymer (b) is 1,000 to 30,000. (7) The curable composition according to any one of
paragraphs (1) to (4),
   wherein the number average molecular weight of the
polyoxyalkylene polymer (b) is not less than 12,000. (8) The curable composition according to paragraph 7,
   wherein the number average molecular weight of
polyoxyalkylene polymer (b) is not less than 15,000. (9) The curable composition according to paragraph 8,
   wherein the number average molecular weight of
polyoxyalkylene polymer (b) is not less than 16,000. (10) The curable composition according to any one of
paragraphs (3) to (9),
   wherein the polyoxyalkylene polymer (b) is a
polyoxypropylene polymer. (11) The curable composition according to paragraph
(10),
   wherein the main chain skeleton of the polyoxyalkylene
polymer (b) is a substantially straight-chain polymer. (12) The curable composition according to any one of 
paragraphs (1) to (11),
   wherein the reactive silicon containing group of the
polyoxyalkylene polymer (b) is a group comprising one silicon
atom and two hydrolyzable groups attached thereto. (13) The curable composition according to paragraph
(12),
   wherein the reactive silicon containing group of the
polyoxyalkylene polymer (b) is dimethoxymethylsilyl group. (14) The curable composition according to any one of
paragraphs (1) to (13),
   wherein the number average molecular weight of the vinyl
polymer having a reactive silicon containing group (a) is 5, 000
to 30,000. (15) The curable composition according to any one of
paragraphs (1) to (14),
   wherein the weight ratio of the vinyl polymer having a
reactive silicon containing group (a) to the polyoxyalkylene
polymer having a reactive silicon containing group (b) is 25/75
to 45/55. (16) The curable composition according to any one of
paragraphs (1) to (15),
   wherein the number average molecular weight of the
plasticizer having an acrylic component (c) is 500 to 15,000. (17) The curable composition according to paragraph
(16) ,
   wherein the number average molecular weight of the
plasticizer having an acrylic component (c) is 1,000 to 8,000. (18) The curable composition according to any of
paragraphs (1) to (17),
   wherein the amount of use of the plasticizer having an
acrylic component (c) is 5 to 150 weight parts relative to a
combined total of 100 weight parts of the vinyl polymer having
a reactive silicon containing group (a) and polyoxyalkylene
polymer having a reactive silicon containing group (b). (19) The curable composition according to paragraph 
(18),
   wherein the amount of use of the plasticizer having an
acrylic component (c) is 10 to 120 weight parts relative to a
combined total of 100 weight parts of the vinyl polymer having
a reactive silicon containing group (a) and polyoxyalkylene
polymer having a reactive silicon containing group (b). (20) The curable composition according to paragraph
(19),
   wherein the amount of use of the plasticizer having an
acrylic component (c) is 20 to 100 weight parts relative to a
combined total of 100 weight parts of the vinyl polymer having
a reactive silicon containing group (a) and polyoxyalkylene
polymer having a reactive silicon containing group (b). (21) The curable composition according to any one of
paragraphs (1) to (20),
   which further comprises another plasticizer in addition
to the plasticizer having an acrylic component (c). (22) The curable composition according to paragraph
(21),
   wherein the weight ratio of the plasticizer having an
acrylic component (c) to said other plasticizer is not less than
70/30. (23) The curable composition according to any one of
paragraphs (1) to (22),
   which is for use as a siding board joint sealant. (24) The curable composition according to paragraph
(23),
   wherein the siding board is a ceramic siding board. (25) The curable composition according to any one of
paragraphs (1) to (24),
   which further comprises a scaly or particulate substance
not smaller than 0.1 mm in diameter. (26) The curable composition according to any one of
paragraphs (1) to (24),
   which further comprises a balloon.  (27) The curable composition according to paragraph
(26) ,
   wherein the diameter of the balloon is not less than 0.1
mm.  
 DETAILED DESCRIPTION OF THE INVENTION
 [0007]  The curable composition of the invention comprises a
vinyl polymer having a reactive silicon containing group (a),
a polyoxyalkylene polymer having a reactive silicon containing
group (b), and a plasticizer having an acrylic component (c).
The curable composition of the invention is now described in
detail.
  [0008]  The technology of blending the vinyl polymer having a
reactive silicon containing group (a) with the polyoxyalkylene
polymer having a reactive silicon containing group (b) for use
in the invention includes but is not limited to those specific
methods described in, inter alia, Japanese Kokai Publication
Sho-59-122541 and Sho-63-112642, Japanese Kokai Publication
Hei-06-172631, and Japanese Kokai Publication Sho-60-228517.
  [0009]  The monomer for the vinyl polymer (a) according to the
invention includes acrylates and methacrylates (hereinafter
referred to sometimes as (meth)acrylates), such as methyl
acrylate, methyl methacrylate, ethyl acrylate, ethyl
methacrylate, butyl acrylate, butyl methacrylate,
2-ethylhexyl acrylate, 2-ethylhexyl methacrylate, benzyl
acrylate, benzyl methacrylate, etc.; amide compounds, such as
acrylamide, methacrylamide, N-methylolacrylamide,
N-methylolmethacrylamide, etc.; epoxy compounds, such as
glycidyl acrylate, glycidyl methacrylate, etc.; amino
compounds, such as diethylaminoethyl acrylate,
diethylaminoethyl methacrylate, aminoethyl vinyl ether, etc.;
acrylonitrile, styrene, α-methylstyrene, alkyl vinyl ethers,
vinyl chloride, vinyl acetate, vinyl propionate, and ethylene,
among others. Particularly when the cured product is required
to have rubber-like elasticity and weather resistance, 
(meth)acrylates, especially alkyl (meth)acrylates, are
preferably included in a proportion of not less than 50 weight %.
From the standpoint of compatibility with the polyoxyalkylene
polymer having a reactive silicon containing group (b), it is
preferable to use acrylate and/or methacrylate monomers derived
from alcohols containing 10 or more carbon atoms (hereinafter
referred to sometimes as (meth)acrylate monomers). However,
it is not absolutely necessary to use such (meth)acrylate
monomers derived from alcohols containing 10 or more carbon
atoms but (meth)acrylate monomers, such as butyl acrylate and
butyl acrylate-ethyl acrylate, which are not derived from
alcohols of 10 or more carbon atoms, can also be employed.
  [0010]  From the standpoint of ease of handling, the vinyl polymer
(a) is preferably a polymer having a number average molecular
weight of 500 to 100,000. From the standpoint of improved
elongation properties, greater weather resistance, and
satisfactory workability of the cured product, a vinyl polymer
having a number average molecular weight of 5,000 to 30,000 is
still more preferred. The number average molecular weight of
the vinyl polymer (a) can be determined by GPC in terms of
polystyrene equivalent.
  [0011]  The reactive silicon containing group of said vinyl
polymer (a) is represented by the general formula (1):
    
(wherein R1 and R2 each represents a substituted or
unsubstituted univalent organic group containing 1 to 20 carbon
atoms or a triorganosiloxy group; X represents hydroxyl group
or a hydrolyzable group, which may be the same or varying over
a plurality of occurrences; a represents an integer of 0, 1 or
2 and b represents an integer of 0, 1, 2 or 3, provided, however,
that the condition of (sum of a's) + b ≥ 1 is satisfied; n 
represents an integer of 0 to 19). The reactive silicon
containing group preferred from economic points of view is a
group represented by the general formula (2):
    
(wherein R2 and X are as defined above; b represents an integer
of 1, 2 or 3).
  [0012]  The average number of reactive silicon containing groups
in the vinyl polymer (a) is at least one, preferably not less
than 1.1, particularly preferably not less than 1.5 from the
standpoint of providing sufficient curability.
  [0013]  The particular species of the hydrolyzable group in the
formula (1) includes halogen atom, hydrogen atom, an alkoxy
group, an acyloxy group, ketoximato group, amino group, amido
group, aminoxy group, mercapto group, and an alkenyloxy group.
Among these, alkoxy groups such as methoxy group and ethoxy
group are preferred in consideration of the hydrolyzability
under mild conditions.
  [0014]  As typical groups for R1 and R2 in the formula (1), alkyl
groups, such as methyl group and ethylgroup; cycloalkyl groups,
such as cyclohexyl group, etc.; aryl groups, such as phenyl
group, etc.; and aralkyl groups, such as benzyl group, etc. can
be mentioned. Furthermore, R1 and R2 may each be a
triorganosiloxy group represented by the formula R3 3SiO- (R3 is
the same as R1). Among these, methyl group is particularly
preferred.
  [0015]  As specific examples of said reactive silicon containing
group, trimethoxysilyl group, triethoxysilyl group,
triisopropoxysilyl group, dimethoxymethylsilyl group,
diethoxymethylsilyl group, and diisopropoxymethylsilyl group
can be mentioned.
  [0016]  The greater the number of hydrolyzable groups attached
to the silicon atom, particularly to the same silicon atom, is,
the higher the reactivity of the reactive silicon containing 
group is so that the curing speed of the composition of the
invention tends to be increased. However, the elongation at
break of the cured product is sometimes sacrificed. For example,
trimethoxysilyl group is more reactive than dimethoxysilyl
group, so that a polymer having a trimethoxysilyl group tends
to be more reactive and higher in curing speed but smaller in
the elongation at break after cure, than a polymer having a
dimethoxymethylsilyl group. A curable composition with an
improved curing speed may be obtained by using a vinyl polymer
having a trimethoxysilyl group as said vinyl polymer (a) or
using a vinyl polymer having a trimethoxysilyl group in
combination with a polymer having a dimethoxymethylsilyl group.
Furthermore, a curable composition with a high curing speed may
also be obtained by introducing both kinds of groups into one
and the same polymer. The amount of use of a highly reactive
polymer, e.g. said polymer having a trimethoxysilyl group, and
the relative amounts of said two groups in one and the same
polymer can be judiciously selected so as to give a cured product
having the desired elongation at break and curing speed, among
other variables. The above practice is recommendable because
it is easy to introduce a highly reactive functional group, such
as trimethoxysilyl, into a vinyl polymer. The technology that
can be used for introducing a reactive silicon containing group
into the vinyl polymer (a) is described in, inter alia, Japanese
Kokai Publication Sho-63-112642.
  [0017]  While the skeletal polymer of the vinyl polymer (a) is
generally produced by the ordinary radical polymerization
technique using a radical initiator, it can also be obtained
by the living radical polymerization technique and other
techniques as disclosed in Japanese Kokai Publication
2000-178456. When the ordinary radical polymerization
technique is used, the molecular weight distribution (Mw/Mn)
of the polymer is generally not less than 1.8 when the number
average molecular weight is not less than 10, 000. By the living
radical polymerization technique, the polymer with a molecular 
weight distribution (Mw/Mn) of less than 1.8 or even 1.7 or 1.6
or less can be obtained. The molecular weight distribution
(Mw/Mn) can be determined by GPC analysis (polystyrene
equivalent).
  [0018]  The curable composition comprising a vinyl polymer with
a broad molecular weight distribution as synthesized by the
ordinary radical polymerization technique, typically the
polymerization technique using an azo or peroxy radical
initiator, and a polyoxyalkylene polymer having a reactive
silicon containing group (b) undergoes a greater viscosity
buildup and, hence, adversely affects workability as compared
with the curable composition exclusively comprising the
polyoxyalkylene polymer having a reactive silicon containing
group (b) but may have a viscosity of the order permitting its
use as a sealing material. Among vinyl polymers having a
reactive silicon containing group, a (meth)acrylic polymer
having a reactive silicon containing group is preferred but when
such a polymer is synthesized by the ordinary radical
polymerization technique, it is preferable to use an alkyl
(meth)acrylate monomer having an alkyl group of not less than
10 carbon atoms, an alkyl (meth) acrylate monomer having an alkyl
group of 1 to 8 carbon atoms, and an acrylic and/or methacyrlic
monomer having a reactive silicon containing group to
synthesize a random copolymer comprising such monomer units.
It is also a preferred protocol to use an alkyl (meth) acrylate
monomer having an alkyl group of 1 to 8 carbon atoms and an
acrylic and/or methacrylic monomer having a reactive silicon
containing group, without using an alkyl (meth) acrylate monomer
having an alkyl group of not less than 10 carbon atoms, to
synthesize a random copolymer comprising of such monomer units.
Of course, these copolymers may additionally contain other
monomer units. Referring to the random copolymer having a
reactive silicon containing group, a further alternative
protocol comprises using an acrylic and/or methacrylic monomer
having such a functional group as OH instead of the acrylic 
and/or methacrylic monomer mentioned above to prepare a random
copolymer according to the same polymerization technique as
above and introducing a reactive silicon containing group into
the copolymer through the utilization of said functional group.
  [0019]  The polyoxyalkylene polymer (b) includes polyoxyethylene,
polyoxypropylene, polyoxybutylene, polyoxytetramethylene,
poly(ethylene oxide-co-propylene oxide), and poly(propylene
oxide-co-butylene oxide), among others.
  [0020]  Substantially any polyoxyalkylene polymer having a
repeating unit of the general formula (3):
―R4―O―
(wherein R4 represents a bivalent organic group, preferably a
straight-chain or branched-chain alkylene group of 1 to 14
carbon atoms) is particularly preferred because it has a
comparatively low glass transition temperature and gives a
cured product having satisfactory cold resistance.
  [0021]  Referring to the general formula (3), R4 is preferably
a straight-chain or branched-chain alkylene group of 1 to 14
carbon atoms, more preferably one of 2 to 4 carbon atoms. The
repeating unit represented by the general formula (3) includes
the folllowing species, among others.
    
    
The main chain skeleton of the polyoxyalkylene polymer may
comprise only one kind of repeating unit or two or more kinds
of repeating units. Particularly when the curable composition
is to be used as a sealant or an adhesive, the propylene oxide
polymer, particularly a polymer predominantly composed of 
propylene oxide, namely a polymer containing 80 weight % or more,
preferably 90 weight % or more, of propylene oxide, is preferred
because of its noncrystallinity and comparatively low
viscosity.
  [0022]  The technology of synthesizing a polyoxyalkylene polymer
includes but is not limited to the polymerization method using
an alkali catalyst, such as KOH, the polymerization method using
a transition metal compound-porphyrin complex catalyst, such
as the complex obtainable by reacting an organoaluminum
compound with porphyrin, as described in Japanese Kokai
Publication Sho-61-215623, for instance, the polymerization
method using a double metal cyanide complex catalyst as
disclosed in, inter alia, Japanese Kokoku Publication
Sho-46-27250, Japanese Kokoku Publication Sho-59-15336, USP
3278457, USP 3278458, USP 3278459, USP 3427256, USP 3427334,
and USP 3427335, and the polymerization method using a
phosphazene as disclosed in Japanese Kokai Publication
Hei-11-60723.
  [0023]  The polyoxyalkylene, such as polyoxypropylene, which has
a number average molecular weight of not less than 10,000 is
preferably synthesized using a double metal cyanide complex
catalyst from production cost and other points of view.
  [0024]  The reactive silicon containing group of said
polyoxyalkylene polymer having a reactive silicon containing
group (b) is a group containing a hydroxyl group or other
hydrolyzable group directly attached to a silicon atom and
capable of crosslinking by forming a siloxane bond through the
reaction catalyzed by a curing catalyst. As typical examples,
there can be mentioned the groups represented by the general
formula (4)
    
(wherein R5 and R6 each represents an alkyl group of 1 to 20 
carbon atoms, an aryl group of 6 to 20 carbon atoms, an aralkyl
group of 7 to 20 carbon atoms, or a triorganosiloxy group
represented by the formula R7 3SiO- (R7 represents a univalent
hydrocarbon group of 1 to 20 carbon atoms; three R7 groups may
be the same or different) ; when two or more R5 or R6 groups are
present, such groups may be the same or different; X represents
a hydroxyl group or a hydrolyzable group and when two or more
X groups are present, such groups may be the same or different;
c represents 0, 1, or 2 and d represents 0, 1, 2, or 3; c need
not be the same over m occurrences of the group represented by
the general formula (5):
    
m represents an integer of 0 to 19; with the condition of (sum
of c's) + d ≥ 1 is satisfied).
  [0025]  The hydrolyzable group represented by X is not
particularly restricted but may be a hitherto-known
hydrolyzable group. Specifically, hydrogen atom, halogen atom,
an alkoxy group, an acyloxy group, ketoximato group, amino group,
amido group, acid amide group, aminoxy group, mercapto group,
an alkenyloxy group, etc. may be mentioned. The preferred,
among these, are hydrogen atom, an alkoxy group, an acyloxy
group, ketoximato group, amino group, amido group, aminoxy
group, mercapto group, and an alkenyloxy group and in view of
the hydrolyzability under mild conditions and ease of handling,
an alkoxy group is particularly preferred.
  [0026]  The hydrolyzable group and hydroxyl group may be attached,
in 1 to 3 units per silicon atom, and the value of (sum of c's)
+ d is preferably in the range of 1 to 5. When two or more
hydrolyzable and/or hydroxyl groups are present within the
reactive silicon containing group, the groups may be the same
or different. 
  [0027]  The silicon atom forming said reactive silicon containing
group may be singular or plural and when silicon atoms are linked
together by siloxane bonding or the like, the number of silicon
atoms may range up to about 20.
  [0028]  From availability points of view, reactive silicon
containing groups represented by the general formula (6):
    
(wherein R6 and X are as defined above; d is an integer of 1,
2 or 3) are preferred.
  [0029]  As examples of R5 and R6 in the above general formulas
(4), (5), and (6), there can be mentioned alkyl groups such as
methyl, ethyl, etc. ; cycloalkyl groups such as cyclohexyl etc. ;
aryl groups such as phenyl etc.; aralkyl group such as benzyl
etc.; and triorganosiloxy groups represented by the formula
R7 3SiO- where R7 is methyl or phenyl, for instance. Among these,
methyl group is particularly preferred.
  [0030]  The more specific examples of said reactive silicon
containing group are trimethoxysilyl group, triethoxysilyl
group, triisopropoxysilyl group, dimethoxymethylsilyl group,
diethoxymethylsilyl group, diisopropoxymethylsilyl group, and
so forth.
  [0031]  The curing speed of the composition can be increased by
introducing reactive silicon containing groups having high
reactivity, such as trimethoxysilyl groups, into the
polyoxyalkylene polymer. Particulars of this technology have
already been discussed above.
  [0032]  The above introduction of reactive silicon containing
groups can be carried out in the known manner. For example,
the following methods may be mentioned.
 (a) An organic polymer having a functional group, such
as hydroxyl group, within the molecule is caused to react with
an organic compound having an active group capable of reacting
with said functional group and an unsaturated group to give an 
organic polymer having the unsaturated group, or copolymerized
with an unsaturated group-containing epoxy compound to give an
unsaturated group-containing organic polymer. The reaction
product thus obtained is then hydrosilylated by permitting a
hydrosilane having a reactive silicon containing group to act
thereon. (b) An unsaturated group-containing organic polymer
prepared in the same manner as in (a) is reacted with a compound
having a mercapto group and a reactive silicon containing group. (c) An organic polymer having a functional group, such
as hydroxyl group, epoxy group, or isocyanato group, within the
molecule is reacted with a compound having a functional group
capable of reacting with said functional group and a reactive
silicon containing group. Referring to the above method, the
reaction mode in which the compound having a reactive silicon
containing group is reacted at the terminus of the organic
polymer is preferred.  
  [0033]  The polyoxyalkylene polymer having a reactive silicon
containing group (b) may be straight-chain or branched.
Assuming that the molecular weight is constant, use of a
straight-chain polymer imparts a greater elongation at break
to the cured product as compared with the use of a branched
polymer but causes an increase in viscosity of the uncured
composition so that the composition tends to become less easy
to handle. Referring to the number average molecular weight
of the polyoxyalkylene polymer having a reactive silicon
containing group (b), its lower limit is preferably 500, more
preferably 1,000, still more preferably 12,000. The upper
limit is preferably 50, 000, more preferably 30, 000, still more
preferably 25,0000. If the number average molecular weight is
less than 500, the polyoxyalkylene polymer having a reactive
silicon containing group tends to give a brittle cured product.
If it exceeds 50,000, the functional group concentration is so
low that the curing speed is sacrificed. The additional
disadvantage is that the viscosity of the polymer is increased 
to make handling difficult. Particularly from the standpoint
of viscosity of the polyoxyalkylene polymer having a reactive
silicon containing group, the number average molecular weight
is preferably between 1,000 and 30,000.
  [0034]  Along with the recent prolongation of the quality
assurance period of housings, sealing materials are required
to be free from the aging of performance with time. Under the
circumstances the composition of the invention can be used in
weather-resistant sealing material and other applications with
advantage. Inclusive of architectural sealing materials,
sealing materials in general are required to have high
elongation at break. Sealing materials for ceramic siding
boards which undergo marked shrinkage with time, in particular,
are required to have high elongation at break.
  [0035]  By way of illustration, the test for sealing materials
for ceramic sidings as established by the Japan Association
Fiber Reinforced Cement Siding Manufacturers institutes that
the elongation at break should be at least 250%. However,
counting on aging of performance with time, among others, the
elongation at break is preferably double this value, namely not
less than 500% and, further preferably not less than 600%. The
cured product available from a composition comprising the vinyl
polymer having a reactive silicon containing group (a) and the
polyoxyalkylene polymer having a reactive silicon containing
group (b) is satisfactory in weather resistance but has been
found to be poor in elongation at break as compared with the
composition not containing the vinyl polymer having a reactive
silicon containing group (a). Use of a vinyl polymer having
a reactive silicon containing group giving only an insufficient
elongation at break to a cured product is disadvantageous in
that the freedom of formulation is limited, for a plasticizer
must be used in a large quantity in order to obtain a sufficient
elongation at break, for instance.
  [0036]  The inventors of the present invention discovered that
the most effective method of improving the elongation at break 
of the cured product available from a curable composition
comprising a vinyl polymer having a reactive silicon containing
group (a) and a polyoxyalkylene polymer having a reactive
silicon containing group (b) is to specify the number average
molecular weight of the polyoxyalkylene polymer having a
reactive silicon containing group (b) to be not less than 16, 000.
To improve the elongation at break of the cured product, it is
more efficient to increase the molecular weight of the
polyoxyalkylene polymer having a reactive silicon containing
group (b) than increasing the molecular weight of the vinyl
polymer having a reactive silicon containing group (a).
Generally speaking, assuming that the kind of reactive silicon
containing group and its amount per mole of the polymer are the
same, increasing the molecular weight of the polymer results
in a decreased density of the reactive silicon containing group
and it is, therefore, reasonable to predict that the reaction
rate of the reactive silicon containing group is decreased and
the curing speed of the curable composition is also decreased.
However, in the composition according to the invention,
increasing the number average molecular weight of the
polyoxyalkylene polymer having a reactive silicon containing
group (b) to 16,000 or more results in little loss of curing
speed.
  [0037]  Furthermore, increasing the molecular weight of the
polyoxyalkylene polymer having a reactive silicon containing
group (b) causes a decrease in the number of crosslinking sites
and, hence, tends to sacrifice the weather resistance but the
composition of the invention is advantageous in that
substantially no aging of weather resistance was noted even
after at least 2, 000 hours of sunshine weatherometer exposure.
From the standpoint of elongation at break, the number average
molecular weight of the polyoxyalkylene polymer having a
reactive silicon containing group (b) is preferably not less
than 17,000, further preferably not less than 18,000,
particularly preferably not less than 19,000. In 
consideration of the viscosity of the composition, the upper
limit of molecular weight is 25, 000, further preferably 23, 000,
particularly preferably 22,000.
  [0038]  When the number average molecular weight of the
polyoxyalkylene polymer (b) is to be increased to 16, 000 or more
for improving the elongation at break of the cured product, the
polyoxyalkylene polymer is preferably a straight-chain polymer
having substantially no branches in order that a sufficient
elongation at break may be expressed.
  [0039]  Furthermore, the reactive silicon containing group of the
polyoxyalkylene polymer (b) is preferably a group such that two
hydrolyzable groups are attached to one silicon atom, for
example dimethoxymethylsilyl group.
  [0040]  The number average molecular weight of the
polyoxyalkylene polymer having a reactive silicon containing
group (b) in the context of the invention is the molecular weight
meeting the following definition.
  [0041]  Thus, the number average molecular weight of said polymer
(b) is defined herein to be the number average molecular weight
(end-group molecular weight) determined by measuring terminal
group concentration with direct titrimetry according to the
principles of the hydroxyl value determining method as
specified in JIS K1557 and the iodine value determining method
as specified in JIS K0070 and taking the polyether oligomer
structure into account. It can also be determined by plotting
the polystyrene equivalent molecular weight found by the GPC
analysis, which is a common relative method of determining the
number average molecular weight, against the above end-group
molecular weight to construct a calibration curve and
converting the measured GPC molecular weight to the end-group
molecular weight. Comparison of the molecular weight of the
polymer prior to introduction of said reactive silicon
containing group, such as an unsaturated group-containing
polyoxyalkylene, with the molecular weight of the polymer into
which said reactive silicon containing group has been 
introduced reveals that usually the molecular weight of the
polymer into which said reactive silicon containing group has
been introduced tends to be slightly larger but there is no
remarkable difference.
  [0042]  The reactive silicon containing group of the
polyoxyalkylene polymer (b) for use in the invention should
exist in the number of at least 1, preferably 1.1 to 5, for each
mole of the polymer on the average. If the number of reactive
silicon containing groups in the polymer molecule is less than
1 on the average, curability will be insufficient. If the
number is too large, the polymer network structure will be too
dense to express good mechanical properties.
  [0043]  The reactive silicon containing group of the
polyoxyalkylene polymer (b) for use in the invention may be
present within the polyether molecular chain as a side chain
or at the chain terminus. When the reactive silicon containing
group is present as a side chain, the effective network chain
amount in the ultimate cured product is smaller so that a rubbery
cured product expressing high elastic modulus and low
elongation at break is more likely formed. On the other hand,
when the reactive silicon containing group is present in the
neighborhood of the molecular chain terminus, the effective
network chain amount in the ultimate cured product is large so
that a rubbery cured product expressing high strength, high
elongation at break, and low elastic modulus is more likely
formed. Particularly when the reactive silicon containing
group is present at the molecular chain terminus, the effective
network chain amount in the ultimate cured product is maximized
so that a cured product is suited for use as an architectural
sealant desirably having large elongation at break in the sense
of tensile properties and rubber-like elasticity in the sense
of flexibility.
  [0044]  Specifically, the polyoxyalkylene polymer having a
reactive silicon containing group (b) includes but is not
limited to the polymers proposed in Japanese Kokoku Publication 
Sho-45-36319 and Sho-46-12154, Japanese Kokai Publication
Sho-50-156599, Sho-54-6096, Sho-55-13767, Sho-55-13468,
Sho-57-164123, Japanese Kokoku Publication Hei-03-2450, USP
3632557, USP 4345053, USP 4366307, USP 4960844, etc.; the
polymers having reactive silicon containing groups, such as
dimethoxymethylsilyl groups, as introduced by hydrosilylation,
for instance, into polyoxyalkylene polymers having high
molecular weights and narrow molecular weight distributions,
namely number average molecular weights not less than 6, 000 and
Mw/Mn values not over 1. 6, which are proposed in Japanese Kokai
Publication Sho-61-197631, Sho-61-215622, Sho-61-215623, and
Sho-61-218632, and the polymers having high molecular weights
and narrow molecular weight distributions as disclosed in
Japanese Kokai Publication Hei-03-72527.
  [0045]  The vinyl polymer having a reactive silicon containing
group (a) largely contributes to the viscosity gain of the final
composition and, hence, tends to degrade the workability but
by using a polyoxyalkylene polymer having a reactive silicon
containing group (b) having a Mw/Mn value of not more than 1. 6,
preferably not more than 1.5, it is possible to suppress the
viscosity gain of the final composition and improve the
workability. Such a polymer can be prepared from a
polyoxyalkylene polymer synthesized by using a double metal
cyanide complex catalyst. Even if a polymer with such a narrow
molecular weight distribution is used as said polyoxyalkylene
polymer having a reactive silicon containing group (b), it is
likely that the use of a straight-chain polymer with a number
average molecular weight of not less than 16,000 and, as the
vinyl polymer having a reactive silicon containing group (a),
a polymer prepared by the radical polymerization technique
other than the living radical polymerization technique, such
as a (meth) acrylic random copolymer, will result in a remarkable
increase in the viscosity of the composition. However, the
viscosity will still be of the order of about 100 Pa·s or 80
Pa·s, which permits use of the composition as a sealing material 
composition. Therefore, it will be unnecessary to use an
extraordinary formulation including a solvent and an excessive
amount of a plasticizer for viscosity reduction, for instance,
or, if formulated, these need be used only in minor amounts.
  [0046]  Regarding the formulating ratio of the vinyl polymer
having a reactive silicon containing group (a) to the
polyoxyalkylene polymer having a reactive silicon containing
group (b), the lower limit of (a)/(b) (by weight) is preferably
10/90, more preferably 25/75, still more preferably 30/70. The
upper limit is preferably 90/10, more preferably 45/55. If this
ratio is reduced to less than 10/90, that is to say the relative
amount of the polyoxyalkylene polymer having a reactive silicon
containing group (b) is increased, the weather resistance tends
to become insufficient when the weather resistance of a modified
silicone sealing material showing no aging after 2,000 hours
of sunshine weatherometer exposure is regarded as a standard.
On the other hand, if the ratio exceeds 90/10, that is to say
the relative amount of the vinyl polymer having a reactive
silicon containing group (a) is increased, the weather
resistance will be improved but the composition tends to gain
so much in viscosity as to degrade the workability.
  [0047]  In the case where an alkyl acrylate polymer and/or alkyl
methacrylate polymer having a reactive silicon containing group
is used as the vinyl polymer having a reactive silicon
containing group (a) and a polyoxypropylene polymer having a
reactive silicon containing group is used as the
polyoxyalkylene polymer having a reactive silicon containing
group (b), the (a)/(b) ratio is preferably within the range of
25/75 to 45/55. Particularly when a polyoxypropylene polymer
having a reactive silicon containing group with a number average
molecular weight of not less than 10,000, preferably not less
than 16,000, especially preferably not less than 18,000, and
a molecular weight distribution Mw/Mn = not more than 1.5 is
employed, the (a)/(b) ratio is preferably within the range of
25/75 to 45/55. When the (a)/(b) ratio is 25/75 to 45/55, both 
sufficient weather resistance and workability can be well
achieved. The more preferred range is 30/70 to 45/55.
  [0048]  The plasticizer having an acrylic component (c) for use
in the invention includes polymers of acrylic monomers such as
acrylates and acrylamides. The preferred are polymers
inclusive of acrylate copolymers and copolymers of acrylates
with other monomers. As specific acrylates, the acrylates
indicated for use in the production of the (a) component of the
invention can be mentioned by way of example. The preferred
are alkyl acrylates, particularly alkyl acrylates having alkyl
groups of 1 to 8 carbon atoms, such as butyl acrylate and ethyl
acrylate. By adding such a plasticizer, not only the viscosity
and slump of the curable composition and the mechanical
properties, such as tensile strength and elongation at break,
of the cured product obtained by curing the composition can be
adjusted but also a good weather resistance can be maintained
for a long time as compared with the use of a plasticizer not
containing an acrylic component within the molecule.
Furthermore, the use of the plasticizer having an acrylic
component (c), particularly the acrylic polymer synthesized by
the SGO process to be described hereinafter, results in a
greater elongation at break of the cured product as compared
with the use of any plasticizer other than the plasticizer
having an acrylic component. Therefore, in manufacturing a
sealing material with a large elongation at break of the
ultimate cured product, which is especially required of sealing
materials for siding boards, by using a polymer with a number
average molecular weight of not less than 16,000 as the
polyoxyalkylene polymer (b) as mentioned above, a plasticizer
having an acrylic component (c) functions as a very suitable
plasticizer.
  [0049]  The number average molecular weight of said plasticizer
having an acrylic component (c) is preferably 500 to 15,000,
more preferably 800 to 10,000, still more preferably 1,000 to
8, 000. If the molecular weight is too low, heat and rain tend 
to cause release of the plasticizer with time to prevent
long-term maintenance of initial physical properties and
expression of improved weather resistance. On the other hand,
if the molecular weight is too large, the viscosity tends to
be increased to degrade the workability. Since the plasticizer
having an acrylic component (c) acts as a plasticizer, its
viscosity is usually lower than the viscosity of either one or
both of the vinyl polymer having a reactive silicon containing
group (a) and polyoxyalkylene polymer having a reactive silicon
containing group (b). Particularly, the viscosity of the
plasticizer having an acrylic component (c) is preferably lower
than the viscosity of the polyoxyalkylene polymer having a
reactive silicon containing group (b). Referring to number
average molecular weight, too, the number average molecular
weight of the plasticizer having an acrylic component (c) is
preferably lower than the number average molecular weight of
either one or both of the vinyl polymer having a reactive silicon
containing group (a) and polyoxyalkylene polymer having a
reactive silicon containing group (b) by not less than 1,000,
more preferably not less than 2, 000, still more preferably not
less than 3,000. The number average molecular weight of the
plasticizer having an acrylic component (c) can be determined
by GPC as the polystyrene equivalent. The molecular weight
distribution (Mw/Mn) can also be determined by GPC (polystyrene
equivalent method).
  [0050]  Specifically, the plasticizer having an acrylic
component (c) includes but is not particularly limited to the
(meth)acrylic polymer with a molecular weight distribution of
not more than 1.8 as prepared by the living radical
polymerization technique proposed in, inter alia, Japanese
Kokai Publication 2000-178456. The polymers made via SGO
process which are produced by Toagosei Co., Ltd. and Johnson
Polymer Corporation as reported in the August, 1998 issue (p.
110) of Kogyo Zairyo can also be utilized. The SGO polymers
can be produced by subjecting acrylate monomers to continuous 
bulk polymerization at high temperature and pressure. Usually
the polymers which are liquid at room temperature and have no
functional group are employed. These may be used each
independently or in a combination of two or more species. Where
necessary, these may be used in combination with a low molecular
plasticizer within the range not adversely affecting physical
properties.
  [0051]  These plasticizers having an acrylic component may be
acrylic polymers not having a reactive silicon containing group
or acrylic polymers having a reactive silicon containing group.
By utilizing the hydroxyl group of a hydroxyl group-containing
polymer made via SGO process, the reactive silicon containing
group can be introduced by the same method as the
above-described method of introducing a reactive silicon
containing group for the production of the polyoxyalkylene
polymer having a reactive silicon containing group (b). The
acrylic polymer having a reactive silicon containing group
functions as a reactive plasticizer, helping to eliminate
bleeding of a plasticizer from the cured product, among other
effects. When the reactive silicon containing group exists in
the number of more than 1 per mole of the polymer on the average,
the tensile properties of the cured product are greatly affected.
The plasticizer having an acrylic component (c), such as an
acrylic polymer, which has a reactive silicon containing group
in the number of not more than 1 on the average per mole is
preferred as said reactive plasticizer.
  [0052]  Regarding the amount of use of the plasticizer having an
acrylic component (c) relative to a combined total of 100 weight
parts of the vinyl polymer having a reactive silicon containing
group (a) and polyoxyalkylene polymer having a reactive silicon
containing group (b), the lower limit is preferably 5 weight
parts, more preferably 10 weight parts, still more preferably
20 weight parts. The upper limit is preferably 150 weight parts,
more preferably 120 weight parts, still more preferably 100
weight parts. If the upper limit is less than 5 weight parts, 
the plasticizing effect tends to be scarcely expressed. If it
exceeds 150 weight parts, the mechanical strength of the cured
product tends to be insufficient. And, such a plasticizer may
be formulated in the stage of synthesis of the polymer.
  [0053]  For curing the composition of the invention, a curing
catalyst need not necessarily be used. When a curing catalyst
is to be used, conventionally known catalysts can be used. As
specific examples of the curing catalyst, silanol condensation
catalysts including titanium compounds such as tetrabutyl
titanate, tetrapropyl titanate, tetraacetylacetonate titanium,
etc.; tetravalent tin compounds such as dibutyltin dilaurate,
dibutyltin maleate, dibutyltin phthalate, dibutyltin
dioctanoate, dibutyltin di(ethyl hexanoate), dibutyltin
di(methyl maleate), dibutyltin di(ethyl maleate), dibutyltin
di(butyl maleate), dibutyltin di(octyl maleate), dibutyltin
di(tridecyl maleate), dibutyltin di(benzyl maleate),
dibutyltin diacetate, dioctyltin di(ethyl maleate),
dioctyltin di(octyl maleate), dibutyltin dimethoxide,
dibutyltin di(nonyl phenoxide), dibutenyltin oxide,
dibutyltin di(acetyl acetonate), dibutyltin di(ethyl
acetoacetonate), reaction products of dibutyltin oxide with
phthalic esters, etc.; divalent tin compounds such as stannous
octanoate, tin naphthenate, stannous stearate, etc.;
organoaluminum compounds such as aluminum
tris(acetylacetonate), aluminum tris(ethyl acetoacetate),
diisopropoxyaluminum-ethyl acetoacetate, etc.; zirconium
compounds such as zirconium tetraacetylacetonate etc.; lead
octanoate; amine compounds such as butylamine, octylamine,
dibutylamine, monoethanolamine, diethanolamine,
triethanolamine, diethylenetriamine, triethylenetetramine,
oleylamine, cyclohexylamine, benzylamine,
diethylaminopropylamine, xylylenediamine, triethylenediamine,
guanidine, diphenylguanidine,
2,4,6-tris(dimethylaminomethyl)phenol, morpholine,
N-methylmorpholine, 2-ethyl-4-methylimidazole, 
1,8-diazabicyclo(5.4.0)undecene-7 (DBU), etc. or salts of
these amine compounds with carboxylic acids etc.; low molecular
weight polyamide resins obtainable from an excess of a polyamine
with polybasic acids; reaction products of an excess of a
polyamine with epoxy compounds; silane coupling agents having
an amino group such as γ-aminopropyltrimethoxysilane,
N-(β-aminoethyl)aminopropylmethyldimethoxysilane, etc.;
other known silanol condensation catalysts such as other acid
catalysts and basic catalysts, among others, can be mentioned.
These catalysts may be used each independently or in a
combination of two or more species.
  [0054]  The amount of use of such a curing catalyst relative to
a combined total of 100 weight parts of the vinyl polymer having
a reactive silicon containing group (a) and polyoxyalkylene
polymer having a reactive silicon containing group (b) is
preferably about 0.1 to 20 weight parts, more preferably about
1 to 10 weight parts. Too low amount of use of the curing
catalyst is not preferable, because the curing speed is
decreased and the curing reaction does not proceed sufficiently.
On the other hand, too high amount of use of the curing catalyst
is not preferable, because local exothermic reaction and
foaming take place in curing and a good cured product cannot
be easily obtained.
  [0055]  For the purpose of enhancing the activity of the
condensation catalyst, the curable composition of the invention
may be supplemented with a silicon compound having no silanol
group which may be represented by the general formula:
RaSi(OR)4-a 
(wherein the R groups each independently represents a
substituted or unsubstituted hydrocarbon group of 1 to 20 carbon
atoms; a represents any of 0, 1, 2, and 3). This silicon
compound is not restricted but the compounds of the above
general formula wherein R is an aryl group of 6 to 20 carbon
atoms, such as phenyltrimethoxysilane,
phenylmethyldimethoxysilane, phenyldimethylmethoxysilane, 
diphenyldimethoxysilane, diphenyldiethoxysilane, and
triphenylmethoxysilane, are preferred because these are
especially effective in accelerating the curing reaction of the
composition. In consideration of cost and availability,
diphenyldimethoxysilane and diphenyldiethoxysilane are
particularly preferred. The formulating amount of this
silicon compound is preferably about 0.01 to 20 weight parts,
more preferably 0.1 to 10 weight parts, based on a combined total
of 100 weight parts of the vinyl polymer having a reactive
silicon containing group (a) and polyoxyalkylene polymer having
a reactive silicon containing group (b). If the formulating
amount of the silicon compound is below the above range, the
accelerating effect on the curing reaction tends to be
insufficient. On the other hand, if the formulating amount of
the silicon compound exceeds the above range, the hardness and
tensile strength of the cured product tend to be decreased.
  [0056]  The composition of the invention may be supplemented with
a silane coupling agent, a reaction product of a silane coupling
agent, or a compound other than a silane coupling agent as an
adhesion-imparting agent. Specifically, the silane coupling
agent includes isocyanato group-containing silanes such as
γ-isocyanatopropyltrimethoxysilane,
γ-isocyanatopropyltriethoxysilane,
γ-isocyanatopropylmethyldiethoxysilane,
γ-isocyanatopropylmethyldimethoxysilane, etc.; amino
group-containing silanes such as
γ-aminopropyltrimethoxysilane, γ-aminopropyltriethoxysilane,
γ-aminopropylmethyldimethoxysilane,
γ-aminopropylmethyldiethoxysilane,
γ-(2-aminoethyl)aminopropyltrimethoxysilane,
γ-(2-aminoethyl)aminopropylmethyldimethoxysilane,
γ-(2-aminoethyl)aminopropyltriethoxysilane,
γ-(2-aminoethyl)aminopropylmethyldiethoxysilane,
γ-ureidopropyltrimethoxysilane,
N-phenyl-γ-aminopropyltrimethoxysilane, 
N-benzyl-γ-aminopropyltrimethoxysilane,
N-vinylbenzyl-γ-aminopropyltriethoxysilane, etc.; mercapto
group-containing silanes such as
γ-mercaptopropyltrimethoxysilane,
γ-mercaptopropyltriethoxysilane,
γ-mercaptopropylmethyldimethoxysilane,
γ-mercaptopropylmethyldiethoxysilane, etc.; epoxy
group-containing silanes such as
γ-glycidoxypropyltrimethoxysilane,
γ-glycidoxypropyltriethoxysilane,
γ-glycidoxypropylmethyldimethoxysilane,
β-(3,4-epoxycyclohexyl)ethyltrimethoxysilane,
β-(3,4-epoxycyclohexyl)ethyltriethoxysilane, etc.;
carboxysilanes such as β-carboxyethyltriethoxysilane,
β-carboxyethylphenylbis(2-methoxyethoxy)silane,
N-β-(carboxymethyl)aminoethyl-γ-aminopropyltrimethoxysilane,
etc.; vinyl type unsaturated group-containing silanes such as
vinyltrimethoxysilane, vinyltriethoxysilane,
γ-methacryloyloxypropylmethyldimethoxysilane,
γ-acryloyloxypropylmethyltriethoxysilane, etc.;
halogen-containing silanes such as
γ-chloropropyltrimethoxysilane etc. ; and isocyanurate silanes
such as tris(trimethoxysilyl) isocyanurate and so forth.
Furthermore, the modification derivatives of these silanes,
such as amino-modified silyl polymers, silylated amino
group-containing polymers, unsaturated aminosilane complexes,
phenylamino(long-chain)alkylsilanes, aminosilylated
silicones, silylated polyesters, etc. may also be used likewise
as silane coupling agents. In the present invention, the silane
coupling agent is used generally within the range of 0.1 to 20
weight parts, particularly preferably 0.5 to 10 weight parts,
based on a combined total of 100 weight parts of the vinyl polymer
having a reactive silicon containing group (a) and
polyoxyalkylene polymer having a reactive silicon containing
group (b). 
  [0057]  Regarding the effect of the silane coupling agent added
to the curable composition of the invention, when the
composition is applied to various adherends, namely inorganic
substrates such as glass, aluminum, stainless steel, zinc,
copper, mortar, etc. or organic substrates such as poly(vinyl
chloride), acrylic resins, polyesters, polyethylene,
polypropylene, polycarbonates, etc., the silane coupling agent
produces marked improvements in adhesion whether under
non-primer conditions or under primer conditions. The
adhesion-improving effect on various adherends is particularly
pronounced when it is used under non-primer conditions. As
specific examples of the adhesion-imparting agent other than
silane coupling agents, there can be mentioned but not
particularly limited to epoxy resins, phenol resins, sulfur,
alkyl titanates, and aromatic polyisocyanates, among others.
These adhesion-imparting agents may be used each independently
or as a mixture of two or more different species. By adding
such an adhesive-imparting agent, the adhesion to various
adherends can be improved.
  [0058]  The composition of the invention may be supplemented with
various fillers. Among such fillers are reinforcing fillers
such as fumed silica, precipitated silica, crystalline silica,
fused silica, dolomite, silicic anhydride, hydrous silicic acid,
and carbon black; such fillers as ground calcium carbonate,
colloidal calcium carbonate, magnesium carbonate,
diatomaceous earth, calcined clay, clay, talc, titanium dioxide,
bentonite, organic bentonite, ferric oxide, aluminum dust,
flint powder, zinc oxide, activated zinc white,
Shirasu-balloons, glass microballoons, organic microballoons
such as phenol resin and vinylidene chloride resin
microballoons, and resin powders such as PVC powder and PMMA
powder; fibrous fillers such as asbestos, glass fibers and
filaments, and so forth.
  [0059]  When it is desired to obtain a cured product of high
hardness by using such a filler, it is advantageous to use a 
filler selected chiefly from fumed silica, precipitated silica,
crystalline silica, fused silica, dolomite, silicic anhydride,
hydrous silicic acid, carbon black, surface-treated microfine
calcium carbonate, calcined clay, clay, activated zinc white,
among others, and satisfactory results are obtained when such
a filler or fillers are used in a proportion of 1 to 100 weight
parts relative to a combined total of 100 weight parts of said
vinyl polymer having a reactive silicon containing group (a)
and polyoxyalkylene polymer having a reactive silicon
containing group (b). Furthermore, when it is desired to obtain
a cured product with low strength and high elongation at break,
it is advantageous to use a filler or fillers selected chiefly
from titanium dioxide, calcium carbonate, magnesium carbonate,
talc, ferric oxide, zinc oxide, silas balloons, among others,
in a proportion of 5 to 200 weight parts based on a combined
total of 100 weight parts of said vinyl polymer having a reactive
silicon containing group (a) and polyoxyalkylene polymer having
a reactive silicon containing group (b). In this connection,
calcium carbonate is generally characterized in that the larger
its surface area, the greater is the degree of improvement in
the strength at break, elongation at break, and adhesion of the
cured product. Of course, these fillers may be used each
independently or as a mixture of two or more different species.
  [0060]  For the purpose of improving the workability
(knife-releasability and other properties) of the composition
and giving a matte effect on the surface of the cured product,
addition of organic balloons or inorganic balloons is preferred.
These fillers may be surface-treated and can be used each
species independently or as a mixture of two or more different
species. For improving the workability (knife-releasability
and other properties), the particle size of balloons is
preferably not more than 0.1 mm. For imparting a matte effect
to the surface of the cured product, the preferred size is 5
to 300 µm.
  [0061]  By virtue of the satisfactory weather resistance of the 
cured product, the composition of the invention can be applied
with advantage to the joints of exterior walls of houses, such
as siding boards, particularly ceramic siding boards but it is
preferable to match the sealing material design to the siding
design. As exterior walls, in particular, those with a deluxe
feeling created by spatter coating or incorporation of colored
aggregates are used these days. When a scaly or particulate
substance not less smaller 0.1 mm, preferably about 0.1 to 5.0
mm, in diameter is formulated into the composition of the
invention, the cured product matches up well with such
deluxe-finished exterior walls and, in addition, shows good
weather resistance. Thus, the composition is enabled to give
a cured product capable of retaining the attractive appearance
over years. When a particulate substance is formulated, a
pebbled or sandstone-like coarse surface texture can be
expressed. When a scaly substance is formulated, an irregular
surface resulting from its scaly shape can be expressed.
  [0062]  The preferred diameter, formulating amount, constituent
material, etc. of such scaly or particulate substances are
described in Japanese Kokai Publication Hei-09-53063, as
follows.
  [0063]  The diameter is not less than 0.1 mm, preferably about
0.1 to 5.0 mm, and a suitable size is selected according to the
exterior wall material, design, and the like. Scaly substances
and particulate substances measuring about 0.2 mm to 5.0 mm in
diameter and those measuring about 0.5 mm to 5.0 mm can also
be employed. In the case of a scaly substance, its thickness
is about 1/10 to 1/5 of its diameter (ca. 0.01 to 1.00 mm) . The
scaly or particulate substance is either premixed with the main
sealing material and transported, as such, to the field or mixed
with the main sealing material in the field before application.
  [0064]  The scaly or particulate substance is formulated in a
proportion of about 1 to 200 weight parts relative to 100 weight
parts of the sealing material composition. The formulating
amount is judiciously selected according to the size of the 
scaly or particulate substance, the exterior wall material and
design, and so forth.
  [0065]  As the scaly or particulate substance, natural materials
such as silica sand, mica, etc., synthetic rubbers, synthetic
resins, and inorganic materials such as alumina are used. To
enhance the decorative effect of joints after application, the
material can be colored to a suitable shade matching the siding
material, design, and the like.
  [0066]  The preferred finishing method and other particulars are
disclosed in Japanese Kokai Publication Hei-09-53063.
  [0067]  When balloons (preferably with a mean particle diameter
not less than 0.1 mm) are used for the same purpose as above,
a pebbled or sandstone-like coarse texture can be obtained and,
in addition, a reduction in weight can be realized. The
preferred diameter, formulating amount, constituent material,
etc. of such balloons are described in Japanese Kokai
Publication Hei-10-251618, as follows.
  [0068]  Balloons are hollow spherical fillers. The material for
such balloons includes inorganic materials such as glass, silas,
silica, etc. and organic materials such as phenol resins, urea
resins, polystyrenes, Saran, etc. but these are not exclusive
choices. Thus, it may be a composite of inorganic and organic
materials or a laminate comprising a plurality of layers of such
materials. Thus, any of inorganic, organic, and composite
balloons can be employed. The balloons for use may be balloons
of one and the same material or a mixture of balloons of different
materials. Furthermore, balloons having a processed or coated
surface can be used and even otherwise balloons surface-treated
with various finishing agents may also be used. For example,
organic balloons coated with calcium carbonate, talc, titanium
dioxide, or the like and inorganic balloons subjected to a
surface treatment with a silane coupling agent can be mentioned.
  [0069]  In order to obtain a pebbled or a sandstone-like coarse
surface, the diameter of individual balloons is preferably not
less than 0.1 mm. Balloons measuring about 0.2 to 5.0 mm or 
about 0.5 to 5. 0 mm in diameter can also be used. If the diameter
is less than 0.1 mm, formulating a large quantity of balloons
tends to cause only a viscosity gain of the composition, not
contributing to the expression of a coarse texture. The
formulating amount of balloons can be easily selected according
to the desired degree of coarseness of the pebbled or
sandstone-like texture. It is usually recommendable to
formulate balloons not smaller than 0.1 mm in diameter in a
proportion of 5 to 25 vol % based on the volume of the composition.
If the volume concentration of balloons is less than 5 vol %,
no coarse texture can be obtained. If it exceeds 25 vol %, the
sealing material will gain too much in viscosity to obtain
sufficient workability and the modulus of the cured product will
be increased so that the fundamental performance as a sealing
material tends to be impaired. The volume concentration which
is particularly preferred for achieving a balance with the
fundamental performance required of a sealing material is 8 to
22 vol %.
  [0070]  In using balloons, the composition may be supplemented
with an anti-slip agent such as the one described in Japanese
Kokai Publication 2000-154368 and an amine compound for further
imparting a matte effect to the irregular surface of the cured
product, particularly a primary and/or secondary amine having
a melting point of not less than 35°C, as discribed in Japanese
Kokai Publication 2001-164237.
  [0071]  Specific examples of balloons are described in Japanese
Kokai Publication Hei-02-129262, Japanese Kokai Publication
Hei-04-8788, Japanese Kokai Publication Hei-04-173867,
Japanese Kokai Publication Hei-05-1225, Japanese Kokai
Publication Hei-07-113073, Japanese Kokai Publication
Hei-09-53063, Japanese Kokai Publication Hei-10-251618,
Japanese Kokai Publication 2000-154368, Japanese Kokai
Publication 2001-164237, and WO97/05201, among other
publications.
  [0072]  When the composition of the invention contains particles 
of cured sealing material, the cured product is formed with
surface irregularities, thus improved in the decorative effect.
The preferred diameter, formulating amount, constituent
material, etc. of said particles of cured sealing material are
as described in Japanese Kokai Publication 2001-115142, as
follows. The preferred diameter is 0.1 to 1 mm, more preferably
about 0.2 to 0.5 mm. The formulating amount is preferably 5
to 100 weight %, more preferably 20 to 50 weight %, in the curable
composition. The constituent material is not particularly
restricted provided that it can be used as a sealing material
and includes urethane resins, silicones, modified silicones,
polysulfide rubber, etc., although a modified silicone type
sealing material is preferred.
  [0073]  The composition of the invention may be supplemented with
a suitable other plasticizer component in addition to said
plasticizer having an acrylic component. The plasticizer
component mentioned just above is not particularly restricted
but, depending on purposes such as adjustment of physical
properties and adjustment of physical state, the following
substances can be used each independently or as a mixture of
two or more species: namely phthalic esters such as dibutyl
phthalate, diheptyl phthalate, di(2-ethylhexyl) phthalate,
butyl benzyl phthalate, etc.; non-aromatic dibasic acid esters
such as dioctyl adipate, dioctyl sebacate, dibutyl sebacate,
isodecyl succinate, etc. ; fatty acid esters such as butyl oleate,
methyl acetylricilynoleate, etc.; esters of polyalkylene
glycols, such as diethylene glycol dibenzoate, triethylene
glycol dibenzoate, pentaerythritol esters, etc.; phosphoric
esters such as tricresyl phosphate, tributyl phosphate, etc.;
trimellitic esters; chlorinated paraffins; hydrocarbon oils
such as alkyldiphenyls, partially hydrogenated terphenyl,
etc.; process oils; polyethers such as polyethylene glycol,
polypropylene glycol, etc.; epoxy plasticizers such as
epoxidized soybean oil, benzyl epoxystearate, etc.; and
polyester plasticizers. However, these are not necessarily 
essential. These plasticizers can be formulated in the stage
of polymer synthesis. The plasticizer having an acrylic
component (c) is generally expensive and the use of it in
combination with other plasticizers often results in cost
reduction. When such other plasticizers are used in
combination with the plasticizer having an acrylic component
(c) in formulations of the composition of the invention, the
case in which the weight ratio of the plasticizer having an
acrylic component to the other plasticizer or plasticizers is
not less than 70/30 is superior to the case in which the ratio
is less than 70/30 as far as weather resistance is concerned.
From the standpoint of compatibility, the plasticizers other
than the plasticizer having an acrylic component (c) are
preferably phthalic esters and polyethers.
  [0074]  Where necessary, the curable composition of the invention
may be supplemented with a physical state-modulating agent for
adjusting the tensile properties of the cured product. The
physical state-modulating agent is not particularly restricted
but includes, inter alia, alkylalkoxysilanes such as
methyltrimethoxysilane, dimethyldimethoxysilane,
trimethylmethoxysilane, n-propyltrimethoxysilane, etc.;
alkoxysilanes having a functional group such as
alkylisopropenoxysilane, e.g. dimethyldiisopropenoxysilane,
methyltriisopropenoxysilane and
γ-glycidoxypropylmethyldiisopropenoxysilane,
γ-glycidoxypropylmethyldimethoxysilane,
γ-glycidoxypropyltrimethoxysilane, vinyltrimethoxysilane,
vinyldimethylmethoxysilane, γ-aminopropyltrimethoxysilane,
N-(β-aminoethyl)aminopropylmethyldimethoxysilane,
γ-mercaptopropyltrimethoxysilane,
γ-mercaptopropylmethyldimethoxysilane, etc.; silicone
varnishes; and polysiloxanes, among others. By using such a
physical state-modulating agent, the cured product available
on cure of the composition of the invention can be so adjusted
as to increase its hardness or conversely decrease its hardness 
and increase its elongation at break. The physical
state-modulating agents mentioned above may be used each
independently or in a combination of two or more species.
  [0075]  Where necessary, the curable composition of the invention
may be supplemented with a thixotropic agent (antisagging
agent) for preventing sagging and contributing to workability.
The antisagging agent is not particularly restricted but
includes, inter alia, polyamide waxes; hydrogenated castor oil
derivatives; and metal soaps such as calcium stearate, aluminum
stearate, barium stearate, and so forth. These thixotropic
agents (antisagging agents) can be used each independently or
in a combination of two or more species.
  [0076]  The composition of the invention may be supplemented with
an epoxy resin and used as an elastic adhesive or the like. The
epoxy resin mentioned just above includes but is not limited
to epichlorohydrin-bisphenol A type epoxy resin,
epichlorohydrin-bisphenol F type epoxy resin,
tetrabromobisphenol A glycidyl ether and other fire-retardant
epoxy resins, novolak type epoxy resin, hydrogenated bisphenol
A type epoxy resin, bisphenol A-propylene oxide adduct glycidyl
ether type epoxy resin, p-hydroxybenzoic acid glycidyl ether
ester epoxy resin, m-aminophenol epoxy resin,
diaminodiphenylmethane epoxy resin, urethane-modified epoxy
resin, various alicyclic epoxy resins, N, N-diglycidylaniline,
N,N-diglycidyl-o-toluidine, triglycidyl isocyanurate,
polyalkylene glycol diglycidyl ethers, glycerin or other
polyhydric alcohol glycidyl ethers, hydantoin epoxy resins, and
unsaturated polymer epoxides such as petroleum resin. Thus,
any of the common epoxy resins can be used. The epoxy resin
having at least 2 epoxy groups within the molecule is preferred
partly because it is highly reactive in curing and partly
because it is more likely to give a three-dimensional network
on curing. As further preferred examples, bishphenol A type
epoxy resin and novolak type epoxy resin can be mentioned. The
amount of use of such epoxy resin based on a combined total weight 
of the vinyl polymer having a reactive silicon containing group
(a) and polyoxyalkylene polymer having a reactive silicon
containing group (b) is ((a) + (b)) /epoxy resin = 100/1 to 1/100
by weight. If the ((a) + (b))/epoxy resin ratio is less than
1/100, the improving effect on impact strength and toughness
of the cured epoxy resin will hardly be obtained. If the ((a)
+ (b))/epoxy resin ratio exceeds 100/1, the strength of the
cured oxyalkylene polymer will be insufficient. The preferred
ratio varies according to uses of the curable resin composition
and other factors and cannot be stated in general terms but when,
for example, it is desired to improve the impact resistance,
flexibility, toughness, peel strength, etc. of the cured epoxy
resin, it is recommendable to use 1 to 100 weight parts,
preferably 5 to 100 weight parts of ((a) component + (b)
component) relative to 100 weight parts of epoxy resin. On the
other hand, when it is desired to improve the strength of cured
((a) component + (b) component), it is recommendable to use 1
to 200 weight parts, preferably 5 to 100 weight parts, of the
epoxy resin relative to 100 weight parts of ((a) component +
(b) component).
  [0077]  Of course, a curing agent for curing the epoxy resin can
be used in combination with the composition of the invention.
The curing agent for epoxy resin that can be used is not
particularly restricted but includes the common curing agents
for epoxy resin. Specifically, there can be mentioned primary
or secondary amines such as triethylenetetramine,
tetraethylenepentamine, diethylaminopropylamine,
N-aminoethylpiperidine, m-xylylenediamine,
m-phenylenediamine, diaminodiphenylmethane,
diaminodiphenylsulfone, isophoronediamine, amine-terminated
polyethers, etc.; tertiary amines such as
2,4,6-tris(dimethylaminomethyl)phenol, tripropylamine, etc.;
salts of these tertiary amines; polyamide resins; imidazoles;
dicyandiamides; boron trifluoride complex compounds,
carboxylic acid anhydrides such as phthalic anhydride, 
hexahydrophthalic anhydride, tetrahydrophthalic anhydride,
dodecinylsuccinic anhydride, pyromellitic anhydride,
chlorenic anhydride, etc.; alcohols; phenols; carboxylic
acids; aluminum or zirconium diketone complex compounds, and
so forth. These curing agents may also be used each
independently or in a combination of two or more species.
  [0078]  When a curing agent for epoxy resin is used, its amount
of use is 0.1 to 300 weight parts based on 100 weight parts of
the epoxy resin.
  [0079]  A ketimine can be used as the curing agent for epoxy resin.
The ketimine remains stable in the absence of moisture but
decomposes into a primary amine and a ketone by the presence
of moisture and the primary amine thus produced functions as
a room temperature-curable curing agent for epoxy resin. With
a ketimine, a one-package type composition can be provided. The
ketimine can be obtained by the condensation reaction between
an amine compound and a carbonyl compound.
  [0080]  For synthesizing ketimines, the known amine compounds and
carbonyl compounds can be used. Thus, for example, the amine
compound which can be used includes diamines such as
ethylenediamine, propylenediamine, trimethylenediamine,
tetramethylenediamine, 1,3-diaminobutane, 2,3-diaminobutane,
pentamethylenediamine, 2,4-diaminopentane,
hexamethylenediamine, p-phenylenediamine,
p,p'-biphenylenediamine, etc.; polyamines such as
1,2,3-triaminopropane, triaminobenzene,
tris(2-aminoethyl)amine, tetra(aminomethyl)methane, etc.;
polyalkylenepolyamines such as diethylenetriamine,
triethylenetriamine, tetraethylenepentamine, etc.;
polyoxyalkylene polyamines; and aminosilanes such as
γ-aminopropyltriethoxysilane,
N-(β-aminoethyl)-γ-aminopropyltrimethoxysilane,
N-(β-aminoethyl)-γ-aminopropylmethyldimethoxysilane, etc.;
among others. The carbonyl compound which can be used includes
aldehydes such as acetaldehyde, propionaldehyde, 
n-butyraldehyde, isobutyraldehyde, diethylacetaldehyde,
glyoxal, benzaldehyde, etc.; cyclic ketones such as
cyclopentanone, trimethylcyclopentanone, cyclohexanone,
trimethylcyclohexanone, etc.; aliphatic ketones such as
acetone, methyl ethyl ketone, methyl propyl ketone, methyl
isopropyl ketone, methyl isobutyl ketone, diethyl ketone,
dipropyl ketone, diisopropyl ketone, dibutyl ketone,
diisobutyl ketone, etc.; and β-dicarbonyl compounds such as
acetylacetone, methyl acetoacetate, ethyl acetoacetate,
dimethyl malonate, diethyl malonate, methyl ethyl malonate,
dibenzoylmethane, and so forth.
  [0081]  In the case where an imino group is present in a ketimine,
the imino group may be reacted with styrene oxide, a glycidyl
ether such as butyl glycidyl ether, allyl glycidyl ether or the
like, or a glycidyl ester. The ketimines mentioned above may
be used each independently or in a combination of two or more
species. The amount of use of the ketimine is 1 to 100 weight
parts relative to 100 weight parts of the epoxy resin and varies
with different species of epoxy resin and ketimine.
  [0082]  Where necessary, the curable composition of the invention
may be supplemented with various additives for modulating
various physical properties of the curable composition or those
of the cured product. Among such additives are fire retardants,
curability modulators, modulus control agents such as compounds
having one silanol group within the molecule, antioxidants,
radical inhibitors, ultraviolet absorbers, metal inactivators,
ozone aging inhibitors, light stabilizers, phosphorus type
peroxide decomposers, lubricants, pigments, foaming agents,
solvents, photocurable resins such as polyfunctional acrylic
resins, oxygen-curable compounds, e.g. drying oils such as tung
oil, linseed oil, etc., and antifungal agents, among others.
Any of these additives may be used each independently or in a
combination of two or more species. Specific examples of such
additives are described in, inter alia, Japanese Kokoku
Publication Hei-04-69659, Japanese Kokoku Publication 
Hei-07-108928, Japanese Kokai Publication Sho-63-254149,
Japanese Kokai Publication Sho-64-22904, and Japanese Kokai
Publication 2001-72854.
  [0083]  The curable composition of the invention can be prepared
in the form of a one-package system such that all the components
are sealed into a single package and, after application, allowed
to cure in situ in the presence of moisture in the air or in
the form of a two-package system such that the curing catalyst,
filler, plasticizer, water, etc. are formulated together in
advance as a curing component and this formulated material is
admixed with the polymer composition just before application.
  [0084]  In case the curable composition is prepared as a
one-package system, where all the components are formulated in
advance, it is recommendable to dehydrate/dry the
moisture-containing components before formulating or
dehydrate them by, for example, pressure reduction during the
blending operation. In case the curable composition is
prepared as a two-package system, it is not necessary to
formulate a curing catalyst into the main package containing
the polymers having a reactive silicon containing group so that
it is not likely that the presence of a minor amount of moisture
in the formulated components will cause gelation but if a
long-term shelf-life is desired, a dehydration/drying
procedure is preferably carried out. The preferred procedure
of dehydration/drying is drying by heating in the case of solids
such as powders or vacuum drying or dehydration over synthetic
zeolite, active alumina, silica gel or the like in the case of
liquids. An alternative dehydration method comprises
formulating a small amount of an isocyanate compound so as to
let the isocyanato group react with water. In addition to such
dehydration/drying procedures, the addition of a lower alcohol,
such as methanol or ethanol, or an alkoxysilane compound, such
as n-propyltrimethoxysilane, vinyltrimethoxysilane,
vinylmethyldimethoxysilane,
γ-mercaptopropylmethyldimethoxysilane, 
γ-mercaptopropylmethyldiethoxysilane,
γ-glycidoxypropyltrimethoxysilane or the like, results in a
further increase in shelf-life.
  [0085]  In using the curable composition of the invention, such
additives as a lubricant, a pigment, a foaming agent, etc. may
be further added each in a suitable amount, where necessary.
  [0086]  The curable composition of the invention is particularly
useful as an elastic sealant which finds application in the
field of buildings, ships, road vehicles, roads and the like.
It is especially of use as a sealant for joints of siding boards
of which weather resistance and workability are required.
Furthermore, with or without the aid of a primer, the
composition is capable of adhering intimately to a broad variety
of adherends inclusive of glass, ceramics, wood, metals and
shaped resin articles so that it can be used in various forms
of sealing compositions and adhesive compositions as well. As
to adhesives, it can be provided not only as an ordinary adhesive
but also as a contact adhesive. The composition is further
useful as a food packaging material, a casting rubber material,
a template material or a coating material.
  [0087]  Particularly a curable composition comprising a alkyl
acrylate and/or alkyl methacrylate polymer having a reactive
silicon containing group in the form of a random copolymer, a
polyoxypropylene polymer having a substantially
straight-chain molecular chain and a reactive silicon
containing group, whose number average molecular weight is
16,000 to 25,000, and a plasticizer which is an alkyl acrylate
polymer having a molecular weight lower than said alkyl acrylate
and/or alkyl methacrylate polymer having a reactive silicon
containing group is quite suitable for use as a sealing material
for ceramic siding boards. Thus, the cured product from this
composition exhibits an excellent weather resistance as a
sealing material for ceramic siding boards and, compared with
the cured composition using the conventional plasticizer, has
a large elongation at break. In addition, despite the fact that 
this curable composition comprises a random-copolymerized
(meth)acrylate polymer having a high viscosity as the vinyl
polymer having a reactive silicon containing group and that it
comprises a high viscosity straight-chain polyoxypropylene
polymer having a high molecular weight of not less than 16, 000
as the polyoxyalkylene polymer having a reactive silicon
containing group, the composition has a viscosity within the
range suitable for sealing material use and has a curing speed
not much different from the speed of the composition containing
a polyoxypropylene polymer of low molecular weight. The lower
limit to the number average molecular weight of said
polyoxypropylene polymer having a reactive silicon containing
group in this composition is preferably 17, 000, more preferably
18,000, particularly preferably 19,000 and the upper limit is
preferably 23,000, particularly preferably 22,000. The most
preferred range is 19,000 to 22,000 but combinations of other
lower and upper limits are also preferred.
  [0088]  In the above composition, said alkyl acrylate polymer of
low molecular weight for use as the plasticizer is preferably
the polymer synthesized by the so-called SGO process obtained
by high-temperature, high-pressure continuous bulk
polymerization of acrylate monomers.
 BEST MODE FOR CARRYING OUT THE INVENTION
 [0089]  The following examples illustrate the present invention
in further detail without defining the scope of the invention.
 
Example of Synthesis - 1

 [0090]  To a solution of the following monomer mixture in toluene
heated to 105°C was added a solution of the polymerization
initiator 2,2'-azobis(2-methylbutyronitrile) dropwise over 5
hours. Thereafter, a "post polymerization" was carried out for
1 hour to give a vinyl copolymer.
  [0091]  Methyl methacrylate 14.5 wt. parts, butyl acrylate 68.5
wt. parts, stearyl methacrylate 15 wt. parts, 
γ-methacryloxypropylmethyldimethoxysilane 2 wt. parts,
2,2'-azobis(2-methylbutyronitrile) 0.5 wt. part.
 
Example of Synthesis - 2

 [0092]  A pressure-resisting glass reactor equipped with a
stirrer was charged with 500 g of an allyl-terminated
straight-chain poly(propylene oxide) having a number average
molecular weight of 9,400 and 10 g of hexane and azeotropic
dehydration was carried out at 90°C. The hexane was then
distilled off under reduced pressure, and after nitrogen
purging, 40 µl of vinyl-platinum catalyst (5 wt. % as platinum
in isopropyl alcohol) was added and, under stirring, 9.8 g of
DMS (dimethoxymethylsilane) was gently added dropwise. This
mixture was reacted at 90°C for 2 hours, after which the
unreacted DMS was distilled off under reduced pressure to
recover a silylated polymer. This polymer was blended with the
copolymer prepared in Example of Synthesis - 1 in a solids weight
ratio of 70/30 and the solvent was then distilled off to give
a solvent-free polymer (A).
 
Example of Synthesis - 3

 [0093]  A pressure-resisting glass reactor equipped with a
stirrer was charged with 500 g of an allyl-terminated
branched-chain poly(propylene oxide) having a number average
molecular weight of 17, 000 and comprising a main chain skeleton
obtained by using a double metal cyanide complex catalyst and
10 g of hexane and azeotropic dehydration was carried out at
90°C. The hexane was then distilled off under reduced pressure,
and after nitrogen purging, 40 µl of a chloroplatinic acid
catalyst (5 wt. % as platinum in isopropyl alcohol) was added
and, under stirring, 5.8 g of DMS (dimethoxymethylsilane) was
gently added dropwise. This mixture was reacted at 90°C for
2 hours, after which the unreacted DMS was distilled off under
reduced pressure to recover a silylated polymer. This polymer
was blended with the copolymer prepared in Example of Synthesis 
- 1 in a solids weight ratio of 70/30 and the solvent was then
distilled off to give a solvent-free polymer (B).
 
Example of Synthesis - 4

 [0094]  A pressure-resisting glass reactor equipped with a
stirrer was charged with 500 g of an allyl-terminated
straight-chain poly(propylene oxide) having a number average
molecular weight of 20, 000 and comprising a main chain skeleton
obtained by using a double metal cyanide complex catalyst and
10 g of hexane and azeotropic dehydration was carried out at
90°C. The hexane was then distilled off under reduced pressure,
and after nitrogen purging, 20 µl of a chloroplatinic acid
catalyst (5 wt. % as platinum in isopropyl alcohol) was added
and, under stirring, 4.6 g of DMS (dimethoxymethylsilane) was
gently added dropwise. This mixture was reacted at 90°C for
2 hours, after which the unreacted DMS was distilled off under
reduced pressure to recover a silylated polymer. This polymer
was blended with the copolymer prepared in Example of Synthesis
- 1 in a solids weight ratio of 70/30 and the solvent was then
distilled off to give a solvent-free polymer (C).
  [0095]  The viscosity of the polymer corresponding to the
blending ratio of 75/25 was 49.8 Pa·s; that of the polymer
corresponding to the blending ratio of 70/30 was 60. 7 Pa·s, and
that of the polymer corresponding to the blending ratio of 65/35
was 86.2 Pa·s (all as measured with a type BM viscometer using
a No. 4 rotor, 23°C).
 
Example of Synthesis -5

 [0096]  A pressure-resisting glass reactor equipped with a
stirrer was charged with 500 g of an allyl-terminated
straight-chain poly(propylene oxide) having a number average
molecular weight of 8,000 and 10 g of hexane and azeotropic
dehydration was carried out at 90°C. The hexane was then
distilled off under reduced pressure, and after nitrogen
purging, 40 µl of vinyl-platinum catalyst (5 wt. % as platinum 
in isopropyl alcohol) was added and, under stirring, 7.6 g of
DMS (dimethoxymethylsilane) was gently added dropwise. This
mixture was reacted at 90°C for 2 hours, after which the
unreacted DMS was distilled off under reduced pressure to
recover a silylated polymer (D).
 
Example of Synthesis-6

<Synthesis of an acrylic plasticizer>
 [0097]  A 2 L-separable flask equipped with reflux condenser and
stirrer was charged with CuBr (22.4 g, 0.156 mol), followed by
nitrogen purging. Acetonitrile (112 mL) was then added and the
mixture was stirred on an oil bath at 70°C for 30 minutes. Then,
butyl acrylate (0.20 kg), methyl 2-bromopropionate (86.9 g,
0.520 mol), and pentamethyldiethylenetriamine (0.19 mL, 0.18
g, 1.04 mmol) (hereinafter abbreviated as triamine) were added
and the reaction was started. Under stirring and heating at
70°C, butyl acrylate (0.80 kg) was continuously added dropwise
over 150 minutes. Triamine (1.81 mL, 1.71 g, 9.88 mmol) was
further added during the dropwise addition of butyl acrylate.
Then, the mixture was stirred under heating at 70°C for 230
minutes. This reaction mixture was diluted with toluene and
passed through an activated alumina column and the volatile
fraction was distilled off under reduced pressure to give a
polymer (PBA). This polymer had a number average molecular
weight of 2,600 and a molecular weight distribution of 1.18.
 
Example 1

<Main component>
 [0098]  To 100 weight parts of the polymer (A) prepared in Example
of Synthesis - 2, 96 wt. parts of the acrylic plasticizer
prepared in Example of Synthesis - 6, 160 wt. parts of calcium
carbonate colloid (product of Maruo Calcium Co.: trade name;
Calfine 200M) , 50 wt. parts of heavy calcium carbonate (product
of Maruo Calcium Co.: trade name; Super S), 3 wt. parts of
antisagging agent (product of Kusumoto Chemicals, Ltd.: trade 
name; Disparlon 305), 3 wt. parts of surface modifier (product
of Toagosei Co., Ltd.: trade name; Aronix M309), 1 wt. part of
hindered amine type light stabilizer (product of Sankyo Co.,
Ltd.: trade name; Sanol LS770), benzotriazole series UV
absorber (product of Ciba Specialty Chemicals Ltd. : trade name;
Tinuvin 327) were added and the whole mixture was kneaded and
passed through a 3-roll mill to give 414 wt. parts of a main
component.
 <Curing component>
 [0099]  First, 21 wt. parts of heavy calcium carbonate (product
of Maruo Calcium Co. : trade name; Super S) , 2 wt. parts of kaolin
(product of Tsuchiya Kaolin Co.: trade name; ASP170), and 16
wt. parts of a poly(propylene glycol) with a number average
molecular weight of 3,000 (product of Takeda Chemical
Industries, Ltd.: trade name; Actcall P-23) were blended and
dried in advance. Then, 0.18 wt. part of vinyltrimethoxysilane,
1 wt. part of an aminosilane compound (product of Nippon Unicar
Co., Ltd.: trade name; A-1120), 3 wt. parts of stannous
octanoate, 0.75 wt. part of laurylamine, and 1 wt. part of
tetravalent tin (product of Sankyo Organic Chemicals. Co. : trade
name; No. 918) were blended and sufficiently kneaded, passed
through a small 3-roll paint mill 3 times, and dehydrated under
reduced pressure at 50°C for about 5 minutes to give 44.93 wt.
parts of a curing component. This curing component was
hermetically packaged in a moisture-proof container.
  [0100]  The above main component and curing component were
kneaded together and processed to give a 250 µm-thick cured
sheet sample.
 
Example 2

 [0101]  Using 100 wt. parts of the polymer (B) prepared in Example
of Synthesis - 3 instead of the polymer (A) formulated in the
main component, the procedure of Example 1 was otherwise
repeated to give a main component. This main component and the
curing component described in Example 1 were kneaded together 
to prepare a 250 µm-thick cured sheet sample.
 
Example 3

 [0102]  Using 100 wt. parts of the polymer (C) prepared in Example
of Synthesis - 4 instead of the polymer (A) formulated in the
main component, the procedure of Example 1 was otherwise
repeated to give a main component. This main component and the
curing component described in Example 1 were kneaded together
to prepare a 250 µm-thick cured sheet sample.
 
Example 4

 [0103]  The polymer (C) 100 wt. parts prepared in Example of
Synthesis - 4, 55 wt. parts of the plasticizer having an acrylic
component (Toagosei Co., Ltd.: UP-1020: a low molecular weight
acrylic polymer with a viscosity 400 mPa·s/25°C, a weight
average molecular weight of 1,500, and a glass transition
temperature -66°C/DSC), 120 wt. parts of calcium carbonate
colloid (product of Shiraishi Kogyo: trade name; CCR), 20 wt.
parts of titanium dioxide (product of Ishihara Sangyo: trade
name; R820), 2 wt. parts of an antisagging agent (product of
Kusumoto Chemicals, Ltd.: trade name; Disparlon 6500), 1 wt.
part of a benzotriazole series UV absorber (product of Ciba
Specialty Chemicals Ltd.: trade name; Tinuvin 327), 1 wt. part
of a hindered amine type light stabilizer (product of Sankyo
Co., Ltd.: Sanol LS770), and 0.45 wt. part of carbon black
(product of Asahi Carbon Co., Ltd.: trade name; #55) were
weighed, blended, sufficiently kneaded, and passed through a
compact 3-roll mill for a total of 3 times. Thereafter, 2 wt.
parts of vinyltrimethoxysilane, 3 wt. parts of an aminosilane
compound (product of Nippon Unicar Co., Ltd.: trade name;
A-1120), and 2 wt. parts of tetravalent tin (product of Nitto
Kasei Co., Ltd.: trade name; U-220) were added and the whole
was thoroughly blended to prepare a curable composition. Using
this composition, a 250 µm-thick cured sheet sample was
prepared. 
 
Comparative Example 1

 [0104]  Using 96 wt. parts of diisodecyl phthalate (hereinafter
abbreviated as DIDP; product of Kyowa Hakko Kogyo Co., Ltd.:
trade name; DIDP) instead of the acrylic plasticizer formulated
in the main component, the procedure of Example 1 was otherwise
repeated to give a main component. This main component and the
curing component described in Example 1 were kneaded together
to prepare a 250 µm-thick cured sheet sample.
 
Comparative Example 2

 [0105]  Using 96 wt. parts of polypropylene glycol with a number
average molecular weight of 3,000 (hereinafter abbreviated as
PPG 3000; product of Takeda Chemical Industries, Ltd.: trade
name; Actcall P-23) instead of the acrylic plasticizer
formulated in the main component, the procedure of Example 1
was otherwise repeated to give a main component. This main
component and the curing component described in Example 1 were
kneaded together to prepare a 250 µm-thick cured sheet sample.
 
Comparative Example 3

 [0106]  Using 96 wt. parts of diisodecyl phthalate (product of
Kyowa Hakko Kogyo Co., Ltd.: trade name; DIDP) instead of the
acrylic plasticizer formulated in the main component, the
procedure of Example 2 was otherwise repeated to give a main
component. This main component and the curing component
described in Example 1 were kneaded together to prepare a 250
µm-thick cured sheet sample.
 
Comparative Example 4

 [0107]  Using 96 wt. parts of polypropylene glycol with a number
average molecular weight of 3,000 (product of Takeda Chemical
Industries, Ltd.: trade name; Actcall P-23) instead of the
acrylic plasticizer formulated in the main component, the
procedure of Example 2 was otherwise repeated to give a main 
component. This main component and the curing component
described in Example 1 were kneaded together to prepare a 250
µm-thick cured sheet sample.
 
Comparative Example 5

 [0108]  Using 96 wt. parts of diisodecyl phthalate (product of
Kyowa Hakko Kogyo Co., Ltd.: trade name; DIDP) instead of the
acrylic plasticizer formulated in the main component, the
procedure of Example 3 was otherwise repeated to give a main
component. This main component and the curing component
described in Example 1 were kneaded together to prepare a 250
µm-thick cured sheet sample.
 
Comparative Example 6

 [0109]  Using 96 wt. parts of polypropylene glycol with a number
average molecular weight of 3,000 (product of Takeda Chemical
Industries, Ltd.: trade name; Actcall P-23) instead of the
acrylic plasticizer formulated in the main component, the
procedure of Example 3 was otherwise repeated to give a main
component. This main component and the curing component
described in Example 1 were kneaded together to prepare a 250
µm-thick cured sheet sample.
 
Comparative Example 7

 [0110]  Using 100 wt. parts of polymer (D) instead of the polymer
(A) formulated in the main component, the procedure of Example
1 was otherwise repeated to give a main component. This main
component and the curing component described in Example 1 were
kneaded together to prepare a 250 µm-thick cured sheet sample.
 
Comparative Example 8

 [0111]  Using 96 wt. parts of diisodecyl phthalate (product of
Kyowa Hakko Kogyo Co., Ltd.: trade name; DIDP) instead of the
acrylic plasticizer formulated in the main component, the
procedure of Comparative Example 7 was otherwise repeated to 
give a main component. This main component and the curing
component described in Example 1 were kneaded together to
prepare a 250 µm-thick cured sheet sample.
 
Comparative Example 9

 [0112]  Using 96 wt. parts of polypropylene glycol with a number
average molecular weight of 3,000 (product of Takeda Chemical
Industries, Ltd.: trade name; Actcall P-23) instead of the
acrylic plasticizer formulated in the main component, the
procedure of Comparative Example 7 was otherwise repeated to
give a main component. This main component and the curing
component described in Example 1 were kneaded together to
prepare a 250 µm-thick cured sheet sample.
  [0113]  Using the weather resistance test samples prepared in
Examples 1 to 4 and Comparative Examples 1 to 9, an accelerated
weathering test using a sunshine weatherometer was preformed
to monitor the time course of aging of each sample. The results
are presented in Table 1. 
     Sample Polymer Plasticizer 0hr 60hr 180hr 280hr 340hr 400hr 460hr 520hr 580hr   Example 1 A PBA ○ ○ ○ ○ ○ ○ ○ ○ ○   Example 2 B PBA ○ ○ ○ ○ ○ ○ ○ ○ ○   Example 3 C PBA ○ ○ ○ ○ ○ ○ ○ ○ ○   Example 4 C UP-1020 ○ ○ ○ ○ ○ ○ ○ ○ ○   Compar. Exam.1 A DIDP ○ ○ ○ ○ ○ Δ Δ Δ Δ   Compar. Exam.2 A PPG3000 ○ ○ ○ ○ ○ Δ Δ × ×   Compar. Exam.3 B DIDP ○ ○ ○ ○ Δ × × × ×   Compar. Exam.4 B PPG3000 ○ ○ ○ ○ ○ ○ ○ ○ ○   Compar. Exam.5 C DIDP ○ ○ ○ ○ ○ Δ Δ Δ ×   Compar. Exam.6 C PPG3000 ○ ○ ○ ○ ○ Δ × × ×   Compar. Exam.7 D PBA ○ ○ ○ Δ × × × × ×   Compar. Exam.8 D DIDP ○ ○ ○ × × × × × ×   Compar. Exam.9 D PPG3000 ○ ○ Δ × × × × × ×   ○: No change, Δ:Aging (cracks) occurs but is not so severe, ×:Severe aging     
     Sample Polymer Plasticizer 640hr 700hr 760hr 1000hr 1300hr 1540hr 1600hr 1660hr 1720hr 2000hr   Example 1 A PBA ○ ○ ○ ○ ○ ○ Δ Δ Δ Δ   Example 2 B PBA ○ ○ ○ ○ ○ ○ ○ ○ Δ Δ   Example 3 C PBA ○ ○ ○ ○ ○ ○ ○ Δ Δ Δ   Example 4 C UP-1020 ○ ○ ○ ○ ○ ○ ○ ○ ○ ○   Compar. Exam.1 A DIDP Δ Δ Δ × × × × × × ×   Compar. Exam.2 A PPG3000 × × × × × × × × × ×   Compar. Exam.3 B DIDP × × × × × × × × × ×   Compar. Exam.4 B PPG3000 Δ Δ × × × × × × × ×   Compar. Exam.5 C DIDP × × × × × × × × × ×   Compar. Exam.6 C PPG3000 × × × × × × × × × ×   Compar. Exam.7 D PBA × × × × × × × × × ×   Compar. Exam.8 D DIDP × × × × × × × × × ×   Compar. Exam.9 D PPG3000 × × × × × × × × × ×   ○: No change, Δ: Aging (cracks) occurs but is not so severe, ×: Severe aging      
  [0114]  It will be apparent from Table 1 that the cured products
according to Examples 1 to 4 are by far superior to the cured
products according to Comparative Examples 1 to 9 in weather
resistance.
 
Examples 5 to 9

 [0115]  Except that, as the plasticizer to be formulated in the
main component, the acrylic plasticizer PBA obtained in Example
of Synthesis - 6 and DIDP were used in a combined total of 96 
wt. parts and in a PBA/DIDP weight ratio of 80/20, 70/30, 50/50,
30/70, or 10/90, the procedure of Example 1 was repeated to give
a series of main components. Each of these main components and
the curing component described in Example 1 were kneaded
together to prepare a 250 µm-thick cured sheet sample. Using
these weather resistance test samples according to Examples 5
to 9, an accelerated weathering test using a sunshine
weatherometer to monitor the time course of aging was performed
of each sample. The results are presented, alongside the
results of Example 1 and Comparative Example 1, in Table 2. 
     
  [0116]  It will be apparent from Table 2 that increasing the
proportion of the acrylic plasticizer to 70 weight % or more
of the total plasticizer results in marked improvements in
weather resistance.
 
Example 10

 [0117]  A plasticizer having an acrylic component (product of
Toagosei Co., Ltd.: trade name; UP-1020), 120 wt. parts of
calcium carbonate (product of Shiraishi Kogyo: trade name; CCR) ,
20 wt. parts of titanium dioxide (product of Ishihara Sangyo:
trade name; R-820), 2 wt. parts of a thixotropic agent (product
of Kusumoto Chemicals Ltd.: trade name; D-6500), 1 wt. part of
a benzotriazole series UV absorber (product of Ciba Specialty
Chemicals Ltd.: trade name; Tinuvin 327), and 1 wt. part of a
hindered amine series light stabilizer (product of Sankyo Co.,
Ltd.: trade name; Sanol LS770) were weighed and blended with
the polymer 100 wt. parts prepared in Example of Synthesis-4
and the whole mixture was thoroughly kneaded and passed
through a compact 3-roll paint mill for a total of 3 times.
Thereafter, 2 wt. parts of vinyltrimethoxysilane, 3 wt. parts
of an aminosilane compound (product of Nippon Unicar Co., Ltd.:
trade name; A-1120), and 2 wt. parts of a cure accelerator
(product of Nitto Kasei Co., Ltd. : trade name; U-220) were added
and kneaded to prepare a 3 mm-thick cured sheet sample defined
by JIS A5758 which was further processed into a dumbbell
testpiece for tensile testing (JIS A type).
 
Example 11

 [0118]  Except that a straight-chain poly(propylene oxide)
having a number average molecular weight of 10,000 and
comprising a main chain skeleton obtained by using a double
metal cyanide complex catalyst as the polyoxyalkylene polymer
having a reactive silicon containing group (b) instead of the
polymer prepared in Example of Synthesis - 4, the procedure of
Example 10 was otherwise repeated to give a polymer (E) and a 
curable composition. Then, a dumbbell testpiece for tensile
testing (JIS A type) was prepared. The molecular weight of the
allyl-terminated poly (propylene oxide) used as the constituent
material of the above component (b) was approximately equal to
the molecular weight of the reactive silicon containing
group-terminated poly(propylene oxide).
  [0119]  Using the dumbbell testpieces for tensile testing as
prepared in Example 10 and Example 11, respectively, a tensile
test was performed using an autograph (product of Shimadzu
Corporation, model AG500C) to measure the elongation at break
(Eb). The surface hardening time and residual tack of each
formulation were also determined. The results are shown in
Table 3.
       Example 10 Example 11   Number average molecular weight 20,000 10,000   Surface hardening time min. 48 42   Residual tack After 3 days ○∼o ○ ○∼o ○   After 7 days ○∼o ○ ○∼o ○   Dumbbell tensile test Eb % 710 350   Residual tack criteria:
o ○: Substantially no tack ○: Slight tack      
  [0120]  It will be apparent from Table 3 that a gain in number
average molecular weight is accompanied by an improvement in
elongation at break, while the curability remains almost
unchanged.
 
Comparative Example 10

 [0121]  Using DIDP (diisodecyl phthalate) instead of the
plasticizer having an acrylic component UP-1020, the procedure
of Example 10 was otherwise repeated to give a dumbbell 
testpiece for tensile testing (JIS A type).
 
Comparative Example 11

 [0122]  Using PPG with a number average molecular weight of 3, 000
instead of the plasticizer having an acrylic component UP-1020,
the procedure of Example 10 was otherwise repeated to give a
dumbbell testpiece for tensile testing (JIS A type).
  [0123]  Using the dumbbell testpieces for tensile testing as
prepared in Example 10 and Comparative Examples 10 and 11, a
tensile test was performed using an autograph (product of
Shimadzu Corporation, model AG500C) to measure the elongation
at break. The results are shown in Table 4.
     Sample Polymer Plasticizer M100(MPa) Tb(MPa) Eb(%)   Example 10 C UP-1020 0.32 1.91 710   Compar. Exam.10 C DIDP 0.32 1.77 640   Compar. Exam.11 C PPG 0.32 1.74 690      
  [0124]  It will be apparent from Table 4 that the cured product
obtained from the composition of the invention has an improved
elongation at break as compared with the cured products obtained
from the like compositions containing the conventional
plasticizers.
  [0125]  As an SGO polymer which is a kind of plasticizer having
an acrylic component, Johnson Polymer Corporation's JDX-P1000
is known. JDX-P1000 is a low molecular acrylic polymer with
a viscosity of 1,000 mPa·s/25°C, a weight average molecular
weight of 3,000, and a glass transition temperature of
-60°C/DSC. In Examples 1 to 11, JDX-P1000 can be used instead
of the plasticizer PBA or UP-1020.
  [0126]  Further, an SGO polymer having about one reactive silicon
containing group per molecule can be synthesized by reacting
J.P.C's JDX-H2030, which is an SGO polymer having a hydroxyl
group (viscosity 3,000 mPa·s/25°C, weight average molecular 
weight 2,000, glass transition temperature -63°C/DSC, and
hydroxyl value 120 mg-KOH/g), with
γ-isocyanatopropyldimethoxymethylsilane
(OCNCH2CH2CH2Si(CH3) (OCH3)2). In Examples 1 to 11, this SGO
polymer having a reactive silicon containing group can be used
as a plasticizer substituting for part or the whole of the
plasticizer PBA or UP-1020.
  [0127]  To the main components of the compositions according to
Examples 1 to 3 and 5 to 9, stearylamine, which is a primary
amine having a melting point of not lower than 35°C (Farmin 80,
product of Kao Corporation), can be added in a proportion of
3 wt. parts per 100 wt. parts of the solvent-free polymer (A),
(B), or (C) and ceramic balloons (E-SPHERES SL350, mean particle
dia. 250 µm, product of Taiheiyo Cement) can also be added in
a proportion of 20 vol % of the whole main component. In this
case, the surface of the cured product is provided with a pebbled
texture without brilliance. When polyacrylonitrile balloons
surface-treated with calcium carbonate (trade name MFL-80CA,
mean particle dia. 100 µm, specific gravity 0.13; product of
Matsumoto Yushi-Seiyaku Co. , Ltd.) are used instead of ceramic
balloons, the cured product presents with a coarse surface
texture without brilliance.
  [0128]  In the compositions according to Examples 4 and 10 to 11,
ceramic balloons (E-SPHERES SL350, mean particle dia. 250 µm,
product of Taiheiyo Cement) and polyacrylonitrile balloons
surface-treated with calcium carbonate (trade name MFL-80CA,
mean particle dia. 100 µm, specific gravity 0.13; product of
Matsumoto Yushi-Seiyaku Co., Ltd.) may be added in a proportion
of 20 vol. % of the whole composition. The resulting cured
product presents with a pebbled or coarse texture.
  [0129]  In the compositions according to Examples 4 and 10 to 11,
14-mesh (ca. 1.8 mm and less) round flakes of synthetic resin
(about 0.3 mm thick) can be formulated as the scaly material
in a proportion of about 20 wt. parts based on 100 wt. parts
of the whole composition. By rubbing the joint filled with the 
resulting sealing material in several strokes in the same
direction, a product presenting with a relief pattern of the
scaly materials can be obtained.
  [0130]  In the above Examples and Comparative Examples, the
polymer prepared in Example of Synthesis - 1 can be replaced
with the butyl acrylate polymer described in Production Example
1 in Japanese Kokai Publication 2000-178456, namely a polymer
having a GPC number average molecular weight (polystyrene
equivalent) of 15,000 and a molecular weight distribution
(Mw/Mn) of 1.4 and containing 2.0 silyl groups per molecule on
average, can be used. Thus, in Examples of Synthesis 2 to 4,
the polymer according to Production Example 1 in Japanese Kokai
Publication 2000-178456 is used instead of the copolymer
obtained in Example of Synthesis - 1 and the polymers obtained
in the same manner as Examples of Synthesis - 2 to 4 are
designated as polymer (A2), polymer (B2), and polymer (C2),
respectively. Furthermore, referring to Example 11, the
polymer obtained by using the polymer according to Production
Example 1 in Japanese Kokai Publication 2000-178456 instead of
the polymer according to Example of Synthesis - 1 as the vinyl
polymer component having a reactive silicon containing group
(a) of polymer (E) is now designated as polymer (E2). In
Examples 1 to 11 and Comparative Examples 1 to 11, the polymer
(A), polymer (B), polymer (C) and polymer (E) may be replaced
with the polymer (A2), polymer (B2), polymer (C2) and polymer
(E2). Furthermore, in Examples 1 to 3 and 5 to 9, the polymer
(A), polymer (B), and polymer (C) may be replaced with the
polymer (A2), polymer (B2) and polymer (C2), respectively, in
the preparation of main components of the composition and, to
these main components, a stearylamine (Farmin 80, product of
Kao Corporation), which is a primary amine having a melting
point not lower than 35°C, may be added in a proportion of 3
weight parts per 100 weight parts of said polymer (A2), (B2)
or (C2) and, further, ceramic balloons (E-SPHERES SL350, mean
particle diameter 250 µm; product of Taiheiyo Cement) may also 
be added in a proportion of 20 vol % based on the whole main
component. The resulting cured products invariably present
with a pebbled surface texture without brilliance. When
polyacrylonitrile balloons surface-treated with calcium
carbonate (trade name MFL-80CA, mean particle diameter 100 µm,
specific gravity 0.13; product of Matsumoto Yushi-Seiyaku Co.,
Ltd.) are used instead of ceramic balloons, the cured product
presents with a coarse surface texture without brilliance.
Furthermore, in Examples 1 to 11, the polymer (A), polymer (B),
polymer (C) and polymer (E) may be replaced with polymer (A2),
polymer (B2), polymer (C2) and polymer (E2), respectively, and
the plasticizer PBA or UP-1020 may be replaced with JDX-P1000.
 INDUSTRIAL APPLICABILITY
 [0131]  The cured product available from the curable composition
of the invention has a quite laudable weather resistance.
 
Patentzitate Zitiertes PatentEingetragen Veröffentlichungsdatum Antragsteller TitelEP0108946A2 *18. Okt. 198323. Mai 1984Kanegafuchi Kagaku Kogyo Kabushiki KaishaCuring compositionEP0265929A2 *28. Okt. 19874. Mai 1988Kanegafuchi Kagaku Kogyo Kabushiki KaishaCurable composition containing acrylic polymer and polyalkylene oxideJPH06172631A * Titel nicht verfügbarJPH07233316A * Titel nicht verfügbar* Vom Prüfer zitiertNichtpatentzitateReferenz1 *PATENT ABSTRACTS OF JAPAN vol. 0185, no. 11 (C-1253), 27 September 1994 (1994-09-27) & JP 6 172631 A (KANEGAFUCHI CHEM IND CO LTD), 21 June 1994 (1994-06-21)2 *PATENT ABSTRACTS OF JAPAN vol. 1996, no. 01, 31 January 1996 (1996-01-31) & JP 7 233316 A (ASAHI GLASS CO LTD), 5 September 1995 (1995-09-05)3 *See also references of WO02085985A1* Vom Prüfer zitiert Referenziert von Zitiert von PatentEingetragen Veröffentlichungsdatum Antragsteller TitelEP1990371A1 *9. Febr. 200712. Nov. 2008Kaneka CorporationCurable compositionEP1990371A4 *9. Febr. 200729. Juli 2009Kaneka CorpCurable compositionEP1992665A1 *9. Febr. 200719. Nov. 2008Kaneka CorporationCurable compositionEP1992665A4 *9. Febr. 200729. Juli 2009Kaneka CorpCurable compositionEP2698481A1 *13. Apr. 201219. Febr. 2014Kaneka CorporationCladding material for constructionEP2698481A4 *13. Apr. 201225. März 2015Kaneka CorpCladding material for constructionUS780774620. Jan. 20055. Okt. 2010Kaneka CorporationCurable compositionUS79604599. Febr. 200714. Juni 2011Kaneka CorporationCurable compositionUS907881513. Juli 201114. Juli 2015Dentsply International Inc.Self-cure activator* Vom Prüfer zitiertKlassifizierungen  Internationale KlassifikationC08G65/336, C09K3/10, C08L71/02 UnternehmensklassifikationC08L71/02, C08G65/336, C09K2200/0625, C09K3/1018 Europäische KlassifikationC08L71/02, C09K3/10D12, C08G65/336Juristische Ereignisse DatumCodeEreignisBeschreibung25. Febr. 200417PRequest for examination filedEffective date: 2003111225. Febr. 2004AKDesignated contracting states:Kind code of ref document: A1Designated state(s): AT BE CH CY DE DK ES FI FR GB GR IE IT LI LU MC NL PT SE TR2. Febr. 2005RIC1Classification (correction)Ipc: 7C 09K   3/10   BIpc: 7C 08L  71/02   AIpc: 7C 08G  65/336  B2. Febr. 2005A4Despatch of supplementary search reportEffective date: 2004122213. Apr. 200517QFirst examination reportEffective date: 2005022415. März 2006RBVDesignated contracting states (correction):Designated state(s): BE DE FR GB NL26. Juli 2006RAP1Transfer of rights of an ep published applicationOwner name: KANEKA CORPORATION30. Aug. 2006AKDesignated contracting states:Kind code of ref document: B1Designated state(s): BE DE FR GB NL30. Aug. 2006REGReference to a national codeRef country code: GBRef legal event code: FG4D12. Okt. 2006REFCorresponds to:Ref document number: 60214367Country of ref document: DEDate of ref document: 20061012Kind code of ref document: P19. Jan. 2007ETFr: translation filed8. Aug. 200726NNo opposition filedEffective date: 2007053130. Sept. 2008PGFPPostgrant: annual fees paid to national officeRef country code: BEPayment date: 20080616Year of fee payment: 731. Okt. 2008PGFPPostgrant: annual fees paid to national officeRef country code: NLPayment date: 20080415Year of fee payment: 731. Aug. 2009PGFPPostgrant: annual fees paid to national officeRef country code: FRPayment date: 20090417Year of fee payment: 831. Okt. 2009BEREBe: lapsedOwner name: *KANEKA CORP.Effective date: 2009043030. Nov. 2009PGFPPostgrant: annual fees paid to national officeRef country code: GBPayment date: 20090415Year of fee payment: 84. Jan. 2010NLV4Nl: lapsed or anulled due to non-payment of the annual feeEffective date: 2009110126. Febr. 2010PG25Lapsed in a contracting state announced via postgrant inform. from nat. office to epoRef country code: NLFree format text: LAPSE BECAUSE OF NON-PAYMENT OF DUE FEESEffective date: 2009110131. Mai 2010PG25Lapsed in a contracting state announced via postgrant inform. from nat. office to epoRef country code: BEFree format text: LAPSE BECAUSE OF NON-PAYMENT OF DUE FEESEffective date: 2009043029. Dez. 2010GBPCGb: european patent ceased through non-payment of renewal feeEffective date: 2010041921. Jan. 2011REGReference to a national codeRef country code: FRRef legal event code: STEffective date: 2010123031. März 2011PG25Lapsed in a contracting state announced via postgrant inform. from nat. office to epoRef country code: GBFree format text: LAPSE BECAUSE OF NON-PAYMENT OF DUE FEESEffective date: 2010041931. Juli 2012PG25Lapsed in a contracting state announced via postgrant inform. from nat. office to epoRef country code: FRFree format text: LAPSE BECAUSE OF NON-PAYMENT OF DUE FEESEffective date: 2010043031. Juli 2015PGFPPostgrant: annual fees paid to national officeRef country code: DEPayment date: 20150414Year of fee payment: 14DrehenOriginalbildGoogle-Startseite - Sitemap - USPTO-Bulk-Downloads - Datenschutzerklärung - Nutzungsbedingungen - Über Google Patentsuche - Feedback gebenDaten bereitgestellt von IFI CLAIMS Patent Services.  








CURABLE COMPOSITION AND CURED PRODUCT THEREOF - KANEKA CORPORATION































Login
                    
Sign up
                    









Search
                            





                                    Expert Search


                                    Quick Search








Patents/Apps
                                




                                    Non-Patent Literature
                                












SEARCH


                            RESEARCH



                            MPEP 2.0



                            TOOLS & RESOURCES
                        



                            ACCLAIM IP
                        


HELP






 

















Title:


                    CURABLE COMPOSITION AND CURED PRODUCT THEREOF                





                United States Patent Application 20160326344            

                Kind
                Code:
            

                A1            













Abstract:

            A curable composition includes (A) an organic polymer having a silicon-containing group, which can be crosslinked by forming a siloxane bond (100 parts by weight), (B) a diester compound obtained from polyethylene glycol and aliphatic monocarboxylic acid and/or alicyclic monocarboxylic acid (21-300 parts by weight), and (C) an amidine compound (0.01-20 parts by weight).         















Inventors:

                            Yano, Ayako (Hyogo, JP)                




Application Number:

            15/108542        



Publication Date:

            11/10/2016        



Filing Date:

            12/25/2014        



Export Citation:

 Click for automatic bibliography
                generation 




Assignee:

                            KANEKA CORPORATION (Osaka, JP)                




Primary Class:

524/308 




International Classes:

C08K5/11; C09K3/18; C09J183/04; C09K3/10; C08K5/31; C09D183/04 





View Patent Images:

Download PDF 20160326344                 
                  PDF help




Related US Applications:



20090035502Polymeric composition suitable for manufacturing pasteurizable containersFebruary, 2009Tammaji et al.20100041291TEXTILE TWO OR THREE DIMENSIONAL FABRIC CONTAINING MATERIALS THAT ARE CAPABLE OF SWELLINGFebruary, 2010Weber et al.20030087994Flax-filled compositeMay, 2003Frechette20070299179Moulded thermoplastic resin articles with travertine-like appearanceDecember, 2007Tham20010001793Thermally stable hexabromocyclododecane fire retardantsMay, 2001Scheinert et al.20090306260Organized Layered Silicate And Method For Producing Same, Resin CompositionDecember, 2009Kuwabara20060241218Asphalt composition containing styrene-butadiene-styrene block copolymer having asymmetric polystyrene blockOctober, 2006Kim et al.20080039582POLYTRIMETHYLENE ETHER-BASED POLYURETHANE IONOMERSFebruary, 2008Sunkara et al.20040180993Low molecular weight carboxyalkylcellulose esters and their use as low viscosity binders and modifiers in coating compositionsSeptember, 2004Shelton et al.20090306258LOW SMOKE POLYCARBONATE COMPOSITION, METHOD OF MANUFACTURE AND PRODUCT MADE THEREFROMDecember, 2009Siripurapu et al.20090075078MODIFIED POLYOLEFIN RESIN FOR GLASS FIBER TREATMENT, SURPACE-TREATED GLASS FIBER, AND FIBER-REINFORCED POLYOLEFIN RESINMarch, 2009Yano et al. 









Foreign References:



EP21036482009-09-23 










Claims:

            1.  A curable composition comprising: (A) 100 parts by weight of an organic polymer having a silicon-containing group, which can be crosslinked by forming a siloxane bond, (B) 21-300 parts by weight of a diester compound obtained from polyethylene glycol and aliphatic monocarboxylic acid and/or alicyclic monocarboxylic acid, and (C) 0.01-20 parts by weight of an amidine compound.                    
                    2.  The curable composition according to claim 1, wherein the organic polymer of component (A) is at least one selected from the group consisting of a polyoxyalkylene-based polymer, a saturated hydrocarbon-based polymer and a (meth)acrylate-based polymer.                    
                    3.  The curable composition according to claim 2, wherein the polyoxyalkylene-based polymer is a polyoxypropylene-based polymer.                    
                    4.  The curable composition according to claim 1, wherein the organic polymer of component (A) has a urethane bond and/or a urea bond in the main chain thereof.                    
                    5.  The curable composition according to claim 1, wherein the silicon-containing group of the organic polymer of component (A) is a trimethoxysilyl group.                    
                    6.  The curable composition according to claim 1, wherein the polyethylene glycol constituting the diester compound of component (B) is at least one selected from diethylene glycol, triethylene glycol, tetraethylene glycol and pentaethylene glycol.                    
                    7.  The curable composition according to claim 1, wherein the diester compound of component (B) has a molecular weight of not more than 500.                    
                    8.  The curable composition according to claim 1, wherein the diester compound of component (B) is substantially free of a hydroxy group.                    
                    9.  The curable composition according to claim 1, wherein the diester compound of component (B) is triethylene glycol bis(2-ethylhexanoate).                    
                    10. 10.-12. (canceled)                    
                    13.  The curable composition according to claim 1, wherein the amidine compound of component (C) is 1-phenylguanidine.                    
                    14.  A sealing material comprising the curable composition according to claim 1.                    
                    15.  An adhesive comprising the curable composition according to claim 1.                    
                    16.  A coating material comprising the curable composition according to claim 1.                    
                    17.  A water-proof material comprising the curable composition according to claim 1.                    
                    18.  A cured product formed from the curable composition according to claim 1.                    




Description:

TECHNICAL FIELDThe present invention relates to a curable composition containing an organic polymer having a silicon-containing group which has a hydroxy group or a hydrolyzable group bonded to a silicon atom, and can be crosslinked by forming a siloxane bond (hereinafter to be also referred to as “reactive silicone group”).BACKGROUNDIt is known that an organic polymer containing at least one reactive silicone group in a molecule is crosslinked by the formation of a siloxane bond, which is accompanied by hydrolysis and the like of the reactive silicone group due to moisture and the like even at room temperature, to give a rubbery cured product.Polyoxyalkylene-based polymers and (meth)acrylate-based polymers having such reactive silicone groups have been disclosed in patent document 1, patent document 2 and the like, already industrially produced and widely used for applications such as sealing material, adhesive, paint and the like.Curable compositions containing an organic polymer having a reactive silicone group generally contain a plasticizer to improve workability and adjust the mechanical property of cured products, and phthalate-based plasticizers having low viscosity at a low cost have conventionally been used. In a one-component composition using a reactive silicone group-containing polymer, curing proceeds from the surface due to the moisture in the air. In application requesting strength and adhesiveness in early stages, acceleration of deep curing has been desired. To improve depth curability, a polypropylene glycol-based plasticizer having a molecular weight of about 3000-10000 is sometimes used. While patent document 3 shows exemplary use of a high-molecular weight polypropylene glycol-based compound, since the polypropylene glycol-based compound has high viscosity, a curable composition using same also shows high viscosity to lower the workability.While polyethylene glycol-based compounds have high affinity for water and high moisture permeability, they have low compatibility with reactive silicone group-containing polypropylene glycol-based polymers, and are associated with separation of a polyethylene glycol-based compound from a cured product formed from a composition containing a polyethylene glycol-based compound and a reactive silicone group-containing polypropylene glycol-based polymer and the like. Patent document 4 exemplifies a composition containing oxyalkylene-based polymer (A) having a reactive silicone group, compound (B) having a long-chain hydrocarbon group and an oxyethylene group, and curing catalyst (C). In this document, the amount of the aforementioned compound (B) to be used is limited to a small amount. While patent document 5 exemplifies a composition containing an alkylene glycol ester compound having an aromatic ring, the composition described in this document, when in the form of a one-component composition mixed with a curing catalyst, shows low storage stability and has a markedly decreased curability after storage.On the other hand, use of an aliphatic monocarboxylate compound of polyethylene glycol in a resin composition constituting an interlay for glass is exemplified in patent document 6. However, there is no previous instance using an aliphatic monocarboxylate compound of polyethylene glycol in a curable composition containing an organic polymer having a reactive silicone group.DOCUMENT LISTPatent Documentspatent document 1: JP-A-52-73998patent document 2: JP-A-11-130931patent document 3: JP-A-01-279958patent document 4: JP-A-2003-82222patent document 5: JP-A-2013-28472patent document 6: JP-A-11-323055 SUMMARY OF THE INVENTIONOne or more embodiments of the present invention provide a one-component curable composition showing good depth curability (i.e., quickly cured to the depth, low viscosity, superior workability, superior storage stability, and a small decrease in curability after storage.The present inventor has found that use of a diester compound obtained from polyethylene glycol and aliphatic monocarboxylic acid and/or alicyclic monocarboxylic acid as a plasticizer affords a curable composition having improved depth curability, good workability, and low level of decrease in curability after storage. The aforementioned diester compound also permits combined use with conventional phthalate-based plasticizers. Particularly when a reactive silicone group-containing a (meth)acrylate-based polymer is used, poor depth curability is observed as compared to the use of a reactive silicone group-containing polyoxyalkylene-based polymer. However, the present inventor has found that the aforementioned diester compound can be preferably used even in a composition containing a reactive silicone group-containing (meth)acrylate-based polymer. Furthermore, the present inventor has found that the aforementioned diester compound can also be used even in a composition containing an organic polymer having a urethane bond and/or a urea bond in the main chain. One or more embodiments of the present invention based on such findings are as described below.[1] A Curable Composition Comprising(A) 100 parts by weight of an organic polymer having a silicon-containing group, which can be crosslinked by forming a siloxane bond,(B) 21-300 parts by weight of a diester compound obtained from polyethylene glycol and aliphatic monocarboxylic acid and/or alicyclic monocarboxylic acid, and(C) 0.01-20 parts by weight of a curing catalyst.[2] The curable composition of the aforementioned [1], wherein the organic polymer of component (A) is at least one selected from the group consisting of a polyoxyalkylene-based polymer, a saturated hydrocarbon-based polymer and a (meth)acrylate-based polymer.  [3] The curable composition of the aforementioned [2], wherein the polyoxyalkylene-based polymer is a polyoxypropylene-based polymer.  [4] The curable composition of any one of the aforementioned [1]-[3], wherein the organic polymer of component (A) has a urethane bond and/or a urea bond in the main chain thereof.  [5] The curable composition of any one of the aforementioned [1]-[4], wherein the silicon-containing group of the organic polymer of component (A) is a trimethoxysilyl group.  [6] The curable composition of the aforementioned [1], wherein the organic polymer of component (A) is at least one selected from the group consisting of a polyoxyalkylene-based polymer, a saturated hydrocarbon-based polymer and a (meth)acrylate-based polymer, and has at least one silicon-containing group selected from the group consisting of a trimethoxysilyl group, a triethoxysilyl group, a dimethoxymethylsilyl group, a (methoxymethyl)dimethoxysilyl group and a methyldimethoxysilyl group, in the number of 1.1-5 on average in 1 molecule, and a number average molecular weight of 1,000-100,000.  [7] The curable composition of the aforementioned [1], wherein the organic polymer of component (A) is at least one selected from the group consisting of a polyoxyalkylene-based polymer and a (meth)acrylate-based polymer and has at least one silicon-containing group selected from the group consisting of a trimethoxysilyl group, a (methoxymethyl)dimethoxysilyl group and a methyldimethoxysilyl group, in the number of 1.1-3 on average in 1 molecule, and a number average molecular weight of 2,000-50,000.  [8] The curable composition of the aforementioned [1], wherein the organic polymer of component (A) is a polyoxyalkylene-based polymer having 1.1-2 trimethoxysilyl groups on average in 1 molecule, and a number average molecular weight of 3,000-30,000.  [9] The curable composition of the aforementioned [1], wherein the organic polymer of component (A) is a polyoxypropylene-based polymer having 1.1-2 trimethoxysilyl groups on average in 1 molecule, and a number average molecular weight of 3,000-30,000.  [10] The curable composition of any one of the aforementioned [1]-[9], wherein the polyethylene glycol constituting the diester compound of component (B) is at least one selected from diethylene glycol, triethylene glycol, tetraethylene glycol and pentaethylene glycol.  [11] The curable composition of any one of the aforementioned [1]-[10], wherein the diester compound of component (B) has a molecular weight of not more than 500.  [12] The curable composition of any one of the aforementioned [1]-[11], wherein the diester compound of component (B) is substantially free of a hydroxy group.  [13] The curable composition of any one of the aforementioned [1]-[9] and [12], wherein the diester compound of component (B) is at least one selected from the group consisting of triethylene glycol bis(2-ethylhexanoate), diethylene glycol dibutyrate, diethylene glycol dihexanoate, diethylene glycol bis(2-ethylhexanoate), diethylene glycol dioctoate, diethylene glycol bis(2-propylheptanoate), diethylene glycol dicyclohexanoate, triethylene glycol dibutyrate, triethylene glycol dihexanoate, triethylene glycol dioctoate, triethylene glycol bis(2-propylheptanoate), triethylene glycol dicyclohexanoate, tetraethylene glycol dibutyrate, tetraethylene glycol dihexanoate, tetraethylene glycol bis(2-ethylhexanoate), tetraethylene glycol dioctoate, tetraethylene glycol bis(2-propylheptanoate), tetraethylene glycol dicyclohexanoate, pentaethylene glycol dibutyrate, pentaethylene glycol dihexanoate, pentaethylene glycol bis(2-ethylhexanoate), pentaethylene glycol dioctoate, pentaethylene glycol bis(2-propylheptanoate), pentaethylene glycol dicyclohexanoate, and oligoethylene glycol bis(2-ethylhexanoate).  [14] The curable composition of any one of the aforementioned [1]-[9] and [12], wherein the diester compound of component (B) is triethylene glycol bis(2-ethylhexanoate).  [15] The curable composition of any one of the aforementioned [1]-[9], wherein the diester compound of component (B) is at least one selected from the group consisting of triethylene glycol bis(2-ethylhexanoate), diethylene glycol dibutyrate, diethylene glycol dihexanoate, diethylene glycol bis(2-ethylhexanoate), diethylene glycol dioctoate, diethylene glycol bis(2-propylheptanoate), diethylene glycol dicyclohexanoate, triethylene glycol dibutyrate, triethylene glycol dihexanoate, triethylene glycol dioctoate, triethylene glycol bis(2-propylheptanoate), triethylene glycol dicyclohexanoate, tetraethylene glycol dibutyrate, tetraethylene glycol dihexanoate, tetraethylene glycol bis(2-ethylhexanoate), tetraethylene glycol dioctoate, tetraethylene glycol bis(2-propylheptanoate), tetraethylene glycol dicyclohexanoate, pentaethylene glycol dibutyrate, pentaethylene glycol dihexanoate, pentaethylene glycol bis(2-ethylhexanoate), pentaethylene glycol dioctoate, pentaethylene glycol bis(2-propylheptanoate), pentaethylene glycol dicyclohexanoate, and oligoethylene glycol bis(2-ethylhexanoate), which has a hydroxyl value of 10 mg KOH/g or less.  [16] The curable composition of any one of the aforementioned [1]-[9], wherein the diester compound of component (B) is triethylene glycol bis(2-ethylhexanoate) having a hydroxyl value of 5 mg KOH/g or less.  [17] The curable composition of any one of the aforementioned [1]-[16], wherein the amount of the diester compound of component (B) is 30-200 parts by weight per 100 parts by weight of the organic polymer of component (A).  [18] The curable composition of any one of the aforementioned [1]-[16], wherein the amount of the diester compound of component (B) is 40-100 parts by weight per 100 parts by weight of the organic polymer of component (A).  [19] The curable composition of any one of the aforementioned [1]-[18], wherein the curing catalyst of component (C) is an organotin compound.  [20] The curable composition of the aforementioned [19], wherein the organotin compound is a dioctyltin-based compound.  [21] The curable composition of any one of the aforementioned [1]-[18], wherein the curing catalyst of component (C) is an amidine compound.  [22] The curable composition of the aforementioned [21], wherein the amidine compound is 1-phenylguanidine.  [23] The curable composition of any one of the aforementioned [1]-[22], wherein the amount of the curing catalyst of component (C) is 0.1-10 parts by weight per 100 parts by weight of the organic polymer of component (A).  [24] A sealing material comprising the curable composition of any one of the aforementioned [1]-[23].  [25] An adhesive comprising the curable composition of any one of the aforementioned [1]-[23].  [26] A coating material comprising the curable composition of any one of the aforementioned [1]-[23].  [27] A water-proof material comprising the curable composition of any one of the aforementioned [1]-[23].  [28] A cured product formed from the curable composition of any one of the aforementioned [1]-[23]. The curable composition of one or more embodiments of the present invention shows good depth curability, low viscosity, superior workability, superior storage stability, and a small decrease in the curability after storage.DESCRIPTION OF EMBODIMENTSCurable CompositionIn one or more embodiments of the curable composition of the present invention, only one kind of the aforementioned organic polymer of component (A), diester compound of component (B), curing catalyst of component (C), and the below-mentioned other components may be used or two or more kinds thereof may be used in combination. Each component is sequentially explained below.<Component (A)>The main chain of the organic polymer of component (A) is not particularly limited. Examples of the polymer constituting the main chain of the organic polymer include polyoxyalkylene-based polymers such as polyoxyethylene, polyoxypropylene, polyoxybutylene, polyoxytetramethylene, polyoxyethylene-polyoxypropylene copolymer, polyoxypropylene-polyoxybutylene copolymer and the like; hydrocarbon-based polymers such as ethylene-propylene-based copolymer, polyisobutylene, copolymer of isobutylene and isoprene, polychloroprene, polyisoprene, copolymer of isoprene or butadiene and acrylonitrile and/or styrene and the like, polybutadiene, copolymer of isoprene or butadiene and acrylonitrile and styrene, hydrogenated polyolefin-based polymer obtained by hydrogenation of these polyolefin-based polymer and the like; polyester-based polymers obtained by condensation of dibasic acids such as adipic acid and glycol or ring opening polymerization of lactones; (meth)acrylate-based polymers obtained by radical polymerization of monomers such as ethyl(meth)acrylate, butyl(meth)acrylate and the like; vinyl polymer obtained by radical polymerization of monomers such as (meth)acrylate, vinyl acetate, acrylonitrile, styrene and the like; graft polymers obtained by polymerization of vinyl monomers in the aforementioned organic polymer; polysulfide-based polymers; polyamide-based polymers such as nylon 6 obtained by ring opening polymerization of ε-caprolactam, nylon 6·6 obtained by polycondensation of hexamethylenediamine and adipic acid, nylon 6·10 obtained by polycondensation of hexamethylenediamine and sebacic acid, nylon 11 obtained by polycondensation of ε-aminoundecanoic acid, nylon 12 obtained by ring opening polymerization of ε-aminolaurolactam, copolymerized nylon having not less than 2 components from the above-mentioned nylons; polycarbonate-based polymers produced by polycondensation of, for example, bisphenol A and carbonyl chloride; diallyl phthalate-based polymers and the like. In one or more embodiments of the present invention, “(meth)acrylate” is “acrylate and/or methacrylate” and “(meth)acrylic acid” is “acrylic acid and/or methacrylic acid”. Other similar indications mean the same as these.Saturated hydrocarbon-based polymers such as polyisobutylene, hydrogenated polyisoprene, hydrogenated polybutadiene and the like, polyoxyalkylene-based polymer, and (meth)acrylate-based polymer are preferable since they have a comparatively low glass transition temperature and the obtained cured product is superior in cold resistance.The glass transition temperature of the organic polymer of component (A) is not particularly limited. It is preferably not more than 20° C., more preferably not more than 0° C., particularly preferably not more than −20° C. When the glass transition temperature exceeds 20° C., the viscosity of the curable composition becomes high in winter or cold area, and the workability is degraded in some cases. The flexibility of the cured product may decrease and the elongation is degraded in some cases. The aforementioned glass transition temperature is a value obtained by DSC measurement.Polyoxyalkylene-based polymer and (meth)acrylate-based polymer have high moisture permeability, and the a one-component composition containing same is superior in depth curability, and also superior in adhesiveness. As the organic polymer, therefore, polyoxyalkylene-based polymer and (meth)acrylate-based polymer are further preferable, polyoxyalkylene-based polymer is particularly preferable, and polyoxypropylene-based polymer is most preferable.The reactive silicone group contained in the organic polymer of one or more embodiments of the present invention has a hydroxy group or hydrolyzable group bonded to a silicon atom, and is a group that can be crosslinked by forming a siloxane bond by a reaction accelerated by a silanol condensation catalyst. As used herein, the hydrolyzable group means a group that reacts with water to form a hydroxy group.As the reactive silicone group, a group represented by the formula (1): -SiR13-aXa (1) {wherein each R1 is independently an alkyl group having 1-20 carbon atoms, an aryl group having 6-20 carbon atoms, an aralkyl group having 7-20 carbon atoms, or a triorganosiloxy group represented by —OSi(R′)3 wherein each R′ is independently a hydrocarbon group having 1-20 carbon atoms, each X is independently a hydroxy group or a hydrolyzable group, and a is an integer of 1-3}  can be mentioned. The hydrolyzable group is not particularly limited and may be a conventionally known hydrolyzable group. Examples thereof include a halogen atom, alkoxy group, acyloxy group, amino group, amido group, aminooxy group, mercapto group, alkenyloxy group and the like. Of these, a hydrogen atom, alkoxy group, acyloxy group, ketoxymate group, amino group, amido group, aminooxy group, mercapto group, and alkenyloxy group are preferable, and alkoxy group is particularly preferable since it shows mild hydrolyzability and is easy to handle.The hydrolyzable group and hydroxy group in the number range of 1-3 can be bonded to one silicon atom. When two or more hydrolyzable groups and hydroxy groups are bonded to a reactive silicone group, they may be the same or different.The a in the above-mentioned formula (1) is preferably 2 or 3 from the aspect of curability. When rapid curability of the composition is particularly desired, it is preferably 3, and when storage stability of the composition is desired, it is preferably 2.Examples of R1 in the above-mentioned formula (1) include alkyl groups such as methyl group, ethyl group and the like, cycloalkyl groups such as cyclohexyl group and the like, aryl groups such as phenyl group and the like, aralkyl groups such as benzyl group and the like, triorganosiloxy group represented by —OSi(R′)3 wherein R′ is methyl group, phenyl group etc., and the like. Of these, methyl group is particularly preferable.Examples of the reactive silicone group include trimethoxysilyl group, triethoxysilyl group, triisopropoxysilyl group, dimethoxymethylsilyl group, diethoxymethylsilyl group, diisopropoxymethylsilyl group, (chloromethyl)dimethoxysilyl group, (methoxymethyl)dimethoxysilyl group, methyldimethoxysilyl group and the like. Since the activity is high and good curability is obtained, a trimethoxysilyl group, a triethoxysilyl group, a dimethoxymethylsilyl group, a (methoxymethyl)dimethoxysilyl group and a methyldimethoxysilyl group are preferable, a trimethoxysilyl group, a (methoxymethyl)dimethoxysilyl group and a methyldimethoxysilyl group are more preferable, and a trimethoxysilyl group is further preferable. From the aspect of storage stability, a dimethoxymethylsilyl group and a triethoxysilyl group are preferable. In addition, a triethoxysilyl group and a diethoxymethylsilyl group are preferable since alcohol produced by the hydrolysis of the reactive silicone group is ethanol and have higher safety.The reactive silicone group can be introduced by a known method. Examples thereof include the following methods.(I) An organic polymer having a functional group such as hydroxy group and the like is reacted with an organic compound having an active group reactive with the functional group and an unsaturated group (e.g., saturated group-containing epoxy compound) to give an organic polymer having the unsaturated group. Then, the obtained organic polymer having the unsaturated group is reacted with a hydrosilane compound having a reactive silicone group (hydrosilylation).(II) An organic polymer containing the unsaturated group, which is obtained in the same manner as in the method of (I), is reacted with a compound having a mercapto group and a reactive silicone group.(III) An organic polymer having a functional group such as hydroxy group, epoxy group, isocyanate group and the like in a molecule is reacted with a compound having a functional group reactive with the functional group and a reactive silicone group.In the above methods, the method of (I) and the method of (III) wherein an organic polymer having a hydroxy group on the terminal is reacted with a compound having an isocyanate group and a reactive silicone group are preferable since high conversion ratio is obtained in a comparatively short reaction time. Furthermore, since the organic polymer having a reactive silicone group obtained by the method of (I) has a lower viscosity than the organic polymer obtained by the method of (III), a curable composition having good workability can be obtained by using the polymer, and the organic polymer obtained by the method of (II) has a strong odor due to mercaptosilane, the method of (I) is particularly preferable.Examples of the hydrosilane compound to be used in the method of (1) include, but are not limited to, halogenated silanes such as trichlorosilane, methyldichlorosilane, dimethylchlorosilane, phenyldichlorosilane and the like; alkoxysilanes such as trimethoxysilane, triethoxysilane, methyldiethoxysilane, methyldimethoxysilane, phenyldimethoxysilane, 1-[2-(trimethoxysilyl)ethyl]-1,1,3,3-tetramethyldisiloxane and the like; acyloxysilanes such as methyldiacetoxysilane, phenyldiacetoxysilane and the like, and the like. Of these, particularly halogenated silanes and alkoxysilanes are preferable, and particularly, alkoxysilanes are most preferable since the obtained curable composition has mild hydrolyzability and is easy to handle. Of alkoxysilanes, methyldimethoxysilane is preferable since it is easily available, and a curable composition containing the obtained organic polymer is high in the curability, storage stability, elongation property, and tensile strength. Trimethoxysilane is particularly preferable from the aspects of the curability and restoration property of the obtained curable composition.Examples of the method of (II) include, but are not limited to, a method including introducing a compound having a mercapto group and a reactive silicone group into an unsaturated binding site of an organic polymer by a radical addition reaction in the presence of a radical initiator and/or a radical source and the like. Examples of the aforementioned compound having a mercapto group and a reactive silicone group include, but are not limited to, γ-mercaptopropyltrimethoxysilane, γ-mercaptopropylmethyldimethoxysilane, γ-mercaptopropyltriethoxysilane, γ-mercaptopropylmethyldiethoxysilane, mercaptomethyltrimethoxysilane, mercaptomethyltriethoxysilane and the like.Examples of the method of (III) wherein an organic polymer having a hydroxy group is reacted with a compound having an isocyanate group and a reactive silicone group include, but are not limited to, the method shown in JP-A-3-47825 and the like. Examples of the aforementioned compound having an isocyanate group and a reactive silicone group include, but are not limited to, γ-isocyanatepropyltrimethoxysilane, γ-isocyanatepropylmethyldimethoxysilane, γ-isocyanatepropyltriethoxysilane, γ-isocyanatepropylmethyldiethoxysilane, isocyanatemethyltrimethoxysilane, isocyanatemethyltriethoxysilane, isocyanatemethyldimethoxymethylsilane, isocyanatemethyldiethoxymethylsilane and the like.In the case of a silane compound wherein three hydrolyzable groups are bonded to one silicon atom such as trimethoxysilane and the like, a disproportionation reaction sometimes proceed. When a disproportionation reaction proceeds, an unstable compound such as dimethoxysilane is produced to make the handling difficult. Such disproportionation reaction does not proceed with γ-mercaptopropyltrimethoxysilane and γ-isocyanatepropyltrimethoxysilane. Therefore, when a group wherein three hydrolyzable groups are bonded to one silicon atom, such as trimethoxysilyl group and the like, is used as a silicon-containing group, the method of (II) or (III) is preferably used.On the other hand, a silane compound represented by the formula (2): H—(SiR22O)mSiR22—R3—SiX3 (2) wherein X is as defined above, each R2 in the number of 2m+2 is independently a hydrocarbon group, R3 is a divalent organic group, and m is an integer of 0-19  is free of progress of a disproportionation reaction. Therefore, when a group wherein three hydrolyzable groups are bonded to one silicon atom is introduced in the method of (I), a silane compound represented by the formula (2) is preferably used. From the aspects of availability and cost, each R2 in the number of 2m+2 is independently preferably a hydrocarbon group having 1-20 carbon atoms, more preferably a hydrocarbon group having 1-8 carbon atoms, further preferably a hydrocarbon group having 1-4 carbon atoms. From the aspects of availability and cost, R3 is preferably a divalent hydrocarbon group having 1-12 carbon atoms, more preferably a divalent hydrocarbon group having 2-8 carbon atoms, further preferably a divalent hydrocarbon group having 2 carbon atoms. From the aspects of availability and cost, m is preferably 1. Examples of the silane compound represented by the formula (2) include 1-[2-(trimethoxysilyl)ethyl]-1,1,3,3-tetramethyldisiloxane, 1-[2-(trimethoxysilyl)propyl]-1,1,3,3-tetramethyldisiloxane, 1-[2-(trimethoxysilyl)hexyl]-1,1,3,3-tetramethyldisiloxane and the like. The organic polymer having a reactive silicone group may be linear or branched. The number average molecular weight (Mn) of an organic polymer having a reactive silicone group is a value measured by GPC (based on polystyrene), preferably 1,000-100,000, more preferably 2,000-50,000, particularly preferably 3,000-30,000. When the number average molecular weight is less than 1,000, elongation of the cured product tends to be insufficient, and when it exceeds 100,000, the curable composition has high viscosity, which tends to be inconvenient in terms of workability. The molecular weight distribution (Mw/Mn) of an organic polymer having a reactive silicone group as measured by GPC is preferably not more than 2, more preferably not more than 1.5, further preferably not more than 1.4.To obtain a rubbery cured product showing high strength, high elongation and low elastic modulus, the number of the reactive silicone group contained in an organic polymer is preferably 1 or more, more preferably 1.1-5, further preferably 1.1-3, particularly preferably 1.1-2, on average in 1 molecule. When the number of the reactive silicone group contained in a molecule is less than 1 on average, the curability becomes insufficient, and a cured product having good rubber elasticity behavior is difficult to obtain. The reactive silicone group may be present on the main chain terminal or the side chain terminal of the organic polymer, or both of them. Particularly, when the reactive silicone group is present only on the main chain terminal, a rubbery cured product showing high strength, high elongation and low elastic modulus is easily obtained, since the effective network length in the finally-formed cured product becomes long.The aforementioned polyoxyalkylene-based polymer is a polymer essentially having a repeat unit represented by the formula (3): —R4—O— (3) wherein R4 is a linear or branched alkylene group having 1-14 carbon atoms. R4 in the formula (3) is preferably a linear or branched alkylene group having 1-14 (more preferably 2-4) carbon atoms. Examples of the repeat unit represented by the formula (3) include —CH2O—, —CH2CH2O—, —CH2CH(CH3) O—, —CH2CH(C2H5) O—, —CH2C(CH3)2O —, —CH2CH2CH2CH2O— and the like. The main chain of the polyoxyalkylene-based polymer may be composed of only one kind of repeat unit or two or more kinds of repeat units. Particularly, when the curable composition of one or more embodiments of the present invention is used as a sealant and the like, the main component of the organic polymer of component (A) is preferably an amorphous and comparatively low viscous polyoxypropylene-based polymer.Examples of the synthesis method of the polyoxyalkylene-based polymer include, but are not limited to, a polymerization method using an alkali catalyst such as KOH and the like, the polymerization method shown in JP-A-61-215623, which uses a transition metal compound-porphyrin complex catalyst such as a complex obtained by reaction of an organic aluminum compound and porphyrin, the polymerization methods shown in JP-B-46-27250, JP-B-59-15336, U.S. Pat. No. 3,278,457, U.S. Pat. No. 3,278,458, U.S. Pat. No. 3,278,459, U.S. Pat. No. 3,427,256, U.S. Pat. No. 3,427,334, U.S. Pat. No. 3,427,335 and the like, which use a double-metal cyanide catalyst (e.g., zinc hexacyanocobaltate glyme complex catalyst), the polymerization method shown in JP-A-10-273512, which uses a catalyst composed of a polyphosphagen salt, the polymerization method shown in JP-A-11-060722, which uses a catalyst composed of a phosphagen compound and the like.Examples of the polyoxyalkylene-based polymer having a reactive silicone group include, but are not limited to, those proposed in JP-B-45-36319, JP-B-46-12154, JP-A-50-156599, JP-A-54-6096, JP-A-55-13767, JP-A-55-13468, JP-A-57-164123, JP-B-3-2450, U.S. Pat. No. 3,632,557, U.S. Pat. No. 4,345,053, U.S. Pat. No. 4,366,307, U.S. Pat. No. 4,960,844 and the like, the polyoxyalkylene-based polymers proposed in JP-A-61-197631, JP-A-61-215622, JP-A-61-215623, JP-A-61-218632, JP-A-3-72527, JP-A-3-47825, JP-A-8-231707 and having a number average molecular weight (Mn) of 6,000 or more and a molecular weight distribution (Mw/Mn) of 1.6 or less, and the like. The above-mentioned polyoxyalkylene-based polymer having a reactive silicone group may be used alone, or two or more kinds thereof may be used in combination.The aforementioned saturated hydrocarbon-based polymer is a polymer free of an aliphatic unsaturated bond. The saturated hydrocarbon-based polymer optionally has an aromatic ring (i.e., optionally having an aromatic double bond). The saturated hydrocarbon-based polymer can be obtained by a method including (1) polymerizing an olefin-based compound having 2-6 carbon atoms such as ethylene, propylene, 1-butene, isobutylene and the like as a main monomer, (2) homopolymerizing a diene compound such as butadiene, isoprene and the like or copolymerizing same with the above-mentioned olefin-based compound, followed by hydrogenation and the like. Isobutylene-based polymer and hydrogenated polybutadiene-based polymer are preferable, since a functional group is easily introduced into the terminal, the molecular weight is easily controlled, and the average number of the terminal functional groups in one molecule can be increased, and an isobutylene-based polymer is particularly preferable. A saturated hydrocarbon-based polymer having a reactive silicone group, wherein the main chain is constituted of a saturated hydrocarbon-based polymer, is superior in heat resistance, weatherability, durability and moisture barrier property.The isobutylene-based polymer may have all monomer units formed from an isobutylene unit, or a copolymer with other monomer. In view of rubber property, preferable one contains 50 wt % or more, more preferable one contains 80 wt % or more, and particularly preferable one contains 90-99 wt %, of a repeat unit derived from isobutylene.As a synthesis method of a saturated hydrocarbon-based polymer, various polymerization methods have conventionally been reported. Particularly, many living polymerizations have been developed in recent years. Saturated hydrocarbon-based polymer, particularly an isobutylene-based polymer, can be easily produced by the inifer polymerization found by Kennedy et al. (J. P. Kennedy et al., J. Polymer Sci., Polymer Chem. Ed. 1997, vol. 15, page 2843), and one having a number average molecular weight of about 1,000-100,000 and a molecular weight distribution of not more than 1.5 can be polymerized, and various functional groups can be introduced into a molecular terminal.Examples of the production method of a saturated hydrocarbon-based polymer having a reactive silicone group include, but are not limited to, the methods described in JP-B-4-69659, JP-B-7-108928, JP-A-63-254149, JP-A-64-22904, JP-A-1-197509, JP-B-2539445, JP-B-2873395, JP-A-7-53882 and the like. The above-mentioned saturated hydrocarbon-based polymer having a reactive silicone group may be used alone or two or more kinds thereof may be used in combination.As the (meth)acrylate-based monomer constituting the main chain of the aforementioned (meth)acrylate-based polymer is not particularly limited, various ones can be used. Examples of the monomer include (meth)acrylic acid-based monomers such as (meth)acrylic acid, methyl (meth)acrylate, ethyl (meth)acrylate, n-propyl (meth)acrylate, isopropyl (meth)acrylate, n-butyl (meth) acrylate, isobutyl (meth) acrylate, tert-butyl (meth) acrylate, n-pentyl (meth)acrylate, n-hexyl (meth)acrylate, cyclohexyl (meth)acrylate, n-heptyl (meth)acrylate, n-octyl (meth)acrylate, 2-ethylhexyl (meth)acrylate, nonyl (meth)acrylate, decyl (meth)acrylate, dodecyl (meth)acrylate, phenyl (meth)acrylate, toluyl (meth)acrylate, benzyl (meth)acrylate, 2-methoxyethyl (meth) acrylate, 3-methoxybutyl (meth) acrylate, 2-hydroxyethyl (meth)acrylate, 2-hydroxypropyl (meth)acrylate, stearyl (meth) acrylate, glycidyl (meth) acrylate, 2-aminoethyl (meth)acrylate, γ-((meth)acryloyloxy)propyltrimethoxysilane, γ-((meth)acryloyloxy)propyldimethoxymethylsilane, (meth)acryloyloxymethyltrimethoxysilane, (meth)acryloyloxymethyltriethoxysilane, (meth)acryloyloxymethyldimethoxymethylsilane, (meth)acryloyloxymethyldiethoxymethylsilane, ethylene oxide adduct of (meth)acrylate and the like.In the aforementioned (meth)acrylate-based polymer, the following vinyl monomers can also be copolymerized with (meth)acrylate-based monomers. Examples of the vinyl monomer include styrene-based monomers such as styrene, vinyltoluene, α-methylstyrene, chlorostyrene, styrene sulfonic acid and a salt thereof and the like; silicon containing vinyl monomers such as vinyltrimethoxysilane, vinyltriethoxysilane and the like; maleic anhydride, maleic acid, monoalkyl ester and dialkyl ester of maleic acid; fumaric acid, monoalkyl ester and dialkyl ester of fumaric acid; maleimide-based monomers such as maleimide, methylmaleimide, ethylmaleimide, propylmaleimide, butylmaleimide, hexylmaleimide, octylmaleimide, dodecylmaleimide, stearylmaleimide, phenylmaleimide, cyclohexylmaleimide and the like; nitrile group-containing vinyl monomers such as acrylonitrile, methacrylonitrile and the like; amido group-containing vinyl monomers such as acrylamide, methacrylamide and the like; vinyl esters such as vinyl acetate, vinyl propionate, vinyl pivalate, vinyl benzoate, vinyl cinnamate and the like; alkenes such as ethylene, propylene and the like; conjugated dienes such as butadiene, isoprene and the like; vinyl chloride, vinylidene chloride, allyl chloride, allylalcohol and the like. These may be used alone or a plurality thereof may be copolymerized.As the (meth)acrylate-based polymer, from the aspects of property and the like, a polymer composed of a (meth)acrylate monomer and a polymer composed of a styrene-based monomer and (meth)acrylic acid-based monomer are preferable, a polymer composed of a (meth)acrylate monomer is more preferable, and a polymer composed of an acrylate monomer is further preferable.In general building use and the like requesting properties such as low viscosity of a blend, low modulus, high elongation, weather resistance, heat resistance and the like of a cured product, butyl acrylate is a preferable monomer for constituting a (meth)acrylate-based polymer. On the other hand, in automobile use and the like requesting oil resistance and the like, a copolymer mainly comprising ethyl acrylate is preferable as the (meth)acrylate-based polymer. While the copolymer mainly comprising ethyl acrylate is superior in oil resistance, it tends to show rather inferior low temperature property (cold resistance). To improve the low temperature property, it is possible to replace a part of the ethyl acrylate with butyl acrylate. However, since the good oil resistance thereof decreases as the ratio of butyl acrylate increases, for use requesting oil resistance, the ratio of butyl acrylate is preferably 40 wt % or less, more preferably 30 wt % or less. To improve the low temperature property and the like without impairing the oil resistance, a monomer wherein oxygen is introduced into an alkyl group on the side chain (e.g., 2-methoxyethyl acrylate, 2-ethoxyethyl acrylate etc.) is preferably used. However, since introduction of an alkoxy group having an ether bond in the side chain tends to degrade the heat resistance of the copolymer, when heat resistance is requested, the ratio of a monomer wherein oxygen is introduced into an alkyl group on the side chain is preferably 40 wt % or less. A suitable polymer can be obtained by changing the ratio of the monomer to be used in consideration of the requested properties such as oil resistance, heat resistance, low temperature property and the like according to various uses and the requested object. Examples of the copolymer superior in the balance of properties such as oil resistance, heat resistance, low temperature property and the like include ethyl acrylate/butyl acrylate/2-methoxyethyl acrylate (40-50/20-30/30-20 in weight ratio) copolymer. In one or more embodiments of the present invention, butyl acrylate, ethyl acrylate, 2-methoxyethyl acrylate, 2-ethoxyethyl acrylate may be copolymerized with other monomer, and further block copolymerized, in which case 40 wt % or more of butyl acrylate, ethyl acrylate, 2-methoxyethyl acrylate, 2-ethoxyethyl acrylate is preferably contained.The synthesis method of the (meth)acrylate-based polymer is not particularly limited, and a known method can be used. However, a polymer obtained by a general free radical polymerization method using an azo compound, peroxide and the like as a polymerization initiator is associated with molecular weight distribution values which are generally greater than 2 and high viscosity. Therefore, to obtain a (meth)acrylate-based polymer having a narrow molecular weight distribution, low viscosity, and a crosslinking functional group at a high ratio on the molecular chain terminal, the living radical polymerization method is preferably used.Of the “living radical polymerization method”, the “atom transfer radical polymerization” including polymerizing a (meth)acrylate-based monomer by using an initiator such as organic halide, a halogenated sulfonyl compound or the like, and a transition metal complex as a catalyst is more preferable as a production method of a (meth)acrylate-based polymer having a particular functional group, since it has, in addition to the characteristics of the above-mentioned “living radical polymerization method”, a halogen and the like comparatively advantageous for the functional group conversion reaction on the terminal and a high degree of freedom in the design of initiator and catalyst. The atom transfer radical polymerization is described in, for example, Matyjaszewski et al., Journal of the American Chemical Society (J. Am. Chem. Soc.) 1995, vol. 117, page 5614 and the like.Examples of the production method (meth)acrylate-based polymer having a reactive silicone group include production methods using a free radical polymerization method using a chain transfer agent, which are disclosed in JP-B-3-14068, JP-B-4-55444, JP-A-6-211922 and the like. In addition, examples thereof include, but are not limited to, the production method using atom transfer radical polymerization disclosed in JP-A-9-272714 and the like. The above-mentioned (meth)acrylate-based polymer having a reactive silicone group may be used alone, or two or more kinds thereof may be used in combination.These organic polymers having a reactive silicone group may be used alone or two or more kinds may be used in combination. Specifically, a mixture of two or more kinds of organic polymers selected from the group consisting of a polyoxyalkylene-based polymer having a reactive silicone group, a saturated hydrocarbon-based polymer having a reactive silicone group, and a (meth)acrylate-based polymer having a reactive silicone group can also be used.The production methods of a mixture of organic polymers of a polyoxyalkylene-based polymer having a reactive silicone group and a (meth)acrylate-based polymer having a reactive silicone group are proposed in, but are not limited to, JP-A-59-122541, JP-A-63-112642, JP-A-6-172631, JP-A-11-116763 and the like. Examples of the preferable production method of the (meth)acrylate-based polymer include a production method including blending a copolymer having a reactive silicone group, wherein the molecular chain is substantially composed of a (meth)acrylate monomer unit represented by the following formula (4): —CH2—C(R5)(COOR6)— (4) wherein R5 is a hydrogen atom or a methyl group and R6 is an alkyl group having 1-8 carbon atoms, and  a (meth)acrylate monomer unit represented by the following formula (5):  —CH2—C(R5)(COOR7)— (5) wherein R5 is as defined above and R7 is an alkyl group having 9 or more carbon atoms,  with a polyoxyalkylene-based polymer having a reactive silicone group. Examples of R6 in the aforementioned formula (4) include an alkyl group having 1-8, preferably 1-4, further preferably 1 or 2, carbon atoms such as methyl group, ethyl group, propyl group, n-butyl group, t-butyl group, 2-ethylhexyl group and the like. The alkyl group for R6 may be one kind or two or more kinds.Examples of R7 in the aforementioned formula (5) include an alkyl group having 9 or more, preferably 10-30, more preferably 10-20, carbon atoms, such as nonyl group, decyl group, lauryl group, tridecyl group, cetyl group, stearyl group, behenyl group and the like. Like R6, the alkyl group for R7 may be one kind or two or more kinds.The molecular chain of the aforementioned preferable (meth)acrylate-based polymer is substantially composed of the monomer units of the formula (4) and the formula (5). The “substantially” here means that the total monomer units of the formula (4) and the formula (5) present in the polymer exceed 50 wt %. The total monomer units of the formula (4) and the formula (5) are preferably 70 wt % or more.The abundance ratio of the monomer unit of the formula (4) and the monomer unit of the formula (5) 95:5-40:60 is preferable, 90:10-60:40 is more preferable in the weight ratio. Examples of the monomer unit other than the formula (4) and the formula (5), which is optionally contained in the aforementioned preferable (meth)acrylate-based polymer, include monomer unit derived from (meth)acrylic acid; monomer containing an amido group such as (meth)acrylamide, N-methylol (meth)acrylamide and the like; monomer containing an epoxy group such as glycidyl (meth)acrylate and the like; monomer containing an amino group such as diethylaminoethyl (meth)acrylate, aminoethyl vinyl ether and the like; and acrylonitrile, styrene, α-methylstyrene, alkylvinylether, vinyl chloride, vinyl acetate, vinyl propionate, ethylene and the like.Mixtures of organic polymers of a saturated hydrocarbon-based polymer having a reactive silicone group and a (meth)acrylate-based polymer having a reactive silicone group are proposed in, but are not limited to, JP-A-1-168764, JP-A-2000-186176 and the like.As a production method of a mixture of organic polymers of (meth)acrylate-based polymer having a reactive silicon functional group, a method including polymerization of a (meth)acrylate-based monomer in the presence of an organic polymer having a reactive silicone group can be utilized. This production method is specifically disclosed in, but is not limited to, JP-A-59-78223, JP-A-59-168014, JP-A-60-228516, JP-A-60-228517 and the like.In one or more embodiments, the main chain of the organic polymer may contain a urethane bond and/or a urea bond. The aforementioned urethane bond and/or urea bond are/is bond(s) containing an amido segment represented by the formula (6): —NR8—C(═O)— (6) wherein R8 is an organic group or a hydrogen atom, which is formed, for example, by the reaction of an isocyanate group and an active hydrogen group. Since the amido segment has a comparatively high polarity, when an organic polymer containing same is used, the strength of the obtained cured product and adhesiveness to a substrate tend to be high.Examples of the amido segment represented by the formula (6) include one formed by a reaction of isocyanate group and hydroxy group, one formed by a reaction of isocyanate group and amino group, one formed by a reaction of isocyanate group and mercapto group and the like. In addition, one formed by a reaction of the aforementioned amido segment containing an active hydrogen atom and isocyanate group is also included in the amido segment represented by the formula (6).As an industrially feasible production method of an organic polymer having an amido segment and a reactive silicone group, for example, one produced by a method including reacting an excess polyisocyanate compound with an organic polymer having an active hydrogen-containing group on the terminal to give a polymer having an isocyanate group on the terminal of a polyurethane-based main chain, and then or simultaneously, reacting the whole or a part of the isocyanate group with W group of the silicon compound represented by the formula (7): W—R9—SiR13-aXa (7) wherein R1, X and a are as defined above, R9 is a divalent organic group, more preferably a hydrocarbon group having 1-20 carbon atoms, and W is an active hydrogen-containing group selected from hydroxy group, carboxy group, mercapto group and amino group (primary or secondary) can be mentioned. Examples of the document relating to this production method include JP-B-46-12154 (U.S. Pat. No. 3,632,557), JP-A-58-109529 (U.S. Pat. No. 4,374,237), JP-A-62-13430 (U.S. Pat. No. 4,645,816), JP-A-8-53528 (EP 0676403), JP-A-10-204144 (EP 0831108), JP-A-2003-508561 (U.S. Pat. No. 6,197,912), JP-A-6-211879 (U.S. Pat. No. 5,364,955), JP-A-10-53637 (U.S. Pat. No. 5,756,751), JP-A-11-100427, JP-A-2000-169544, JP-A-2000-169545, JP-A-2002-212415, JP-B-3313360, U.S. Pat. No. 4,067,844, U.S. Pat. No. 3,711,445, JP-A-2001-323040 and the like.As an organic polymer having an amido segment and a reactive silicone group, for example, a polymer produced by reacting an organic polymer having an active hydrogen-containing group on the terminal with a reactive silicone group-containing isocyanate compound represented by the formula (8): O═C═N—R9—SiR13-aXa (8) wherein R9, R′, X and a are as defined above, can be mentioned. Examples of the document relating to this production method include JP-A-11-279249 (U.S. Pat. No. 5,990,257), JP-A-2000-119365 (U.S. Pat. No. 6,046,270), JP-A-58-29818 (U.S. Pat. No. 4,345,053), JP-A-3-47825 (U.S. Pat. No. 5,068,304), JP-A-11-60724, JP-A-2002-155145, JP-A-2002-249538, WO 03/018658, WO 03/059981 and the like.Examples of the organic polymer having an active hydrogen-containing group on the terminal include an oxyalkylene polymer having a hydroxy group on the terminal (polyether polyol), polyacrylic polyol, polyester polyol, a saturated hydrocarbon-based polymer having a hydroxy group on the terminal (polyolefin polyol), polythiol compound, polyamine compound and the like. Of these, polyether polyol, polyacrylic polyol, and polyolefin polyol are preferable since the glass transition temperature of the obtained organic polymer is comparatively low, and the obtained cured product is superior in cold resistance. Particularly, polyether polyol is particularly preferable since the obtained organic polymer shows low viscosity and good workability, and the curable composition shows good depth curability and good adhesiveness of the cured product. In addition, polyacrylic polyol and saturated hydrocarbon-based polymer are more preferable since the obtained cured product shows good weatherability and heat resistance.As polyether polyol, one produced by any production method can be used. One having at least 0.7 hydroxy group per molecule terminal on molecule average is preferable. Examples of the polyether polyol include a polyoxyalkylene-based polymer produced by using a conventional alkali metal catalyst, a polyoxyalkylene-based polymer produced by reacting an initiator such as a polyhydroxy compound having at least two hydroxy groups and the like with alkylene oxide in the presence of a double metal cyanide complex or cesium, and the like.Of the above-mentioned polymerization methods, a polymerization method using a double metal cyanide complex is preferable since an oxyalkylene polymer having a lower degree of unsaturation, low Mw/Mn, lower viscosity, high acid resistance, and high weatherability can be obtained.As the aforementioned polyacrylic polyol, a polyol having a (meth)alkyl acrylate (co)polymer as a main chain, and having a hydroxy group in a molecule can be mentioned. The synthesis method of this polymer is preferably the living radical polymerization method, more preferably atom transfer radical polymerization, since the molecular weight distribution is narrow and low viscosity can be achieved. In addition, a polymer obtained by continuous bulk polymerization of the alkyl acrylate-based monomer at a high temperature and high pressure as described in JPA-2001-207157 (obtained by SGO process) is preferably used. Specifically, ARUFON UH-2000 manufactured by Toagosei Co., Ltd. and the like can be mentioned.Examples of the aforementioned polyisocyanate compound include aromatic polyisocyanates such as toluene(tolylene) diisocyanate, diphenylmethane diisocyanate, xylylene diisocyanate and the like; aliphatic polyisocyanates such as isophorone diisocyanate, hexamethylene diisocyanate and the like.Examples of the silicon compound represented by the formula (7) include, but are not particularly limited to, amino group-containing silanes such as γ-aminopropyltrimethoxysilane, N-β-aminoethyl)-γ-aminopropyltrimethoxysilane, (N-phenyl)-γ-aminopropyltrimethoxysilane, N-ethylaminoisobutyltrimethoxysilane, N-cyclohexylaminomethyltriethoxysilane, N-cyclohexylaminomethyldiethoxymethylsilane, N-phenylaminomethyltrimethoxysilane and the like; hydroxy group-containing silanes such as γ-hydroxypropyltrimethoxysilane and the like; mercapto group-containing silanes such as γ-mercaptopropyltrimethoxysilane and the like; and the like. As described in JP-A-6-211879 (U.S. Pat. No. 5,364,955), JP-A-10-53637 (U.S. Pat. No. 5,756,751), JP-A-10-204144 (EP 0831108), JP-A-2000-169544, JP-A-2000-169545, a Michael addition reaction product of various α,β-unsaturated carbonyl compounds and a primary amino group-containing silane, and a Michael addition reaction product of various (meth)acryloyl group-containing silanes and a primary amino group-containing compound can also be used as a silicon compound represented by the formula (7).Examples of the reactive silicone group-containing isocyanate compound represented by the formula (8) include, but are not particularly limited to, γ-trimethoxysilylpropylisocyanate, γ-triethoxysilylpropylisocyanate, γ-methyldimethoxysilylpropylisocyanate, γ-methyldiethoxysilylpropylisocyanate, trimethoxysilylmethylisocyanate, triethoxymethylsilylmethylisocyanate, dimethoxymethylsilylmethylisocyanate, diethoxymethylsilylmethylisocyanate and the like. As described in JP-A-2000-119365 (U.S. Pat. No. 6,046,270), a compound obtained by reacting a silicon compound of the formula (7) with an excess amount of the aforementioned polyisocyanate compound can also be used as a reactive silicone group-containing isocyanate compound represented by the formula (8).In preferable embodiments, the organic polymer of component (A) is at least one selected from the group consisting of a polyoxyalkylene-based polymer, a saturated hydrocarbon-based polymer and a (meth)acrylate-based polymer, which has at least one silicon-containing group selected from the group consisting of a trimethoxysilyl group, a triethoxysilyl group, a dimethoxymethylsilyl group, a (methoxymethyl)dimethoxysilyl group and a methyldimethoxysilyl group in the number of 1.1-5 on average in 1 molecule and a number average molecular weight of 1,000-100,000. In the description of the preferable embodiments, a limitation (modifier) on the aforementioned silicon-containing group and number average molecular weight modifies all of the polyoxyalkylene-based polymer, saturated hydrocarbon-based polymer and (meth)acrylate-based polymer.In more preferable embodiments, the organic polymer of component (A) is at least one selected from the group consisting of a polyoxyalkylene-based polymer and a (meth)acrylate-based polymer, which has at least one silicon-containing group selected from the group consisting of a trimethoxysilyl group, a (methoxymethyl)dimethoxysilyl group and a methyldimethoxysilyl group, in the number of 1.1-3 on average in 1 molecule and a number average molecular weight of 2,000-50,000. In the description of the more preferable embodiments, a limitation (modifier) on the aforementioned silicon-containing group and number average molecular weight modifies both the polyoxyalkylene-based polymer and (meth)acrylate-based polymer.In more preferable embodiments, the organic polymer of component (A) is a polyoxyalkylene-based polymer having 1.1-2 trimethoxysilyl groups on average in 1 molecule and a number average molecular weight of 3,000-30,000.In particularly preferable embodiments, the organic polymer of component (A) is a polyoxypropylene-based polymer having 1.1-2 trimethoxysilyl groups on average in 1 molecule and a number average molecular weight of 3,000-30,000.<Component (B)>In one or more embodiments of the present invention, a diester compound obtained from polyethylene glycol and aliphatic monocarboxylic acid and/or alicyclic monocarboxylic acid is used as component (B). Component (B) acts as a plasticizer. By the addition of component (B), viscosity and slump property of curable composition, and mechanical properties such as tensile strength, elongation and the like of a cured product obtained by curing the composition can be adjusted. Furthermore, using component (B), depth curability of a one-component curable composition is improved (i.e., rapidly cured to the deep part) as compared to the use of a general phthalate-based plasticizer, and a decrease in the curability after storage can be prevented. In addition, component (B) is gentle on the environment, different from the phthalate-based compounds considered to be environmental hormone, and shows a small adverse influence on the human body.Examples of the polyethylene glycol constituting component (B) include diethylene glycol, triethylene glycol, tetraethylene glycol, pentaethylene glycol, hexaethylene glycol, heptaethylene glycol, octaethylene glycol, nonaethylene glycol, decaethylene glycol and the like. These may be used alone or a plurality thereof may be used in combination. Since the viscosity of polyethylene glycol increases as the degree of polymerization thereof becomes higher, diethylene glycol, triethylene glycol, tetraethylene glycol, and pentaethylene glycol are preferable. Triethylene glycol is particularly preferable since it has high safety and comparatively low viscosity, and is easily available.Aliphatic monocarboxylic acid and alicyclic monocarboxylic acid constituting component (B) preferably has 3-20, further preferably 4-18, particularly preferably 6-12, carbon atoms. When the number of carbon atoms is not more than 2, a diester compound as component (B) has a low molecular weight and component (B) in a cured product shows a strong tendency toward migration. On the other hand, when the number of carbon atoms is 21 or more, a diester compound as component (B) easily becomes solid and the action as a plasticizer is not sufficient exhibited.Examples of the aliphatic monocarboxylic acid include propanoic acid, butanoic acid, pentanoic acid, hexanoic acid, heptanoic acid, octanoic acid, 2-ethylhexanoic acid, nonanoic acid, decanoic acid, dodecanoic acid, 2-hydroxypropanoic acid. Examples of the alicyclic monocarboxylic acid include cyclohexanecarboxylic acid, cyclopentenylacetic acid. These may be used alone or a plurality thereof may be used. Aliphatic monocarboxylic acid is preferable since it is superior to alicyclic carboxylic acid in the compatibility with component (A). Aliphatic monocarboxylic acid may be a straight chain or branched chain. Alicyclic monocarboxylic acid may be saturated or unsaturated. Examples of the saturated alicyclic monocarboxylic acid include cyclohexanecarboxylic acid. Examples of the unsaturated alicyclic monocarboxylic acid include cyclopentenylacetic acid.When a diester compound of polyethylene glycol and aromatic carboxylic acid (e.g., diethylene glycol dibenzoate) and component (A) are used in combination in a one-component curable composition, the curability of the composition after storage is markedly degraded. Therefore, in one or more embodiments, it is preferable that a diester compound of polyethylene glycol and aromatic carboxylic acid be not used in the curable composition.Examples of component (B) include, but are not particularly limited to, triethylene glycol bis(2-ethylhexanoate), diethylene glycol dibutyrate, diethylene glycol dihexanoate, diethylene glycol bis(2-ethylhexanoate), diethylene glycol dioctoate, diethylene glycol bis(2-propylheptanoate), diethylene glycol dicyclohexanoate, triethylene glycol dibutyrate, triethylene glycol dihexanoate, triethylene glycol dioctoate, triethylene glycol bis(2-propylheptanoate), triethylene glycol dicyclohexanoate, tetraethylene glycol dibutyrate, tetraethylene glycol dihexanoate, tetraethylene glycol bis(2-ethylhexanoate), tetraethylene glycol dioctoate, tetraethylene glycol bis(2-propylheptanoate), tetraethylene glycol dicyclohexanoate, pentaethylene glycol dibutyrate, pentaethylene glycol dihexanoate, pentaethylene glycol bis(2-ethylhexanoate), pentaethylene glycol dioctoate, pentaethylene glycol bis(2-propylheptanoate), pentaethylene glycol dicyclohexanoate, oligoethylene glycol bis(2-ethylhexanoate) and the like.Of the aforementioned components (B), triethylene glycol bis(2-ethylhexanoate) is particularly preferable since it is widely used as a plasticizer for a resin constituting an interlay for laminate glass and easily available. Triethylene glycol bis(2-ethylhexanoate) is available from OXEA under the trade name: OXSOFT 3G8, from Celanese under the trade name: WVC 3800, from DOW CHEMICAL under the trade name: Flexol 3GO, and from EASTMAN under the trade name: Eastman TEG-EH Plasticizer.The molecular weight of component (B) is preferably not more than 500, more preferably not more than 450. When the molecular weight of component (B) exceeds 500, the curable composition tends to show higher viscosity and degraded workability.It is preferable that component (B) be substantially free of a hydroxy group, namely, the hydroxyl value of component (B) is not more than 10 mgKOH/g, more preferably not more than 5 mgKOH/g. When the hydroxy group remains, the curability of the curable composition after storage tends to decrease largely. Therefore, the reaction of polyethylene glycol and aliphatic monocarboxylic acid and/or alicyclic monocarboxylic acid is preferably performed under conditions reducing the residual hydroxy groups.Component (B) may be used alone, or two or more kinds thereof may be used in combination. The amount of component (B) is preferably 21-300 parts by weight, more preferably 30-200 parts by weight, further preferably 40-100 parts by weight, per 100 parts by weight of the organic polymer of component (A). When the amount of component (B) is less than 21 parts by weight, a sufficient rate of depth curability cannot be achieved. On the other hand, when the amount of component (B) exceeds 300 parts by weight, adhesiveness of the cured product to a substrate may decrease or surface weatherability of the cured product tends to decrease.In one or more embodiments of the present invention, a plasticizer other than the above-mentioned component (B) may be used. Examples of the plasticizer other than component (B) include phthalates such as dimethyl phthalate, diethyl phthalate, dibutyl phthalate, diisobutyl phthalate, dinormalhexyl phthalate, bis(2-ethylhexyl) phthalate, dinormaloctyl phthalate, diisononyl phthalate, dinonyl phthalate, diisodecyl phthalate, diisoundecyl phthalate, bisbutylbenzyl phthalate and the like; nonaromatic dibasic acid esters such as dioctyl adipate, dioctyl sebacate, dibutyl sebacate, diisodecyl succinate and the like; aliphatic esters butyl oleate, methyl acetylricinolate and the like; phosphates such as tricresyl phosphate, tributyl phosphate and the like; trimellitic acid esters; chlorinated paraffins; hydrocarbon oils such as alkyldiphenyl, partially hydrogenated terphenyl, and the like; process oils; epoxy plasticizers such as epoxydized soybean oil, benzyl epoxystearate and the like. A compound obtained by hydrogenaration of a phthalate compound can also be used. For example, diisononyl cyclohexane dicarboxylate obtained by hydrogenation of diisononyl phthalate is commercially available under the trade name Hexamoll DINCH, and can be used preferably.In addition, a polymer plasticizer can be used. When a polymer plasticizer is used, the initial property of a cured product can be maintained for a long term as compared to use of a low molecular weight plasticizer. Furthermore, when a polymer plasticizer is used and alkyd paint is applied to a cured product obtained from a curable composition, drying performance (also referred to as coatability) of the paint can be improved. As used herein, the polymer plasticizer means a plasticizer having a number average molecular weight of 1,000 or more.Examples of the polymer plasticizer include, but are not limited to, vinyl polymers obtained by polymerization vinyl monomers by various methods; polyalkylene glycol esters such as diethylene glycol dibenzoate, triethylene glycol dibenzoate, pentaerythritol ester and the like; polyesters obtained from dibasic acids such as sebacic acid, adipic acid, azelaic acid, phthalic acid and the like, and divalent alcohols such as ethylene glycol, diethylene glycol, triethylene glycol, propylene glycol, dipropylene glycol and the like; polyether polyols such as polyethylene glycol, polypropylene glycol, polytetramethylene glycol and the like having a molecular weight of 1,000 or more (preferably 1,500 or more); polyether polyol derivative wherein hydroxy group of polyether polyols is converted to ester group, ether group and the like (excluding diester compound obtained from polyethylene glycol and aliphatic monocarboxylic acid and/or alicyclic monocarboxylic acid); polystyrenes such as polystyrene, poly-α-methylstyrene and the like; polybutadiene, polybutene, polyisobutylene, butadiene-acrylonitrile copolymer, polychloroprene and the like.Of the above-mentioned polymer plasticizers, one having compatibility with the organic polymer of component (A) is preferable. In view thereof, polyether polyols, polyether polyol derivative, vinyl polymers are preferable. In addition, use of polyether polyols or polyether polyol derivative as a plasticizer is preferable since surface curability and depth curability are improved, and curing retardation after storage does not occur. Of these, polypropylene glycol is more preferable. From the aspects of compatibility, weatherability, and heat resistance, vinyl polymers are preferable. Of the vinyl polymers, (meth)acrylate-based polymers are preferable, and acrylate-based polymers such as poly(alkyl acrylate) and the like are more preferable. The synthesis method of the polymer is preferably the living radical polymerization method, more preferably the atom transfer radical polymerization, since the molecular weight distribution is narrow, and low viscosity can be achieved. In addition, a polymer obtained by continuous bulk polymerization of the alkyl acrylate-based monomer at a high temperature and high pressure as described in JP-A-2001-207157 (obtained by SGO process) is preferably used.The number average molecular weight of the polymer plasticizer is preferably 1000-15000, more preferably 1100-10000, further preferably 1200-8000, particularly preferably 1300-5000, most preferably 1500-3000. When the number average molecular weight is too low, the polymer plasticizer flows out over time due to heat and rainfall, the initial properties of the cured product cannot be maintained over a long term, and alkyd coatability cannot be improved. When the number average molecular weight is too high, the curable composition shows high viscosity and low workability. While the molecular weight distribution (Mw/Mn) of the polymer plasticizer is not particularly limited, less than 1.80 is preferable, not more than 1.70 is more preferable, not more than 1.60 is still more preferable, not more than 1.50 is further preferable, not more than 1.40 is particularly preferable, not more than 1.30 is most preferable. The number average molecular weight (Mn) is measured by GPC method in the case of a vinyl polymer, and by terminal analysis in the case of a polyether-based polymer. The molecular weight distribution (Mw/Mn) is measured by GPC method (based on polystyrene) in the case of vinyl polymer and polyether-based polymer.The polymer plasticizer may have a reactive silicone group. When a reactive silicone group is present, it acts as a reactive plasticizer, and prevents transfer of plasticizer from the cured product. When the polymer plasticizer has a reactive silicone group, the number of reactive silicone group per 1 molecule is preferably not more than 1, more preferably 0.8 on average. When a polymer plasticizer having a reactive silicone group, particularly an oxyalkylene polymer having a reactive silicone group or an acrylic polymer having a reactive silicone group is used, the number average molecular weight thereof needs to be lower than that of the polymer of component (A).Plasticizer other than component (B) may be used alone or two or more kinds thereof may be used in combination. A low molecular weight plasticizer and a polymer plasticizer may be used in combination. These plasticizers can also be added during production of the organic polymer of component (A). When a plasticizer other than component (B) is used, the amount thereof is preferably 5-150 parts by weight, more preferably 10-120 parts by weight, further preferably 20-100 parts by weight, per 100 parts by weight of the organic polymer of component (A). When the amount is less than 5 parts by weight, the effect of the plasticizer other than component (B) is not sufficiently exerted and when it exceeds 150 parts by weight, the mechanical strength of the cured product becomes insufficient. In one or more embodiments, component (B) alone is used as a plasticizer, i.e., the plasticizer preferably consists of component (B).In preferable embodiments, the diester compound of component (B) is at least one selected from the group consisting of triethylene glycol bis(2-ethylhexanoate), diethylene glycol dibutyrate, diethylene glycol dihexanoate, diethylene glycol bis(2-ethylhexanoate), diethylene glycol dioctoate, diethylene glycol bis(2-propylheptanoate), diethylene glycol dicyclohexanoate, triethylene glycol dibutyrate, triethylene glycol dihexanoate, triethylene glycol dioctoate, triethylene glycol bis(2-propylheptanoate), triethylene glycol dicyclohexanoate, tetraethylene glycol dibutyrate, tetraethylene glycol dihexanoate, tetraethylene glycol bis(2-ethylhexanoate), tetraethylene glycol dioctoate, tetraethylene glycol bis(2-propylheptanoate), tetraethylene glycol dicyclohexanoate, pentaethylene glycol dibutyrate, pentaethylene glycol dihexanoate, pentaethylene glycol bis(2-ethylhexanoate), pentaethylene glycol dioctoate, pentaethylene glycol bis(2-propylheptanoate), pentaethylene glycol dicyclohexanoate, and oligoethylene glycol bis(2-ethylhexanoate), and has a hydroxyl value of 10 mg KOH/g or less. In the description of the preferable embodiments, a limitation (modifier) on the aforementioned hydroxyl value modifies all of the aforementioned diester compounds.In more preferable embodiments, the diester compound of component (B) is triethylene glycol bis(2-ethylhexanoate) having a hydroxyl value of 5 mg KOH/g or less.<Component (C)>In one or more embodiments of the present invention, a curing catalyst is used as component (C). Component (C) acts as a silanol condensation catalyst for component (A). Examples of the curing catalyst of component (C) include, but are not limited to, the following:titanium compounds such as tetrabutyl titanate, tetrapropyl titanate, titanium tetrakis(acetylacetonate), bis(acetylacetonate)diisopropoxy titanium, diisopropoxy titanium bis(ethylacetoacetate) and the like;dibutyltin-based compounds such as dimethyltin diacetate, dimethyltin bis(acetylacetonate), dibutyltin dilaurate, dibutyltin maleate, dibutyltin phthalate, dibutyltin dioctanoate, dibutyltin bis(2-ethylhexanoate), dibutyltin bis(methylmaleate), dibutyltin bis(ethylmaleate), dibutyltin bis(butylmaleate), dibutyltin bis(octylmaleate), dibutyltin bis(tridecylmaleate), dibutyltin bis(benzylmaleate), dibutyltin diacetate, dibutyltin dimethoxide, dibutyltin bis(nonylphenoxide), dibutenyltin oxide, dibutyltin oxide, dibutyltin bis(acetylacetonate), dibutyltin bis(ethylacetoacetonate), a reaction product of dibutyltin oxide and silicate compound, a reaction product of dibutyltin oxide and phthalate and the like;dioctyltin-based compounds such as dioctyltin bis(ethylmaleate), dioctyltin bis(octylmaleate), dioctyltin dilaurate, dioctyltin diacetate, dioctyltin bis(acetylacetonate), dioctyltin diversatate, a reaction product of dioctyltin oxide and silicate compound and the like;aluminum compounds such as aluminum tris(acetylacetonate), aluminum tris(ethylacetoacetate), diisopropoxy aluminum ethylacetoacetate and the like;zirconium compounds such as zirconium tetrakis(acetylacetonate) and the like;carboxylic acid and/or metal carboxylate;amidine compounds such as 1-(o-tolyl)biguanide, 1-phenylguanidine, 1,2-dimethyl-1,4,5,6-tetrahydropyrimidine, 1,5,7-triazabicyclo[4.4.0]deca-5-en, 7-methyl-1,5,7-triazabicyclo[4.4.0]deca-5-en, amidine compound described in WO 2008/078654 and the like.As the curing catalyst of component (C), organotin compounds such as dibutyltin-based compound, dioctyltin-based compound and the like are preferable. Dibutyltin-based compounds are superior in the balance of curability, adhesiveness and the like, and widely used. In recent years, however, dibutyltin-based compounds are feared to show an adverse influence on the human body and, in such case, a dioctyltin-based compound can be used. As the dioctyltin-based compound, dioctyltin bis(acetylacetonate), dioctyltin dilaurate, dioctyltin diversatate, and a reaction product of dioctyltin and a silicate compound are industrially available and preferable.From the aspects of depth curability of a curable composition, improvement of adhesiveness of a cured product to a substrate and the like, an amidine compound is preferable, and 1-phenylguanidine is more preferable as the curing catalyst of component (C).The amount of the curing catalyst of component (C) is preferably 0.01-20 parts by weight, more preferably 0.1-10 parts by weight, per 100 parts by weight of the organic polymer of component (A). When the amount of the curing catalyst is 0.01-20 parts by weight, the curable composition shows superior curability and adequate curing time, and is superior in workability.<Other Components>In one or more embodiments, the curable composition of the present invention may contain components other than the aforementioned components (A)-(C) (other components). Such other components are explained below.In one or more embodiments, the curable composition of the present invention can contain aminosilane. Aminosilane is a compound having a reactive silicone group and an amino group in a molecule, and is generally referred to as an adhesion-imparting agent. When the curable composition containing same is used for various adherends, for example, inorganic substrates such as glass, aluminum, stainless, zinc, copper, mortar and the like, organic substrates such as vinyl chloride, acrylic, polyester, polyethylene, polypropylene, polycarbonate and the like, aminosilane shows a remarkable adhesiveness-improving effect under nonprimer conditions or primer treatment conditions. When a curable composition containing aminosilane is used under nonprimer conditions, particularly, an adhesiveness-improving effect on various adherends is remarkable. In addition, aminosilane is a compound capable of functioning as a property-controlling agent, an inorganic filler dispersibility-improving agent and the like.As a reactive silicone group of aminosilane, groups already exemplified above can be mentioned. As the hydrolyzable group aminosilane has, methoxy group, ethoxy group and the like are preferable from the aspect of the hydrolysis rate. The number of hydrolyzable groups is preferably two or more, particularly 3 or more.Examples of the aminosilane include amino group-containing silanes such as γ-aminopropyltrimethoxysilane, γ-aminopropyltriethoxysilane, γ-aminopropyltriisopropoxysilane, γ-aminopropylmethyldimethoxysilane, γ-aminopropylmethyldiethoxysilane, γ-(2-aminoethyl)aminopropyltrimethoxysilane, γ-(2-aminoethyl)aminopropylmethyldimethoxysilane, γ-(2-aminoethyl)aminopropyltriethoxysilane, γ-(2-aminoethyl)aminopropylmethyldiethoxysilane, γ-(2-aminoethyl)aminopropyltriisopropoxysilane, γ-(2-(2-aminoethyl)aminoethyl)aminopropyltrimethoxysilane, γ-(6-aminohexyl)aminopropyltrimethoxysilane, 3-(N-ethylamino)-2-methylpropyltrimethoxysilane, γ-ureidopropyltrimethoxysilane, γ-ureidopropyltriethoxysilane, N-phenyl-γ-aminopropyltrimethoxysilane, N-benzyl-γ-aminopropyltrimethoxysilane, N-vinylbenzyl-γ-aminopropyltriethoxysilane, N-cyclohexylaminomethyltriethoxysilane, N-cyclohexylaminomethyldiethoxymethylsilane, N-phenylaminomethyltrimethoxysilane, (2-aminoethyl)aminomethyltrimethoxysilane, N,N′-bis[3-(trimethoxysilyl)propyl]ethylenediamine and the like; ketimine silanes such as N-(1,3-dimethylbutylidene)-3-(triethoxysilyl)-1-propaneamine and the like.To secure good adhesiveness, γ-aminopropyltrimethoxysilane, γ-(2-aminoethyl)aminopropyltrimethoxysilane, and γ-(2-aminoethyl)aminopropylmethyldimethoxysilane are preferable. Only one kind of aminosilane may be used, or two or more kinds thereof may be used in combination. γ-(2-Aminoethyl)aminopropyltrimethoxysilane shows stimulation as compared to other aminosilanes. The stimulation can be mitigated by reducing the amount of γ-(2-aminoethyl)aminopropyltrimethoxysilane, and additionally using γ-aminopropyltrimethoxysilane and the like.When aminosilane is used, the amount thereof is preferably 1-20 parts by weight, more preferably 2-10 parts by weight, per 100 parts by weight of the organic polymer of component (A). When this amount is less than 1 part by weight, the cured product may fail to show sufficient adhesiveness. On the other hand, when this amount exceeds 20 parts by weight, the cured product becomes brittle, cannot afford sufficient strength, and the curing rate of the curable composition may become slow.In one or more embodiments, an adhesion-imparting agent other than aminosilane can be used for the curable composition of the present invention. Examples of the adhesion-imparting agent other than aminosilane include epoxy group-containing silanes such as γ-glycidoxypropyltrimethoxysilane, γ-glycidoxypropyltriethoxysilane, γ-glycidoxypropylmethyldimethoxysilane, β-(3,4-epoxycyclohexyl)ethyltrimethoxysilane, β-(3,4-epoxycyclohexyl)ethyltriethoxysilane, glycidoxyoctyltrimethoxysilane and the like; isocyanate group-containing silanes such as γ-isocyanatepropyltrimethoxysilane, γ-isocyanatepropyltriethoxysilane, γ-isocyanatepropylmethyldiethoxysilane, γ-isocyanatepropylmethyldimethoxysilane, (isocyanatemethyl)trimethoxysilane, (isocyanatemethyl)dimethoxymethylsilane and the like; mercapto group-containing silanes such as γ-mercaptopropyltrimethoxysilane, γ-mercaptopropyltriethoxysilane, γ-mercaptopropylmethyldimethoxysilane, γ-mercaptopropylmethyldiethoxysilane, mercaptomethyltriethoxysilane and the like; carboxysilanes such as β-carboxyethyltriethoxysilane, β-carboxyethylphenylbis(2-methoxyethoxy)silane, N-β-(carboxymethyl)aminoethyl-γ-aminopropyltrimethoxysilane and the like; vinyl unsaturated group-containing silanes such as vinyltrimethoxysilane, vinyltriethoxysilane, γ-methacryloyloxypropylmethyldimethoxysilane, γ-acryloyloxypropylmethyltriethoxysilane and the like; halogen-containing silanes such as γ-chloropropyltrimethoxysilane and the like; isocyanurate silanes such as tris(trimethoxysilyl)isocyanurate and the like, and the like. In addition, a condensation product obtained by partially condensing the above-mentioned silanes can also be used. Furthermore, amino-modified silyl polymer, silylated amino polymer, unsaturated aminosilane complex, phenylamino long-chain alkylsilane, aminosilylated silicone, silylated polyester and the like, which are derivatives obtained by modifying them can be used as adhesion-imparting agents other than aminosilane. When the aforementioned adhesion-imparting agent other than aminosilane is used, the amount thereof is generally preferably 0.1-20 parts by weight, more preferably 0.5-10 parts by weight, per 100 parts by weight of the organic polymer of component (A).To secure good adhesiveness, γ-glycidoxypropyltrimethoxysilane, γ-glycidoxypropyltriethoxysilane, γ-glycidoxypropylmethyldimethoxysilane, and glycidoxyoctyltrimethoxysilane are preferable. Glycidoxyoctyltrimethoxysilane is more preferable since it has an effect to improve adhesiveness of the cured product under wet conditions.Besides the above-mentioned adhesion-imparting agents, for example, epoxy resin, phenol resin, sulfur, alkyl titanates, aromatic polyisocyanate and the like can be used as adhesion-imparting agents. Only one kind of the above-mentioned adhesion-imparting agent may be used, or two or more kinds thereof may be used in combination. However, since the epoxy resin sometimes lowers the catalyst activity depending on the amount to be added, a small amount of an epoxy resin is preferably added to the curable composition of one or more embodiments of the present invention. The amount of the epoxy resin to be used is preferably not more than 5 parts by weight, more preferably not more than 0.5 parts by weight, per 100 parts by weight of the organic polymer of component (A), and the substantial absence of an epoxy resin in the curable composition is further preferable.In one or more embodiments, the depth curability can be improved more by further using an ethylene glycol structure-containing silane coupling agent. As an example of the ethylene glycol structure-containing silane coupling agent, trade name: X-12-641 manufactured by Shin-Etsu Chemical Co., Ltd. can be recited. When an ethylene glycol structure-containing silane coupling agent is used, the amount thereof is preferably 1-15 parts by weight, more preferably 3-10 parts by weight, per 100 parts by weight of the organic polymer of component (A).In one or more embodiments, the curable composition of the present invention can contain an antioxidant (anti-aging agent). When an antioxidant is used, heat resistance of the cured product can be increased. Examples of the antioxidant include hindered phenol-based antioxidant, monophenol-based antioxidant, bisphenol-based antioxidant, and polyphenol-based antioxidant, and hindered phenol-based antioxidant is particularly preferable. Specific examples of the antioxidant are described in JP-A-4-283259 and JP-A-9-194731. When an antioxidant is used, the amount thereof is preferably 0.1-10 parts by weight, more preferably 0.2-5 parts by weight, per 100 parts by weight of the organic polymer of component (A).In one or more embodiments, the curable composition of the present invention can contain a light stabilizer. When a light stabilizer is used, photooxidation degradation of the cured product can be prevented. Examples of the light stabilizer include benzotriazole-based light stabilizer, hindered amine-based light stabilizer, benzoate-based light stabilizer and the like, and hindered amine-based light stabilizer is particularly preferable. When a light stabilizer is used, the amount thereof is preferably 0.1-10 parts by weight, more preferably 0.2-5 parts by weight, per 100 parts by weight of the organic polymer of component (A). Specific examples of the light stabilizer are described in JP-A-9-194731.In one or more embodiments, when the curable composition of the present invention contains a photocurable substance (particularly, unsaturated acrylic compound), as described in JP-A-5-70531, a tertiary amine-containing hindered amine-based light stabilizer is preferably used as the hindered amine-based light stabilizer, since storage stability of the curable composition can be improved. Examples of the tertiary amine-containing hindered amine-based light stabilizer include Tinuvin 622 LD, Tinuvin 144, CHIMASSORB 119FL (all the above manufactured by BASF Japan Ltd.); MARK LA-57, LA-62, LA-67, LA-63 (all the above manufactured by ADEKA CORPORATION); Sanol LS-765, LS-292, LS-2626, LS-1114, LS-744 (all the above manufactured by BASF Japan Ltd.) and the like.In one or more embodiments, the curable composition of the present invention can contain an ultraviolet absorber. When an ultraviolet absorber is used, surface weatherability of the cured product can be enhanced. Examples of the ultraviolet absorber include benzophenone-based ultraviolet absorber, benzotriazole-based ultraviolet absorber, salycilate-based ultraviolet absorber, substituted tolyl ultraviolet absorber and metal chelate-based ultraviolet absorber and the like, and benzotriazole-based ultraviolet absorber is particularly preferable. When an ultraviolet absorber is used, the amount thereof is preferably 0.1-10 parts by weight, more preferably 0.2-5 parts by weight, per 100 parts by weight of the organic polymer of component (A). A combined use of phenol-based antioxidant and/or hindered phenol-based antioxidant, and hindered amine-based light stabilizer, and benzotriazole-based ultraviolet absorber is preferable.In one or more embodiments, the curable composition of the present invention can contain one or more kinds of fillers. Examples of the filler include reinforcing fillers such as fumed silica, precipitated silica, crystal silica, molten silica, dolomite, silicic anhydride, hydrous silicate, carbon black and the like; fiber fillers such as glass fiber and filament and the like; ground calcium carbonate, colloidal calcium carbonate (e.g., colloidal calcium carbonate surface-treated with fatty acid), magnesium carbonate, diatomite, calcined clay, clay, talc, titanium oxide (e.g., rutile titanium oxide), bentonite, organic bentonite, ferric oxide, aluminum fine powder, flint powder, zinc oxide, activated zinc oxide, shirasu balloon, glass micro balloon, organic micro balloon made from phenol resin or vinylidene chloride resin, resin powder such as PVC powder, PMMA powder and the like, and the like. When a filler is used, the amount thereof is preferably 1-250 parts by weight, more preferably 10-200 parts by weight, per 100 parts by weight of the organic polymer of component (A).When a cured product having a high strength is desired, a filler mainly selected from fumed silica, precipitated silica, crystal silica, molten silica, dolomite, silicic anhydride, hydrous silicate, carbon black, surface-treated fine calcium carbonate, calcined clay, clay, activated zinc oxide and the like is preferably used. When the aforementioned filler is used, the amount thereof is preferably 1-200 parts by weight per 100 parts by weight of the organic polymer of component (A).When a cured product having a low strength and high breaking elongation is desired, a filler mainly selected from titanium oxide, calcium carbonate such as ground calcium carbonate and the like, magnesium carbonate, talc, ferric oxide, zinc oxide, shirasu balloon and the like is preferably used. When the aforementioned filler is used, the amount thereof is preferably 5-200 parts by weight, per 100 parts by weight of the organic polymer of component (A).Generally, when the specific surface area of calcium carbonate is higher, the improvement effect on the breaking strength, breaking elongation, adhesiveness of the cured product becomes higher. When calcium carbonate is used, surface-treated fine calcium carbonate and calcium carbonate having a large particle size such as ground calcium carbonate and the like are preferably used in combination. The particle size of the surface-treated fine calcium carbonate is preferably not more than 0.5 μm, and the surface treatment thereof is preferably a fatty acid treatment or a fatty acid salt treatment. The particle size of the calcium carbonate having a large particle size is preferably 1 μm or more. As calcium carbonate having a large particle size, one free of a surface treatment can be used.In addition, the thermally expandable hollow granules described in JP-A-2004-51701, JP-A-2004-66749 and the like can be used. Thermally expandable hollow granule is a plastic sphere obtained by covering a low boiling point compound such as hydrocarbon having 1-5 carbon atoms and the like with an outer shell polymer material (vinylidene chloride copolymer, acrylonitrile-based copolymer, or vinylidene chloride-acrylonitrile copolymer) into a sphere. When an adhesion part formed using a curable composition containing thermally expandable hollow granules is heated, the gas pressure in the shell of the thermally expandable hollow granules increases, and the outer shell polymer material is softened to dramatically increase the volume, whereby the adhesive interface can be detached.In one or more embodiments, the curable composition of the present invention is used as an adhesive for joint of exterior walls of housing such as sizing board, particularly ceramic sizing board, and the like or for exterior wall tiles, an adhesive for exterior wall tiles, which remains in the joint, and the like, since chemical resistance of a cured product is good and the like. When the curable composition of the present invention is used in a sealing material, it is desirable to match the design of an exterior wall and the design of the sealing material. Particularly, when the curable composition of the present invention is used in a sealing material used for exterior walls with high grade by sputter coating, mixing with colored aggregate and the like, a scale-like or granular substance having a diameter of not less than 0.1 mm, preferably about 0.1-5.0 mm, is preferably contained in the curable composition of the present invention. A cured product containing a scale-like or granular substance matches with high grade exterior walls. When a granular substance is used, the obtained cured product has a sand-like or sandstone-like rough surface, and when a scale-like substance is used, the cured product has a concavo-convex surface caused by the scale-like substance.Preferable diameter, amount, material and the like of the scale-like or granular substance are as follows as described in JP-A-9-53063. The diameter thereof is preferably 0.1 mm or more, more preferably 0.1-5.0 mm, and a scale-like or granular substance having a suitable size is used according to the material, pattern and the like of the exterior wall. A scale-like or granular substance having a diameter of 0.2-5.0 mm or 0.5-5.0 mm can also be used. When a scale-like substance is used, the thickness thereof is 1/10-⅕ (0.01-1.00 mm) of the diameter.The scale-like or granular substance is added at 1-200 parts by weight per 100 parts by weight of the curable composition. The amount is appropriately determined according to the size of individual scale-like or granular substances, and material, pattern and the like of the exterior wall. As a scale-like or granular substance, naturally occurring substances such as silica sand, mica and the like, synthetic rubber, synthetic resin, alumina and the like are used. To enhance the design aspect when filled in a joint, a scale-like or granular substance painted in a suitable color according to the material, pattern and the like of the exterior wall may also be used.When a balloon (preferably having an average particle size of not less than 0.1 mm) is used in the curable composition of the present invention, the obtained cured product has a sand-like or sandstone-like rough surface, and reduces the weight of the cured product. Preferable diameter, amount, material and the like of the balloon are as follows as described in JP-A-10-251618.A balloon is a sphere having a hollow inside. Examples of the balloon include, but are not limited to, an inorganic balloon comprising a material of glass, shirasu, silica and the like, and an organic balloon comprising a material of phenol resin, urea resin, polystyrene, saran and the like. In addition, a composite balloon constituted of an inorganic material and an organic material, or a balloon having plural layers can also be used. Furthermore, a balloon having a processed or coated surface can also be used. In addition, a balloon having a surface treated with various kinds of surface treating agents can also be used. Examples of the surface-treated balloon include an organic balloon coated with calcium carbonate, talc, titanium oxide and the like, an inorganic balloon surface-treated with an adhesion-imparting agent and the like.To afford a cured product having a sand-like or sandstone-like rough surface, the balloon preferably has a particle size of not less than 0.1 mm. A balloon having a particle size of 0.2 mm-5.0 mm or 0.5 mm-5.0 mm can also be used. When the size is less than 0.1 mm, the viscosity of the cured product is merely increased and a cured product having a rough surface sometimes cannot be achieved. The amount of the balloon can be appropriately determined according to the surface roughness of the cured product. Generally, a balloon having a particle size of 0.1 mm or more is preferably added in an amount of 5-25 vol % in the curable composition. When the amount of the balloon is less than 5 vol %, a cured product with a rough surface cannot be formed, and when the amount exceeds 25 vol %, the curable composition has high viscosity and degraded workability, and the cured product has high modulus and the basic property thereof tends to be impaired. The amount of the balloon curable in the composition is more preferably 8-22 vol %.When a balloon is used, a slip preventive described in JP-A-2000-154368, and amine compound described in JP-A-2001-164237, which affords a matte surface of a cured product, particularly primary and/or secondary amine having a melting point of not less than 35° C., can be added.Specific examples of the balloon are shown in JP-A-2-129262, JP-A-4-8788, JP-A-4-173867, JP-A-5-1225, JP-A-7-113073, JP-A-9-53063, JP-A-10-251618, JP-A-2000-154368, JP-A-2001-164237, WO97/05201 and the like.Even when the curable composition of the present invention contains cured product particles for a sealing material, the cured product forms concaves and convexes on the surface thereof and improve the design. The preferable diameter, amount to be added, material and the like of the cured product particles for a sealing material are as follows as described in JP-A-2001-115142. The diameter thereof is preferably 0.1 mm-1 mm, more preferably about 0.2-0.5 mm. The amount thereof in the curable composition is preferably 5-100 wt %, more preferably 20-50 wt %. While the material thereof is not limited as long as it can be used as cured product particles for a sealing material, examples thereof include urethane resin, silicone, modified silicone, polysulfide rubber and the like, and modified silicone is preferable.In addition, in one or more embodiments the curable composition of the present invention can contain silicate. The silicate acts as a crosslinking agent and has a function to improve recovery property, durability, and creep resistance of a cured product. Furthermore, silicate also has an effect to improve the adhesiveness and water-resistant adhesiveness, as well as adhesion durability under high temperature and high humidity conditions. As silicate, tetraalkoxysilane or a partially hydrolyzed condensate thereof can be used. When silicate is used, the amount thereof is 0.1-20 parts by weight, preferably 0.5-10 parts by weight, per 100 parts by weight of the organic polymer of component (A).Examples of the silicate include tetraalkoxysilanes (tetraalkylsilicates) such as tetramethoxysilane, tetraethoxysilane, ethoxytrimethoxysilane, dimethoxydiethoxysilane, methoxytriethoxysilane, tetra-n-propoxysilane, tetra-i-propoxysilane, tetra-n-butoxysilane, tetra-i-butoxysilane, tetra-t-butoxysilane and the like, and a partially hydrolyzed condensate thereof.The partially hydrolyzed condensate of tetraalkoxysilane is preferable since it shows a greater improvement effect on the recovery property, durability and creep resistance of a cured product than with tetraalkoxysilane. As the aforementioned partially hydrolyzed condensate of tetraalkoxysilane, for example, one obtained by adding water to tetraalkoxysilane to allow partial hydrolysis and then condensation thereof by a conventional method can be mentioned. In addition, as the partially hydrolyzed condensate of organosilicate compound, a commercially available product can be used. As such condensates, for example, methyl silicate 51, ethyl silicate 40 (both manufactured by COLCOAT CO., LTD.) and the like can be mentioned.In one or more embodiments, a tackifier resin can be added to the curable composition of the present invention. While the tackifier resin is not particularly limited, one generally used irrespective of being solid or liquid at ambient temperature can be used. Examples of the tackifier resin include styrene copolymer and a hydrogenated product thereof (particularly, styrene-based block copolymer and a hydrogenated product thereof), phenol resin, modified phenol resin (e.g., cashew oil-modified phenol resin, tall oil-modified phenol resin etc.), terpene phenol resin, xylene phenol resin, cyclopentadiene-phenol resin, coumarone indene resin, rosin resin, rosin ester resin, hydrogenated rosin ester resin, xylene resin, low molecular weight polystyrene-based resin, petroleum resin (e.g., C5 hydrocarbon resin, C9 hydrocarbon resin, C5C9 hydrocarbon copolymerized resin etc.), hydrogenated petroleum resin, terpene-based resin, DCPD resin petroleum resin and the like. Examples of the styrene-based block copolymer and the hydrogenated product thereof include styrene-butadiene-styrene block copolymer (SBS), styrene-isoprene-styrene block copolymer (SIS), styrene-ethylenebutylene-styrene block copolymer (SEBS), styrene-ethylenepropylene-styrene block copolymer (SEPS), styrene-isobutylene-styrene block copolymer (SIBS) and the like. The above-mentioned tackifier resin may be used alone, or two or more kinds thereof may be used in combination. When a tackifier resin is used, the amount thereof is preferably 5-1,000 parts by weight, more preferably 10-100 parts by weight, per 100 parts by weight of the organic polymer of component (A).In one or more embodiments, a property-controlling agent may be added to the curable composition of the present invention as necessary to adjust the tensile property of the resulting cured product. Examples of the property-controlling agent include, but are not particularly limited to, alkylalkoxysilanes such as methyltrimethoxysilane, dimethyldimethoxysilane, trimethylmethoxysilane, n-propyltrimethoxysilane and the like; alkoxysilanes having a functional group such as alkylisopropenoxysilanes such as dimethyldiisopropenoxysilane, methyltriisopropenoxysilane, γ-glycidoxypropylmethyldiisopropenoxysilane and the like, γ-glycidoxypropylmethyldimethoxysilane, γ-glycidoxypropyltrimethoxysilane, vinyltrimethoxysilane, vinyldimethylmethoxysilane, γ-aminopropyltrimethoxysilane, N-(β-aminoethyl)aminopropylmethyldimethoxysilane, γ-mercaptopropyltrimethoxysilane, γ-mercaptopropylmethyldimethoxysilane and the like; silicone varnishes; polysiloxanes and the like. In one or more embodiments, when using the aforementioned property-controlling agent, the hardness of the cured product obtained from the curable composition of the present invention can be adjusted to above or below, and the breaking elongation of the cured product can be improved. The above-mentioned property-controlling agent may be used alone, or two or more kinds thereof may be used in combination.Particularly, a compound that produces a compound having a monovalent silanol group by hydrolysis has an action to decrease the modulus of a cured product without worsening the stickiness of the surface of the cured product. Particularly, a compound that produces trimethylsilanol is preferable. As the compound that produces a compound having a monovalent silanol group by hydrolysis, the compound described in JP-A-5-117521 can be mentioned. In addition, for example, a derivative of alkylalcohol such as hexanol, octanol, decanol and the like, which produces R3SiOH (e.g., trimethylsilanol etc.) by hydrolysis; a derivative of polyvalent alcohol having 3 or more hydroxy groups such as trimethylolpropane, glycerol, pentaerythritol, sorbitol and the like, which produces R3SiOH (e.g., trimethylsilanol etc.) by hydrolysis and is described in JP-A-11-241029; can be mentioned.In addition, a derivative of an oxypropylene polymer, which produces R3SiOH (e.g., trimethylsilanol etc.) by hydrolysis and is described in JP-A-7-258534 can also be mentioned. Furthermore, a polymer having a crosslinkable reactive silicon-containing group and a silicon-containing group that produces monosilanol by hydrolysis and is described in JP-A-6-279693 can also be used.When a property-controlling agent is used, the amount thereof to be used is preferably 0.1-20 parts by weight, more preferably 0.5-10 parts by weight, per 100 parts by weight of the organic polymer of component (A).In one or more embodiments, a thixotropy-imparting agent (anti-sagging agent) may be added to the curable composition of the present invention as necessary to prevent sagging and improve workability. Examples of the thixotropy-imparting agent include, but are not particularly limited, polyamide waxes; hydrogenated castor oil derivatives; metal soaps such as calcium stearate, aluminum stearate, barium stearate and the like, and the like. When a rubber powder having a particle size of 10-500 μm described in JP-A-11-349916 or an organic fiber described in JP-A-2003-155389 is used as a thixotropy-imparting agent, a curable composition showing high thixotropy and good workability can be obtained. Such thixotropy-imparting agents may be used alone or two or more kinds thereof may be used in combination. When a thixotropy-imparting agent is used, the amount thereof is preferably 0.1-20 parts by weight, per 100 parts by weight of the organic polymer of component (A).In one or more embodiments of the curable composition of the present invention, a compound having an epoxy group and free of a silicon atom can be used. By the use of the compound, the recovery property of the cured product can be increased. As the compound, epoxydized unsaturated fats and oils, epoxydized unsaturated fatty acid esters, alicyclic epoxy compounds, epichlorohydrin derivative and mixtures thereof and the like can be mentioned as examples. Specifically, epoxydized soy bean oil, epoxydized linseed oil, bis(2-ethylhexyl)-4,5-epoxycyclohexane-1,2-dicarboxylate (E-PS), epoxyoctyl stearate, epoxybutyl stearate and the like can be mentioned. Of these, E-PS is particularly preferable. When the compound is used, the amount thereof is preferably 0.5-50 parts by weight per 100 parts by weight of the organic polymer of component (A).In one or more embodiments, a photocurable substance can be used in the cured composition of the present invention. When a photocurable substance is used, a film of the photocurable substance is formed on the surface of the cured product, the stickiness and weather resistance can be improved. The photocurable substance produces curing (crosslinking) by the action of light. As the photocurable substance, organic monomer, oligomer resin, a composition containing same and the like are known. As a photocurable substance, a commercially available product can be used. As a photocurable substance, an unsaturated acrylic compound, polyvinyl cinnamate, for example, an azidated resin and the like can be mentioned.Examples of the unsaturated (meth)acrylic compound include monomers, oligomers and a mixture thereof, having plural (meth)acryloyl groups which are monomers such as ethylene glycol di(meth)acrylate, propylene glycol di(meth)acrylate, butylene glycol di(meth)acrylate, neopentyl glycol di(meth)acrylate and the like, oligoesters or polyesters having a molecular weight of 10,000 or below constituted of the aforementioned monomers. Specifically, special acrylate (bifunctional) Aronix M-210, Aronix M-215, Aronix M-220, Aronix M-233, Aronix M-240, Aronix M-245; (trifunctional) Aronix M-305, Aronix M-309, Aronix M-310, Aronix M-315, Aronix M-320, Aronix M-325, and (multifunctional) Aronix M-400 (each of Aronix above is a product of Toagosei Co., Ltd.) and the like can be mentioned as examples. Particularly, a compound containing an acryloyl group is preferable, and a compound containing not less than 3 acryloyl groups on average in one molecule is more preferable.Examples of the polyvinyl cinnamate include polyvinyl cinnamate derivative, and a photosensitive resin having a cinnamoyl group obtained by esterification of polyvinyl alcohol with cinnamic acid. The azidated resin is a photosensitive resin having an azido group. “Photosensitive Resin” (Insatsu Gakkai Shuppanbu Ltd., page 93-, page 106-, page 117-, Mar. 17, 1972) discloses detailed examples of azidated resin.The photocurable substance may be used singly, or used in combination with a sensitizer and/or a promoter as necessary. Examples of the sensitizer include ketones, nitro compound and the like and examples of the promoter include amines and the like.When a photocurable substance is used, the amount thereof is preferably 0.1-20 parts by weight, more preferably 0.5-10 parts by weight, per 100 parts by weight of the organic polymer of component (A). When the amount is less than 0.1 part by weight, the weather resistance is not enhanced, and when the amount is more than 20 parts by weight, the cured product becomes too hard and tends to crack.In one or more embodiments, the composition of the present invention can contain an oxygen curable substance. As the oxygen curable substance, an unsaturated compound reactive with oxygen in the air can be mentioned as an example. The oxygen curable substance reacts with oxygen in the air to form a cured film near the surface of the cured product, thereby preventing stickiness of the surface and attachment of dirt and dust on the surface of the cured product and the like. Examples of the oxygen curable substance include dry oil such as tung oil, linseed oil and the like, alkyd resins obtained by modifying dry oil; acrylate-based polymer modified by dry oil; epoxy resin; silicone resin; liquid polymers such as 1,2-polybutadiene, 1,4-polybutadiene, C5-C8 diene polymer and the like obtained by polymerization or copolymerization of diene compounds such as butadiene, chloroprene, isoprene, 1,3-pentadiene and the like; liquid copolymers such as NBR, SBR and the like obtained by copolymerization of diene compounds and copolymerizable monomers (ex. acrylonitrile, styrene and the like), such that the diene compound becomes the main component, modified products of the above-mentioned oxygen curable substance (maleic modified products, boil oil modified products and the like) and the like. They may be used singly, or two or more kinds thereof may be used in combination. Of these, tung oil and liquid diene polymer are preferable. In addition, a combined use of a catalyst promoting the oxidation curing reaction or a metal dryer may enhance the effect. As such catalyst and metal dryer, metal salts such as cobalt naphthenate, lead naphthenate, zirconium naphthenate, cobalt octylate, zirconium octylate and the like, amine compounds and the like can be mentioned as examples. When an oxygen curable substance is used, the amount thereof is preferably 0.1-20 parts by weight, more preferably 0.5-10 parts by weight, per 100 parts by weight of the organic polymer of content (A). When the aforementioned amount is less than 0.1 part by weight, improvement of staining property becomes insufficient, and when it exceeds 20 parts by weight, the tensile property and the like of the cured product tend to be impaired. As described in JP-A-3-160053, the oxygen curable substance is preferably used in combination with a photocurable substance.In one or more embodiments, the curable composition of the present invention can contain a flame-retardant such as a phosphorus plasticizer such as ammonium polyphosphate, tricresyl phosphate and the like, aluminum hydroxide, magnesium hydroxide, thermally expandable black lead and the like. The flame-retardant may be used singly, or two or more kinds thereof may be used in combination. When a flame-retardant is used, the amount thereof is preferably 5-200 parts by weight, more preferably 10-100 parts by weight, per 100 parts by weight of the organic polymer of content (A).In one or more embodiments, of the curable composition of the present invention, a solvent can be used to reduce the viscosity thereof, increase thixotropy, and improve workability. The solvent is not particularly limited, and examples thereof include hydrocarbon solvents such as toluene, xylene, heptane, hexane, petroleum solvent and the like, halogenated solvent such as trichloroethylene and the like, ester solvents such as ethyl acetate, butyl acetate and the like, ketone solvents such as acetone, methyl ethyl ketone, methyl isobutyl ketone and the like, alcohol solvents such as methanol, ethanol, isopropyl alcohol and the like, silicone solvent such as hexamethylcyclotrisiloxane, octamethylcyclotetrasiloxane, decamethylcyclopentasiloxane and the like. These solvent may be used alone or two or more kinds thereof may be used in combination.To reduce air contamination and the like, the boiling point of the solvent is preferably not less than 150° C., more preferably not less than 200° C., further preferably not less than 250° C. When the amount of the solvent in the curable composition is high, the obtained cured product may show volumetric shrinkage and the like. Therefore, the amount of the solvent is preferably not more than 3 parts by weight, more preferably not more than 1 part by weight, per 100 parts by weight of the organic polymer of component (A), and the substantial absence of a solvent is most preferable.In one or more embodiments, additives other than those mentioned above may be added to the curable composition of the present invention as necessary to adjust various properties of a curable composition or a cured product. Examples of such additive include curability adjusting agent, radical inhibitor, metal deactivator, antiozonant, phosphorus peroxide decomposer, lubricant, pigment, foaming agent, repellent for ants, fungicide and the like. Only one kind of these various additives may be used, or two or more kinds thereof may be used in combination. Specific examples of the additive are recited in JP-B-4-69659, JP-B-7-108928, JP-A-63-254149, JP-A-64-22904, JP-A-2001-72854 and the like.In one or more embodiments, a dehydrating agent may be added to the curable composition of the present invention. Examples of the dehydrating agent include synthetic zeolite, activated alumina, silica gel, calcium oxide, magnesium oxide, alkoxysilane compound (e.g., n-propyltrimethoxysilane, vinyltrimethoxysilane, vinylmethyldimethoxysilane, methylsilicate, ethylsilicate, γ-mercaptopropylmethyldimethoxysilane, γ-mercaptopropylmethyldiethoxysilane, γ-glycidoxypropyltrimethoxysilane etc.), oxazolidine compound (e.g., -ethyl-2-methyl-2-(3-methylbutyl)-1,3-oxazolidine etc.), isocyanate compound and the like. When a dehydrating agent is used, the amount thereof is preferably 0.1-20 parts by weight, more preferably 0.5-10 parts by weight, per 100 parts by weight of the organic polymer of component (A).<Preparation of Curable Composition>In one or more embodiments, the curable composition of the present invention may be a one-component composition prepared by adding all components, which cures due to the humidity in the air. In addition, in one or more embodiments the curable composition of the present invention may be a two-component composition wherein the first composition is prepared by blending component (C) (curing catalyst) and other components (e.g., filler, plasticizer, water etc.), the second composition is separately prepared by blending component (A), component (B) and other components as necessary, and the first composition and the second composition are mixed before use. Also, in one or more embodiments the curable composition of the present invention may be a multi-component composition wherein three or more compositions are separately prepared, and they are mixed before use. From the aspect of workability, a one-component composition is preferable.In one or more embodiments, when the curable composition of the present invention is prepared as a one-component composition, a component containing moisture is preferably used after dehydration drying in advance or dehydrated during kneading by depressurization and the like. When a solid such as powder and the like is dehydrated or dried, a heat-drying method or a reduced pressure dehydrating method is preferable. When a liquid is dehydrated or dried, a reduced pressure dehydrating method or a method using a dehydrating agent is preferable.The production method of curable compositions of the present invention is not particularly limited, and a general method including blending the above-mentioned components, kneading the mixture in a mixer, roll, kneader and the like at ambient temperature or under heating, or dissolving the components in a small amount of a solvent and mixing same can be employed.<Cured Product>In one or more embodiments, when the curable composition of the present invention is exposed to the air, it three-dimensionaly forms a network tissue and is cured into a cured product having rubbery elasticity due to the action of moisture.<Use>In one or more embodiments, the curable composition of the present invention can be used as a pressure-sensitive adhesive, a sealing material for structures, boats and ships, automobiles, roads and the like, adhesive, pattern-making agent, vibration-proof material, damping material, acoustic insulation, foamed material, paint, spraying material and the like. In one or more embodiments, a cured product obtained by curing the curable composition of the present invention is superior in flexibility and adhesiveness. Therefore, in one or more embodiments the curable composition of the present invention is more preferably used as a sealing material or an adhesive.In addition, in one or more embodiments the curable composition of the present invention can be used for various uses including electric or electronic component materials such as solar battery rear surface sealant and the like, electrical insulating materials such as insulation covering material for electric wire or cable and the like, elastic adhesive, contact-type adhesive, spray-type sealing material, crack repairing material, tiling adhesive, powder coating, casting material, medical rubber material, medical adhesive, medical equipment sealing material, food packaging material, joint sealing material for jacket material such as sizing board and the like, coating material, primer, conductive material for shielding electromagnetic wave, thermally conductive material, hot melt material, electric/electronic potting agent, film, gasket, various molding material, as well as rustproof or waterproof sealing material for wire glass or laminate glass end surface (cut section), liquid sealant used for automobile parts, electric parts, various machine components and the like, and the like. Moreover, since the curable composition of the present invention alone or with the aid of a primer can be closely adhered to a wide range of substrates such as glass, porcelain, wood, metal, resin molded products and the like, it can also be used as various types of tight-sealing composition or adhesive composition. Furthermore, in one or more embodiments the curable composition of the present invention can be used as adhesive for interior panels, adhesive for exterior panels, tiling adhesive, stone finishing adhesive, ceiling finishing adhesive, floor finishing adhesive, wall finishing adhesive, vehicle paneling adhesive, adhesive for assembly of electric or electronic or precision equipments, sealing material for direct glazing, multi-layer glass sealing material, sealing material for SSG method, sealing material for structure working joints or water-proof material combinedly using asphalt.As compared to conventional plasticizers, a diester compound as component (B) which is obtained from polyethylene glycol and aliphatic monocarboxylic acid and/or alicyclic monocarboxylic acid promotes moisture supply to the inside of a curable composition, and therefore, can enhance the depth curability of a curable composition. Hence, in one or more embodiments the curable composition of the present invention is particularly useful as a one-component composition which is cured by the humidity in the air. When a filler and the like are used in a two-component or multi-component composition using water as a component, moisture may not be sufficiently supplied to the inside of the composition obtained by mixing all components before use. However, since the curable composition of the present invention using the aforementioned component (B) promotes uptake of humidity in the air, it is also useful as a two-component or multi-component composition (particularly, two-component or multi-component composition using a filler and the like and resistant to easy supply of moisture into the inside). In addition, since the curable composition of the present invention shows small discoloration, in one or more embodiments it can be preferably used as a transparent composition free of a white filler such as calcium carbonate.EXAMPLESThe present invention is specifically explained by referring to Examples and Comparative Examples, which are not to be construed as limitative.Synthetic Example 1Polymerization of propyleneoxide was performed using a 1/1 (weight ratio) mixture of polyoxypropylene diol having a number average molecular weight of about 2,000 and polyoxypropylene triol having a number average molecular weight of about 3,000 as an initiator and a zinc hexacyanocobaltate glyme complex catalyst, to give polypropyleneoxide containing terminal hydroxy group having a number average molecular weight of about 19,000 (GPC measurement value, solution delivery system: HLC-8120GPC manufactured by Tosoh Corporation, column: TSK-GEL H type manufactured by Tosoh Corporation, solvent: THF, based on polystyrene). Then, a solution of NaOMe (1.2 molar equivalents relative to the hydroxy group of the terminal hydroxy group-containing polypropyleneoxide) in methanol was added, methanol was evaporated, and allyl chloride (1.7 molar equivalents relative to the hydroxy group) was further added to convert the terminal hydroxy group to an allyl group to give allyl-terminal polypropyleneoxide.n-Hexane (300 parts by weight) and water (300 parts by weight) were added to the obtained unpurified allyl-terminal polypropyleneoxide (100 parts by weight), and the obtained mixture was stirred, water was removed by centrifugation to give a hexane solution. To the obtained hexane solution was further added water (300 parts by weight) and the obtained mixture was stirred. Water was removed by centrifugation again, and hexane was removed by evaporation under reduced pressure. From the above, allyl group-terminal polypropyleneoxide having a number average molecular weight of about 19,000 was obtained.The allyl group-terminal polypropyleneoxide (100 parts by weight) after the above-mentioned purification was reacted with methyldimethoxysilane (1.35 parts by weight) at 90° C. for 2 hr, using an isopropanol solution (36 weight ppm) of platinum vinylsiloxane complex with platinum content 3 wt % as a catalyst to give polyoxypropylene-based polymer (A-1) having a methyldimethoxysilyl group. As a result of the GPC measurement (solution delivery system: HLC-8120GPC manufactured by Tosoh Corporation, column: TSK-GEL H type manufactured by Tosoh Corporation, solvent: THF), the number average molecular weight (Mn) of polymer (A-1) was 19,000, and the molecular weight distribution (Mw/Mn) thereof was 1.31. As a result of the 1H-NMR measurement (apparatus: JNM-LA400 manufactured by JEOL, solvent: CDCl3), polymer (A-1) had 1.7 methyldimethoxysilyl groups on average in one molecule. As a result of the DSC measurement, polymer (A-1) had a glass transition temperature of −59° C.Synthetic Example 2Polymerization of propyleneoxide was performed using polyoxypropylene diol having a number average molecular weight of about 2,000 as an initiator and a zinc hexacyanocobaltate glyme complex catalyst, to give polypropyleneoxide containing terminal hydroxy group having a number average molecular weight of about 28,500 (molecular weight based on polystyrene by a method similar to Synthetic Example 1). Then, a solution of NaOMe (1.2 molar equivalents relative to the hydroxy group of the terminal hydroxy group-containing polypropyleneoxide) in methanol was added, methanol was evaporated, and allyl chloride (1.7 molar equivalents relative to the hydroxy group to convert the terminal hydroxy group) was further added to an allyl group to give allyl-terminal polypropyleneoxide.n-Hexane (300 parts by weight) and water (300 parts by weight) were added to the obtained unpurified allyl-terminal polypropyleneoxide (100 parts by weight), and the obtained mixture was stirred, water was removed by centrifugation to give a hexane solution. To the obtained hexane solution was further added water (300 parts by weight) and the obtained mixture was stirred. Water was removed by centrifugation again, and hexane was removed by evaporation under reduced pressure. From the above, allyl group-terminal polypropyleneoxide having a number average molecular weight of about 28,500 was obtained.The allyl group-terminal polypropyleneoxide (100 parts by weight) after the above-mentioned purification was reacted with methyldimethoxysilane (0.96 part by weight) at 90° C. for 2 hr, using an isopropanol solution (36 weight ppm) of platinum vinylsiloxane complex with platinum content 3 wt % as a catalyst to give polyoxypropylene-based polymer (A-2) having a methyldimethoxysilyl group. As a result of the GPC measurement (solution delivery system: HLC-8120GPC manufactured by Tosoh Corporation, column: TSK-GEL H type manufactured by Tosoh Corporation, solvent: THF), the number average molecular weight (Mn) of polymer (A-2) was 28,500, and the molecular weight distribution (Mw/Mn) thereof was 1.25. As a result of the 1H-NMR measurement (apparatus: JNM-LA400 manufactured by JEOL, solvent: CDCl3), polymer (A-2) had 1.6 methyldimethoxysilyl groups on average in one molecule. As a result of the DSC measurement, polymer (A-2) had a glass transition temperature of −59° C.Synthetic Example 3Copper(I) bromide (28.4 g) and acetonitrile (390 mL) were charged in a 10 L flask, and the mixture was stirred with heating under a nitrogen stream at 70° C. for 20 min. Thereto were added diethyl 2,5-dibromoadipate (59.3 g), n-butyl acrylate (2540 mL), ethyl acrylate (610 mL), and stearyl acrylate (710 mL), and the mixture was further stirred with heating at 80° C. for 20 min. Thereto was added pentamethyldiethylenetriamine (hereinafter to be referred to as triamine) (4.1 mL) to start the reaction. Furthermore, triamine (1.4 mL) was added. The mixture was continuously stirred with heating at 80° C., during which triamine (1.4 mL) was added. At 180 min from the start of the reaction, the inside of the reaction container was depressurized, and volatile components were removed. At 240 min from the start of the reaction, acetonitrile (1180 mL), 1,7-octadiene (490 mL) and triamine (13.8 mL) were added, and the mixture was continuously stirred with heating at 80° C., and at 620 min from the start of the reaction, heating was stopped. The reaction solution was heated under reduced pressure to remove volatile components, and the mixture was diluted with toluene and filtered. The filtrate was concentrated to give a polymer. The obtained polymer, hydrotalcite (trade name: KYOWAAD 500SH manufactured by Kyowa Chemical Industry Co., Ltd., 2 parts by weight per 100 parts by weight of the polymer) and aluminum silicate (trade name: KYOWAAD 700SL manufactured by Kyowa Chemical Industry Co., Ltd., 2 parts by weight per 100 parts by weight of the polymer) were mixed with xylene (100 parts by weight per 100 parts by weight of the polymer), and the mixture was stirred at 130° C. After 3 hr, the mixture was filtered to remove hydrotalcite and aluminum silicate. The filtrate was heated under reduced pressure to evaporate volatile components to give a polymer. The obtained polymer was subjected to heating evaporation (degree of vacuum 10 torr or less) at 180° C. for 12 hr to eliminate Br group from the polymer.The obtained polymer, hydrotalcite (trade name: KYOWAAD 500SH manufactured by Kyowa Chemical Industry Co., Ltd., 3 parts by weight per 100 parts by weight of the polymer) and aluminum silicate (trade name: KYOWAAD 700SL manufactured by Kyowa Chemical Industry Co., Ltd., 3 parts by weight per 100 parts by weight of the polymer) were mixed with xylene (100 parts by weight per 100 parts by weight of the polymer) and the mixture was stirred at 130° C. After 5 hr, the mixture was filtered to remove hydrotalcite and aluminum silicate and the filtrate was heated under reduced pressure to evaporate volatile components to give an alkenyl-terminal polymer. Then, the above-mentioned polymer (233 g), methyldimethoxysilane (25.5 mL), dimethyl orthoformate (3.8 mL), and platinum catalyst were charged in a 2000 mL pressure glass reaction container. The amount of the platinum catalyst to be used was 2×10−4 molar equivalents relative to the alkenyl group of the polymer. The reaction mixture was heated at 100° C. for 3 hr. The volatile components in the mixture was evaporated under reduced pressure to give a acrylate-based polymer (A-3) having a methyldimethoxysilyl group on the terminal. As a result of the GPC measurement (solution delivery system: HLC-8120GPC manufactured by Tosoh Corporation, column: TSK-GEL H type manufactured by Tosoh Corporation, solvent: THF, based on polystyrene), the number average molecular weight (Mn) of polymer (A-3) was 27,000, and the molecular weight distribution (Mw/Mn) thereof was 1.31. As a result of the 1H-NMR measurement (apparatus: JNM-LA400 manufactured by JEOL, solvent: CDCl3), polymer (A-3) had 1.7 methyldimethoxysilyl groups on average in one molecule. As a result of the DSC measurement, polymer (A-3) had a glass transition temperature of −33° C.Synthetic Example 4To ACCLAIM POLYOL 12200 of Sumika Bayer Urethane Co., Ltd. (polypropylene glycol having a number average molecular weight of about 11,000) (100 parts by weight) was added 3-isocyanatepropyltrimethoxysilane (trade name: Y-5187 manufactured by Momentive Performance Materials) (3.3 parts by weight), and the mixture was reacted at 90° C. for 2 hr in the presence of a mercapto tin-based catalyst, NEOSTAN U-360 (manufactured by Nitto Kasei Co., Ltd.) (30 weight ppm). The disappearance of the peak (2272 cm−1) of isocyanate group was confirmed by IR and the reaction was terminated to give a polyoxypropylene-based polymer (A-4) having a urethane bond in the main chain and a trimethoxysilyl group on the terminal. As a result of the GPC measurement (solution delivery system: HLC-8120GPC manufactured by Tosoh Corporation, column: TSK-GEL H type manufactured by Tosoh Corporation, solvent: THF, based on polystyrene), the number average molecular weight (Mn) of polymer (A-4) was 16,000, and the molecular weight distribution (Mw/Mn) thereof was 2.00. As a result of the 1H-NMR measurement (apparatus: JNM-LA400 manufactured by JEOL, solvent: CDCl3), polymer (A-4) had 1.9 trimethoxysilyl groups on average in one molecule. As a result of the DSC measurement, polymer (A-4) had a glass transition temperature of −59° C.Synthetic Example 5The allyl group-terminal polypropyleneoxide (100 parts by weight) after the above-mentioned purification, which was obtained in Synthetic Example 2, and trimethoxysilane (1.10 parts by weight) were reacted at 90° C. for 2 hr using an isopropanol solution (36 weight ppm) of platinum vinylsiloxane complex with platinum content 3 wt % as a catalyst to give polyoxypropylene-based polymer (A-5) having a trimethoxysilyl group. As a result of the GPC measurement (solution delivery system: HLC-8120GPC manufactured by Tosoh Corporation, column: TSK-GEL H type manufactured by Tosoh Corporation, solvent: THF), the number average molecular weight (Mn) of polymer (A-5) was 28,500, and the molecular weight distribution (Mw/Mn) thereof was 1.25. As a result of the 1H-NMR measurement (apparatus: JNM-LA400 manufactured by JEOL, solvent: CDCl3), polymer (A-5) had 1.6 trimethoxysilyl groups on average in one molecule. As a result of the DSC measurement, polymer (A-5) had a glass transition temperature of −59° C.Synthetic Example 6Using 0.02 molar equivalent of zinc chloride as a catalyst, (methoxymethyl)trimethoxysilane produced by reference to the method described in Example 2 of JP-A-2007-513203 was reacted with 4 molar equivalents of acetyl chloride. By reaction for 36 hr under heated under reflux conditions, (methoxymethyl)trichlorosilane was synthesized. (Methoxymethyl)trichlorosilane purified by distillation and 1 mol equivalent of methyldichlorosilane (trade name: LS-50 manufactured by Shin-Etsu Chemical Co., Ltd.) were mixed, methyltributylammonium chloride (0.05 molar equivalent) was added, and the mixture was reacted under heating under reflux conditions for 3 hr. Methoxymethyldichlorosilane was obtained at an about 50% conversion ratio. (Methoxymethyl)dichlorosilane purified by distillation and 2.5 molar equivalents of trimethyl orthoacetate were charged in a reaction container, and (methoxymethyl)dichlorosilane was slowly added while stirring thoroughly. The addition rate was adjusted so that the temperature of the reaction mixture would not exceed 50° C. After the completion of addition, almost quantitative conversion of (methoxymethyl)dichlorosilane to (methoxymethyl)dimethoxysilane was confirmed by 1H-NMR spectrum. 1H-NMR was measured using JNM-LA400 manufactured by JEOL and in CDCl3 solvent, and analyzed with the peak of CHCl3 as 7.26 ppm. Purification by distillation under reduced pressure gave (methoxymethyl)dimethoxysilane1H-NMR (400 MHz, CDCl3) of (methoxymethyl)dimethoxysilane: δ 4.52 (t, 1H), 3.60 (s, 6H), 3.35 (s, 3H), 3.19 (d, 2H).The allyl group-terminal polypropyleneoxide (100 parts by weight) after the above-mentioned purification, which was obtained in Synthetic Example 1, and (methoxymethyl)dimethoxysilane (1.86 parts by weight) were reacted at 90° C. for 2 hr using an isopropanol solution (36 weight ppm) of platinum vinylsiloxane complex with platinum content 3 wt % as a catalyst to give polyoxypropylene-based polymer (A-6) having a (methoxymethyl)dimethoxysilyl group. As a result of the GPC measurement (solution delivery system: HLC-8120GPC manufactured by Tosoh Corporation, column: TSK-GEL H type manufactured by Tosoh Corporation, solvent: THF), the number average molecular weight (Mn) of polymer (A-6) was 20,500, and the molecular weight distribution (Mw/Mn) thereof was 1.34. As a result of the 1H-NMR measurement (apparatus: JNM-LA400 manufactured by JEOL, solvent: CDCl3), polymer (A-6) had 1.5 (methoxymethyl)dimethoxysilyl groups on average in one molecule. As a result of the DSC measurement, polymer (A-6) had a glass transition temperature of −59° C.Example 1The reactive silicone group-containing polyoxypropylene-based polymer (A-1) (100 parts by weight) obtained in Synthetic Example 1, triethylene glycol bis(2-ethylhexanoate) (trade name: OXSOFT 3G8 manufactured by OXEA, hydroxyl value: 1.5 mgKOH/g) (55 parts by weight) as a plasticizer, colloidal calcium carbonate surface-treated with fatty acid (trade name: HAKUENKA CCR manufactured by Shiraishi Calcium Kaisha, Ltd.) (120 parts by weight), rutile titanium oxide (trade name: TIPAQUE R-820 manufactured by ISHIHARA SANGYO KAISHA, LTD.) (20 parts by weight), thixotropy-imparting agent (trade name: DISPARLON 6500 manufactured by Kusumoto Chemicals, Ltd.) (2 parts by weight), hindered amine-based light stabilizer (trade name: TINUVIN 770 manufactured by BASF Japan Ltd.) (1 part by weight), and benzotriazole-based ultraviolet absorber (trade name: TINUVIN 326 manufactured by BASF Japan Ltd.) (1 part by weight) were mixed and thoroughly kneaded. The mixture was passed 3 times through a triple paint roll to give a mixture. The obtained mixture was dehydrated under reduced pressure at 120° C. for 2 hr, cooled to 50° C. or less, added with vinyltrimethoxysilane (trade name: Dynasylan VTMO manufactured by EVONIK) (2 parts by weight) as a dehydrating agent, γ-(2-aminoethyl)aminopropyltrimethoxysilane (trade name: Dynasylan DAMO manufactured by EVONIK) (3 parts by weight) as an adhesion-imparting agent, and finally, dibutyltin bis(acetylacetonate)(manufactured by Nitto Kasei Co., Ltd., trade name: NEOSTAN U-220H) (2 parts by weight) as a curing catalyst and the mixture was kneaded to give a one-component curable composition. This was sealed in a moisture-proof cartridge substantially free of moisture.Example 2In the same manner as in Example 1 except that the amount of triethylene glycol bis(2-ethylhexanoate) was set to 30 parts by weight, and a phthalate-based plasticizer, diisodecyl phthalate (trade name: DIDP manufactured by J-PLUS Co., Ltd.) (25 parts by weight) was used, a curable composition was obtained.Example 3In the same manner as in Example 1 except that reactive silicone group-containing polyoxypropylene-based polymer (A-2) (50 parts by weight) obtained in Synthetic Example 2 and acrylate-based polymer (A-3) (50 parts by weight) obtained in Synthetic Example 3 was used instead of reactive silicone group-containing polyoxypropylene-based polymer (A-1), a curable composition was obtained.Example 4In the same manner as in Example 1 except that reactive silicone group-containing polyoxypropylene-based polymer (A-4) (100 parts by weight) obtained in Synthetic Example 4 was used instead of reactive silicone group-containing polyoxypropylene-based polymer (A-1), and dioctyltin dilaurate (manufactured by Nitto Kasei Co., Ltd., trade name: NEOSTAN U-810) (0.3 parts by weight) was used as a curing catalyst instead of dibutyltin bisacetylacetonate, a curable composition was obtained.Example 5In the same manner as in Example 4 except that γ-glycidoxypropyltrimethoxysilane (trade name: KBM-403 manufactured by Shin-Etsu Chemical Co., Ltd.) (2 parts by weight) was further added, a curable composition was obtained.Example 6In the same manner as in Example 4 except that glycidoxyoctyltrimethoxysilane (trade name: KBM-4803 manufactured by Shin-Etsu Chemical Co., Ltd.) (2 parts by weight) was further added, a curable composition was obtained.Example 7In the same manner as in Example 4 except that reactive silicone group-containing polyoxypropylene-based polymer (A-5) (100 parts by weight) obtained in Synthetic Example 5 was used instead of reactive silicone group-containing polyoxypropylene-based polymer (A-4), a curable composition was obtained.Example 8In the same manner as in Example 7 except that phenylguanidine solution (3 parts by weight) instead of dioctyltin dilaurate was used as a curing catalyst, a curable composition was obtained. The phenylguanidine solution is a 45 wt % concentration solution wherein 1-phenylguanidine (product of NIPPON CARBIDE INDUSTRIES CO., INC.) is dissolved in N-butylbenzenesulfonamide (trade name: TOPCIZER No. 7 manufactured by Fuji Amide Chemical Co., Ltd.).Example 9In the same manner as in Example 8 except that an ethylene glycol structure-containing silane coupling agent (trade name: X-12-641 manufactured by Shin-Etsu Chemical Co., Ltd.) (3 parts by weight) was further used, a curable composition was obtained.Example 10In the same manner as in Example 8 except that reactive silicone group-containing polyoxypropylene-based polymer (A-6) (100 parts by weight) obtained in Synthetic Example 6 was used instead of reactive silicone group-containing polyoxypropylene-based polymer (A-5), and the amount of phenylguanidine solution was changed to 1 part by weight, a curable composition was obtained.Comparative Example 1In the same manner as in Example 1 except that diisodecyl phthalate (55 parts by weight) was used instead of triethylene glycol bis(2-ethylhexanoate), a curable composition was obtained.Comparative Example 2In the same manner as in Example 3 except that diisodecyl phthalate (55 parts by weight) was used instead of triethylene glycol bis(2-ethylhexanoate), a curable composition was obtained.Comparative Example 3In the same manner as in Example 1 except that diethylene glycol dibenzoate (trade name: MONOCIZER PB-3A manufactured by DIC Corporation) (55 parts by weight) was used instead of triethylene glycol bis(2-ethylhexanoate), a curable composition was obtained.Comparative Example 4In the same manner as in Example 1 except that bis(2-ethylhexyl) adipate (trade name: DOA manufactured by DAIHACHI CHEMICAL INDUSTRY CO., LTD.) (55 parts by weight) was used instead of triethylene glycol bis(2-ethylhexanoate), a curable composition was obtained.Comparative Example 5In the same manner as in Example 1 except that polypropylene glycol having a number average molecular weight of 3000 (trade name: ACTCALL P-23 manufactured by Mitsui Takeda Chemicals, Inc., hydroxyl value: 38 mgKOH/g) (55 parts by weight) was used instead of triethylene glycol bis(2-ethylhexanoate), a curable composition was obtained.Comparative Example 6In the same manner as in Example 1 except that poly(oxyethyleneoxypropylene)glycol monoether having a number average molecular weight of 240 (trade name: NEWPOL 50HB-55 manufactured by Sanyo Chemical Industries, Ltd., oxyethylene group amount: 50 mol %, hydroxyl value: 234 mgKOH/g) (55 parts by weight) was used instead of triethylene glycol bis(2-ethylhexanoate), a curable composition was obtained.Comparative Example 7In the same manner as in Example 1 except that poly(oxyethyleneoxypropylene)glycol monoether having a number average molecular weight of 1800 (trade name: NEWPOL 50HB-660 manufactured by Sanyo Chemical Industries, Ltd., oxyethylene group amount: 50 mol %, hydroxyl value: 31 mgKOH/g) (55 parts by weight) was used instead of triethylene glycol bis(2-ethylhexanoate), a curable composition was obtained.Comparative Example 8In the same manner as in Example 1 except that polyethylene glycol having a number average molecular weight of 600 (trade name: Poly-G21-187 manufactured by Arch Chemicals, hydroxyl value: 187 mgKOH/g) (55 parts by weight) was used instead of triethylene glycol bis(2-ethylhexanoate), a curable composition was obtained.The kind and amount of the components in the curable compositions obtained Examples 1-10 and Comparative Examples 1-8 are shown in the following Tables 1-4. The unit of the amount of the components shown in the following Tables 1-4 is parts by weight.TABLE 1Ex. 1Ex. 2Ex. 3Ex. 4Ex. 5organicpolymer (A-1)100100polymerpolymer (A-2)50(componentpolymer (A-3)50(A))polymer (A-4)100100plasticizertriethylene glycol5530555555bis(2-ethylhexanoate)(component (B))diisodecyl phthalate25curingdibutyltin222catalystbis(acetylacetonate)(componentdioctyltin dilaurate0.30.3(C))calcium carbonate120120120120120titanium oxide2020202020thixotropy-imparting agent22222ultraviolet absorber11111light stabilizer11111vinyltrimethoxysilane22222γ-(2-aminoethyl)amino-33333propyltrimethoxysilaneγ-glycidoxypropyltri-2methoxysilane TABLE 2Ex. 6Ex. 7Ex. 8Ex. 9Ex. 10organicpolymer (A-4)100polymerpolymer (A-5)100100100componentpolymer (A-6)100((A))plasticizertriethylene glycol5555555555bis(2-ethylhexanoate)(component (B))curingdioctyltin dilaurate0.30.3catalystphenylguanidine331(componentsolution(C))calcium carbonate120120120120120titanium oxide2020202020thixotropy-imparting agent22222ultraviolet absorber11111light stabilizer11111vinyltrimethoxysilane22222γ-(2-aminoethyl)amino-33333propyltrimethoxysilaneglycidoxyoctyltrimethoxysilane2ethylene glycol structure-3containing silane coupling agent TABLE 3Com. Ex. 1Com. Ex. 2Com. Ex. 3Com. Ex. 4organic polymerpolymer (A-1)100100100(component (A))polymer (A-2)50polymer (A-3)50plasticizerdiisodecyl phthalate5555diethylene glycol dibenzoate55bis(2-ethylhexyl) adipate55curing catalystdibutyltin bis(acetylacetonate)2222(component (C))calcium carbonate120120120120titanium oxide20202020thixotropy-imparting agent2222ultraviolet absorber1111light stabilizer1111vinyltrimethoxysilane2222γ-(2-aminoethyl)aminopropyltrimethoxysilane3333 TABLE 4Com. Ex. 5Com. Ex. 6Com. Ex. 7Com. Ex. 8organic polymerpolymer (A-1)100100100100(component (A))plasticizerpolypropylene glycol (Mn 3000)55poly(oxyethyleneoxypropylene)glycol55monoether (Mn 240)poly(oxyethyleneoxypropylene)glycol55monoether (Mn 1800)polyethylene glycol (Mn 600)55curing catalystdibutyltin bis(acetylacetonate)2222(component (C))calcium carbonate120120120120titanium oxide20202020thixotropy-imparting agent2222ultraviolet absorber1111light stabilizer1111vinyltrimethoxysilane2222γ-(2-aminoethyl)aminopropyltrimethoxysilane3333 (Property Evaluation)The skin formation time, depth curability, viscosity, adhesiveness to substrate of the curable compositions obtained in Examples 1-10 and Comparative Examples 1-8 were measured. The results are shown in the following Tables 5 and 6.(Skin Formation Time)The curable compositions produced in Examples 1-10 and Comparative Examples 1-8 were filled in a moisture-proof paper/aluminum cartridge (manufactured by Showa Marutsutsu Co., Ltd., volume 330 ml) and stored at 23° C. and 50% RH conditions for 7 days to allow for sufficient chemical dehydration in a curable composition. The curable composition was spread on a corrugated board with a spatula to a thickness of about 3 mm under the conditions of 23° C. and 50% RH, and the time up to when the curable composition gently touched on its surface with a microspatula no longer stayed on the microspatula was measured as “initial skin formation time (A)”.Then, another curable composition filled in a moisture-proof paper/aluminum cartridge was stored in a dryer at 50° C. for 4 weeks, then under the conditions of 23° C. and 50% RH for one day, the curable composition was taken out from the cartridge and, in the same manner as in the measurement of initial skin formation time (A), the time up to when the composition no longer stayed on the microspatula was measured as “skin formation time (B) after storage at 50° C. for 4 weeks”.In addition, the “ratio of skin formation time (B) after storage at 50° C. for 4 weeks/initial skin formation time (change ratio of skin formation time (B)/(A))” was calculated. The (B)/(A) is also shown in the following Tables 5 and 6.(Depth Curability)Under the conditions of 23° C. and 50% RH, the above-mentioned curable composition was filled in a polyethylene tube (diameter 12 mm) while preventing entry of bubbles, the surface was leveled with a spatula, and a specimen was prepared. The specimen was left standing for 7 days under the conditions of 23° C. and 50% RH, the surface cured part was peeled off, the uncured part was completely removed, and the thickness of the cured part was measured with a vernier caliper.(Viscosity)Under the conditions of 23° C. and 50% RH, the above-mentioned curable composition was filled in a 100 cc cup while preventing entry of bubbles. Using a BS-type viscometer manufactured by Tokimec, Inc. and rotor No. 7, the viscosity of the curable composition was measured at a rotating speed of 2 rpm under the conditions of 23° C. and 50% RH.(Adhesiveness to Substrate)The above-mentioned curable composition was placed in close adhesion to a soft polyvinyl chloride substrate (manufactured by Taiyukizai Co., LTD., JIS K6744 pearl gray) or a rigid polyvinyl chloride substrate (manufactured by NIHON TACT, JIS K6745 gray), the surfaces of which were wiped and washed with ethanol in advance, and aged under constant temperature and humidity conditions at 23° C. and 50% RH for 7 days to form a cured product (dry conditions). The interface between the obtained cured product and the substrate was cut with a razor blade, the cured product was pull in a 90 degree direction, and the destruction state of the cured product obtained under dry conditions was observed.In addition, the cured product formed on the substrate under the above-mentioned dry conditions was immersed in pure water, and the cured product was aged in the immersion stated in the pure water in a dryer at 50° C. for 7 days (wet conditions). The water temperature of pure water, in which the cured product was immersed, was lowered to 23° C., the cured product was taken out, lightly dried, the interface between the cured product and the substrate was cut with a razor blade, the cured product was pulled in a 90 degree direction, and the destruction state of the cured product obtained under wet conditions was observed.The destruction state of the cured product was observed, and cohesive failure (CF) or interfacial failure (AF) was judged. In the following Tables 5 and 6, 100% cohesive failure is indicated as C100, 100% interfacial failure is indicated as A100 and, for example, 50% cohesive failure and 50% interfacial failure is indicated as C50/A50. The cohesive failure means destruction of a cured product itself, and a cured product that underwent cohesive failure shows good adhesiveness to a substrate.TABLE 5Ex. 1Ex. 2Ex. 3Ex. 4Ex. 5Ex. 6Ex. 7Ex. 8Ex. 9Ex. 10skin formationinitial (A) (min)20204010101020303535timeafter storage at 50° C.606012010151525252530for 4 weeks(B) (min)(B)/(A)3.03.03.01.01.51.51.30.80.80.9depth curability (mm)11.69.510.911.510.510.310.210.010.211.0viscosity (Pa · s)880900965103011201140113011601150960adhesivenesssoft polyvinyl chlorideC100C50/C100A100A100A100C90/C100C100C100to substrate(dry conditions)A50A10rigid polyvinylA100A100C100A100A100A100C100C100C100C100chloride(dry conditions)soft polyvinyl chlorideC100C100C100A100C10/C100A100C100C100C100(wet conditions)A90rigid polyvinylA100A100C100A100C90/C100A100C100C100C100chlorideA10(wet conditions) TABLE 6Com. Ex. 1Com. Ex. 2Com. Ex. 3Com. Ex. 4Com. Ex. 5Com. Ex. 6skin formationinitial (A) (min)253525302020timeafter storage at 50° C.90 min180 min6 hr or24 hr or20 min80 minfor 4 weeks(B)moremore(B)/(A)3.65.114.4 or48 or1.04.0moremoredepth curability (mm)8.17.410.910.511.011.5viscosity (Pa · s)9501175156582012601020adhesivenesssoft polyvinyl chlorideA100C100A100A100C100C100to substrate(dry conditions)rigid polyvinylA100C100A100A100C100C100chloride(dry conditions)soft polyvinyl chlorideA100C100C100C10/C15/C100(wet conditions)A90A85rigid polyvinylC100C100A100C50/C100C100chlorideA50(wet conditions)(note)Since liquid came out from the cured products obtained in Comparative Examples 7 and 8, property evaluation thereof was not performed. The curable composition of Example 1 using triethylene glycol bis(2-ethylhexanoate) as a plasticizer shows fast initial skin formation time (curability), even after storage under 50° C. conditions for 4 weeks, delay in skin formation time (degradation of curability) is small, and can be preferably used over a long term. The curable composition of Example 1 shows low change ratio (B)/(A) of skin formation time, good storage stability, low viscosity, superior workability, and superior depth curability, as compared to the curable composition of Comparative Example 1 using a conventional phthalate-based plasticizer (diisodecyl phthalate).Triethylene glycol bis(2-ethylhexanoate) has good compatibility with conventional phthalate-based plasticizers and, as shown in the results of Example 2, triethylene glycol bis(2-ethylhexanoate) and conventional phthalate-based plasticizers (diisodecyl phthalate) can be used in combination.A curable composition containing a reactive silicone group-containing acrylate-based polymer as component (A) had a low workability due to high viscosity and delayed depth curability as compared to curable compositions containing a reactive silicone group-containing polyoxyalkylene-based polymer. However, as is clear from the comparison of Example 3 and Comparative Example 2, in one or more embodiments workability and depth curability of a curable composition containing a reactive silicone group-containing acrylate-based polymer can be improved by using component (B) in the present invention.As is clear from the comparison of Example 1 using reactive silicone group-containing polyoxypropylene-based polymer (A-1) alone as component (A) and Example 3 using reactive silicone group-containing polyoxypropylene-based polymer (A-2) and reactive silicone group-containing acrylate-based polymer (A-3), use of a reactive silicone group-containing acrylate-based polymer as component (A) can improve adhesiveness to rigid polyvinyl chloride. The results show that component (B) in the present invention is preferably used in combination with a reactive silicone group-containing acrylate-based polymer.As shown in Example 4, component (B) in the present invention can be preferably used as a plasticizer for a curable composition containing polyoxypropylene-based polymer (A-4) having a urethane bond in the main chain and trimethoxysilyl group on the terminal. The curable composition of Example 4 has a change ratio (B)/(A) of skin formation time, which is 1, and was free of curing retardation due to the storage. However, the cured product obtained from the curable composition of Example 4 was hard and inferior in the adhesiveness to a substrate, possibly because polymer (A-4) has a comparatively small number average molecular weight, and the amount of the silyl group introduced into the terminal is high.The cured products obtained from the curable compositions of Examples 5 and 6, which are the curable composition of Example 4 further added with an epoxy group-containing silane coupling agent (γ-glycidoxypropyltrimethoxysilane or glycidoxyoctyltrimethoxysilane) showed improved adhesiveness to a substrate under wet conditions. Example 6 using glycidoxyoctyltrimethoxysilane showed more superior adhesiveness under wet conditions than Example 5 using γ-glycidoxypropyltrimethoxysilane. The results reveal that an epoxy group-containing silane coupling agent and having a greater number of carbon atoms between glycidoxy group and silyl group provides more superior improvement effect on the adhesiveness to a substrate.A comparison of Examples 7 and 8 reveals that, when reactive silicone group-containing polyoxypropylene-based polymer (A-5) is used, the adhesiveness to a substrate can be improved by using an amidine compound (phenylguanidine solution) as component (C) instead of a dioctyltin-based compound (dioctyltin dilaurate).A comparison of Examples 8 and 9 reveals that the depth curability of a curable composition can be improved by using an ethylene glycol structure-containing silane coupling agent. A small improving effect on the depth curability is considered to be attributable to a small amount of an ethylene glycol structure-containing silane coupling agent used.In the curable composition of Example 10 containing polyoxypropylene-based polymer (A-6) having a (methoxymethyl)dimethoxysilyl group, the amount of the amidine compound (phenylguanidine solution) was small but the skin formation time was short. In addition, the curable composition of Example 10 was also superior in the properties other than the skin formation time.The curable composition of Comparative Example 3 containing diethylene glycol as a plasticizer was superior in depth curability but showed a high change ratio (B)/(A) of the skin formation time and markedly lowered curing rate after storage.The curable composition of Comparative Example 4 containing bis(2-ethylhexyl) adipate which is a plasticizer frequently used for polyvinyl chloride resins also showed a high change ratio (B)/(A) of the skin formation time and markedly lowered curing rate after storage.The curable composition of Comparative Example 5 containing polypropylene glycol having a number average molecular weight of 3000 as a plasticizer showed high viscosity as compared to the curable composition of Example 1.The curable composition of Comparative Example 6 containing poly(oxyethyleneoxypropylene)glycol monoether having a number average molecular weight of 240 as a plasticizer showed a high change ratio (B)/(A) of the skin formation time and tended to show lowered curing rate after storage. These are assumed to be the effect of the high hydroxyl value (234 mg KOH/g) of the plasticizer (poly(oxyethyleneoxypropylene)glycol monoether) used in Comparative Example 6.The cured products formed from the curable composition of Comparative Example 7 containing poly(oxyethyleneoxypropylene)glycol monoether having a number average molecular weight of 1800 as a plasticizer showed a phenomenon of liquid leak. When the curable composition of Comparative Example 8 containing polyethylene glycol having a number average molecular weight of 600 as a plasticizer was spread with a spatula to a thickness of about 3 mm on corrugated board and the surface thereof was observed 24 hr later, it exuded a liquid.From the results of the aforementioned Examples and Comparative Examples, it is clear that the molecular weight of the plasticizer used and the amount of oxyethylene contained therein influence compatibility with component (A). Among many ester compounds, a diester compound obtained from polyethylene glycol and aliphatic monocarboxylic acid and/or alicyclic monocarboxylic acid is particularly suitable as a plasticizer for a one-component curable composition using component (A).INDUSTRIAL APPLICABILITYIn one or more embodiments, the curable composition of the present invention is useful for sealing materials, adhesives, coating materials, water-proof materials and the like.This application is based on a patent application No. 2013-268738 filed in Japan, the contents of which are incorporated in full herein.Although the disclosure has been described with respect to only a limited number of embodiments, those skilled in the art, having benefit of this disclosure, will appreciate that various other embodiments may be devised without departing from the scope of the present invention. Accordingly, the scope of the invention should be limited only by the attached claims. 





 

Previous Patent: Densified Cellulose Ester PelletsNext Patent: POLYESTER PLASTICIZERS WITH BENZOIC ACID END-CAPS











Home


Search


Services


Communities


Help


Contact us

Advertise on this Site










            © 2004-2017 FreePatentsOnline.com. All rights reserved.
            Privacy Policy
                & Terms of Use.
A SumoBrain Solutions Company


 



















Binder resin for toner and toner - Mitsui Chemicals, Inc.






































Login
                    
Sign up
                    









Search
                            





                                    Expert Search


                                    Quick Search








Patents/Apps
                                




                                    Non-Patent Literature
                                












SEARCH


                            RESEARCH



                            MPEP 2.0



                            TOOLS & RESOURCES
                        



                            ACCLAIM IP
                        


HELP






 

















Title:


                    Binder resin for toner and toner                





                    United States Patent 6916588                












Abstract:

            A binder for a toner containing a polyester resin (A); and a block copolymer (B) comprising a block comprising a sequence of ethylene hydrocarbon and/or a conjugated diene hydrocarbon-derived constituent units, and a block comprising a sequence of styrene-derived constituent units; and/or the hydrogenated product of the block copolymer, i.e., the hydrogenated block copolymer. The binder can be used in a toner which can exhibit superior fixing properties, offset resistance, development durability or the like. Thus, it is possible to satisfy the needs of the markets that require a high-speed printer, low-temperature fixing properties or the like. Recycled PET products can also be used for raw materials, thus contributing to the recycle society.        















Inventors:

                            Uosaki, Hirotaka (Sodegaura, JP)                
                            Takei, Hiroyuki (Sodegaura, JP)                




Application Number:

            10/448016        



Publication Date:

            07/12/2005        



Filing Date:

            05/30/2003        



Export Citation:

 Click for automatic bibliography
                generation 




Assignee:

                            Mitsui Chemicals, Inc. (Tokyo, JP)                




Primary Class:

430/109.3 



Other Classes:

                                    430/109.4,                                    430/109.5                            



International Classes:

G03G9/087; C08L67/00; C08L75/06; C08L53/00; (IPC1-7): G03G9/087        




Field of Search:

            430/109.4, 430/109.5, 430/109.3        



View Patent Images:

Download PDF 6916588                 
                  PDF help




US Patent References:



5462829Polymer blends and toner compositions comprising same1995-10-31Tyagi et al.5384363Compositions of polyphenylene ether, polyester, linear tapered block copolymers and further elastomeric materials1995-01-24Yates, III525/895310796Adhesive with polyesterurethane, halogenated polyolefin and Diels-Alder adduct1994-05-10Warren et al.525/92C 









Foreign References:



EP10110312000-06-21Electrostatic image developing toner, binder resin and process for its productionJP04250462September, 1992TONER FOR DEVELOPING ELECTROSTATIC IMAGEJP07084407March, 1995ELECTROSTATIC CHARGE IMAGE DEVELOPING TONERJPH0784407A1995-03-31JPH04250462A1992-09-07 






Primary Examiner:

            Mullis, Jeffrey        




Attorney, Agent or Firm:

                            Burns, Doane, Swecker & Mathis, LLP                





Claims:

            1. A binder resin for a toner containing: (A) a polyester resin which is a urethane modified polyester resin (A-2) obtained by reacting a polyisocyanate (C) and a polyester resin (a2) made from a polyethylene terephthalate (PET) and/or a polybutylene terephthalate (PBT) a polycarboxylic acid and polyhydric alchool; and (B) a block copolymer comprising: a block comprising a sequence of ethylenically unsaturated hydrocarbon derived constituent units and/or conjugated diene type hydrocarbon-derived constituent units, and a block comprising a sequence of styrene-derived constituent units; and/or the hydrogenated product of the block copolymer.                    
                    2. A binder resin for a toner according to claim 1, containing: 100 weight parts of the polyester resin (A) and 0.1 to 20 weight parts of the block copolymer (B).                    
                    3. A binder resin for a toner according to claim 1 wherein the tetrahydrofuran (THF) soluble portion has a Mw (weight-average molecular weight)/Mn(number-average molecular weight) of 4 to 100 as measured by gel permeation chromatography(GPC).                    
                    4. A binder resin for a toner according to claim 3, wherein the tetrahydrofuran (THF) soluble portion has a peak molecular weight of 1,000 to 30,000 as measured by gel permeation chromatography (GPC), and a glass transition temperature (Tg) of 40 to 75° C.                    
                    5. A binder resin for a toner according to claim 4, wherein a styrene-derived constituent unit of the block copolymer (B) is 3 to 90% by weight.                    
                    6. A toner containing a binder resin for a toner according to claim 1.                    




Description:

BACKGROUND OF THE INVENTION1. Field of the InventionThe present invention relates to a binder resin for a toner used for development of an electrostatic image in electrophotography, electrostatic printing and the like, and a toner containing the binder resin for electrophotography. Also, the present invention relates to a binder resin for a toner and a toner containing a polyester resin.2. Background of the Related ArtWith the progress of office automation, the demand for electrophotography-based copying machines and printers has increased rapidly and performance requirements for such equipment have become higher.There is a generally used method which comprises forming an electrostatic latent image on the photo-sensitive material, then developing the image using a toner, transferring the toner image onto a fixing sheet such paper or the like, and heat-pressing the transferred toner image using heat roll (a heat roll fixing method). In this heat roll fixing method, in order to achieve enhanced economical efficiency in powder consumption and increased photography speed, and to prevent papers from being curled, a toner superior in fixing properties is needed, which can be fixed at a lower temperature. On the other hand, there is such a problem, a so-called offset phenomenon, in the heat roller fixing method that since a toner is contacted with the surface of the heating roll in the melt state of the toner, the toner is transferred by adhering on the surface of the heating roll, and the transferred toner is transferred again on the next sheet to be fixed to contaminate it. Even without causing this offset phenomenon, high performance requirements are demanded as one of the important performance requirements for the toner. Meanwhile, as copiers and printers have come to employ a higher speed, high performance requirements in electrified portions have increased. That is, a higher durability is required for a toner and a longer-term stability in printing is needed.In the conventional technique, there has been proposed a method to improve the molecular weight and molecular weight distribution of a binder resin for a toner. Concretely, it has been tested to have a binder resin of a low-molecular weight and to lower the fixing temperature. However, the melting point has been lowered owing to the lowered molecular weight whereas the cohesive force of a resin was also deteriorated simultaneously. Therefore, an offset phenomenon occurs to the fixing roller. In order to prevent such a problem, its has been attempted to use a binder resin having a wide molecular weight distribution by mixing a high molecular weight resin and a low-molecular weight resin, or, further to crosslink the high molecular weight portion of the binder resin or the like. With this method, however, it is difficult to satisfy the fixing properties owing to the increased viscosity of the resin. As a binder resin for a toner using the above method, in general, a styrene acrylic resin (e.g. 55-6895B and JP 63-32180B, U.S. Pat. No. 5,084,368, etc), a polyester resin (e.g. JP61-284771A, JP62-291668A, JP07-101318A, specification of U.S. Pat. No. 4,833,057), or a polyol resin (e.g. JP11-189647A, etc.) is mainly used.However, the toners obtained by these techniques cannot be fully effective in high-speed copiers or small copiers in which the amount of heat from the heat fixing roll is not sufficiently transmitted. That is, when a polymer having a high weight-average molecular weight or a crosslinked polymer is used in order to prevent the offset phenomenon, the viscosity of a resin increases so that the fixing properties are deteriorated.In order to achieve these requirements, there is a method to add paraffin waxes, low-molecular weight polyolefin or the like as a mold release agent to a toner. In JP49-65232A, JP50-28840A, JP50-81342A or the like is disclosed a technique to use a styrene type binder resin. However, block resistance and the development properties have been deteriorated whereas an offset phenomenon has been improved. It is also confirmed that the effects of a mold release agent are small when applied to a polyester resin and the developing agent is rapidly depleted when its amount is increased.In order to provide a developing agent having sufficient fixing properties and offset resistance and being capable of providing high image quality of copying images, it needs to give a sufficient electrophotographic features to the developing agent. Many methods have been attempted heretofore in order to achieve high image quality and high resolution of copying images; however, no perfect methods could be obtained heretofore to fully overcome the above defects.Meanwhile, in recent years, an increase in population has increased the amount of energy and has depleted resources. In connection therewith, resources saving, energy saving, recycling of resources, etc. have been claimed. As to polyethylene terephthalate (PET) bottles, individual municipalities have started a recycling activity, and PET bottles have come to be utilized as clothes or containers. In addition, development of newly recycled items is desired. Thus, a toner using a polyester resin has become a strong candidate.SUMMARY OF THE INVENTIONThe present invention has an initial purpose of providing a binder resin for a toner and a toner satisfying various features that are required for toners from the past.That is, an object of the present invention is to provide a binder resin for a toner and a toner that an offset is prevented without coating an offset preventive solution and which can be fixed at a lower fixing temperature in the heat fixing method.An object of the present invention is to provide a binder resin for a toner and a toner superior in chargeability and grindability.Another object of the present invention is to provide a binder resin for a toner and a toner to be able to obtain high-density development images which are always stable even at a high temperature and high humidity or at a low temperature and low humidity.A further object of the present invention is to provide a binder resin for a toner and a toner to be able to form stable development images for a long period.A further object of the present invention is to provide a binder resin for a toner and a toner having a weight-average particle diameter less than 10 micro-meters while suppressing a fine powder of less than 5 micro-meters in a small amount from the viewpoint of superior durability.In order to solve the above problems, the present inventors have found a superior binder resin for a toner that cannot be realized by any of conventional techniques as a result of extensive review, thus completing the present invention.The present invention is specified by the matters described in the following (1) to (8).
(1) A binder resin for a toner containing(A) a polyester resin; and(B) a block copolymer comprising

a block comprising a sequence of ethylenically unsaturated hydrocarbon-derived constituent units and/or conjugated diene hydrocarbon-derived constituent units, and

a block comprising a sequence of styrene-derived constituent units; and/or the hydrogenated product of the block copolymer, i.e., the hydrogenated block copolymer.
(2) A binder resin for a toner containing

100 weight parts of the polyester resin (A) and

0.1 to 20 weight parts of the block copolymer (B).
(3) A binder resin for a toner, wherein the polyester resin (A) is a urethane modified polyester resin (A-1) obtained by reacting

a polyester resin (a1) synthesized from a polycarboxylic acid and a polyhydric alcohol,

and a polyisocyanate (C).
(4) A binder resin for a toner, wherein the urethane modified polyester resin (A-1) is a urethane modified polyester resin (A-2) obtained by reacting

a polyisocyanate (C) and,

a polyester (a2) synthesized from

a polyethylene terephthalate (PET) and/or a polybutylene terephthalate (PBT),

a polycarboxylic acid and

a polyhydric alcohol.
(5) A binder resin for a toner, wherein the tetrahydrofuran (THF) soluble portion has a Mw(weight-average molecular weight)/Mn(number-average molecular weight) of 4 to 100 as measured by gel permeation chromatography(GPC).(6) A binder resin for a toner, wherein the tetrahydrofuran (THF) soluble portion has a peak molecular weight of 1,000 to 30,000 as measured by gel permeation chromatography (GPC), and a glass transition temperature (Tg) of 40 to 75° C.(7) A binder resin for a toner, wherein a styrene-derived constituent unit of the block copolymer (B) is 3 to 90% by weight.(8) A toner containing the binder resin for a toner according to the above.
Other and further objects, features and advantages of the invention will appear more fully from the following description.DETAILED DESCRIPTION OF THE PREFERRED EMBODIMENTSThe present invention will be described in more detail below. The block copolymer used in the present invention comprising a block comprising a sequence of the ethylenically unsaturated hydrocarbon-derived constituent units and/or the conjugated diene hydrocarbon-derived constituent units and a block comprising a sequence of the styrene-derived constituent units, and/or the hydrogenated product of the block copolymer, i.e., the hydrogenated block copolymer (B) is produced by polymerizing one or more of ethylenically unsaturated hydrocarbons such as ethylene, propylene, 1-butene, 2-butene, isobutylene, 1-pentene, 2-pentene, 2-methyl-1-butene, 3-methyl-1-butene, 2-methyl-2-butene, 1-hexene, 2,3-dimethyl-2-butene or the like, and conjugated diene hydrocarbons such as butadiene, isoprene or the like in accordance with a known living anionic polymerization or a living cationic polymerization to form a block copolymer having a reactive group, and then blocking this reactive group with styrene. The production process is not restricted thereto and known processes can also be employed. In addition, some kinds of the block copolymer have unsaturated double bonds; at that time, the block copolymer can be used as a so-called hydrogenated product obtained by reacting the unsaturated double bonds of the block copolymer with hydrogen in accordance with a known process.Particularly, the block copolymer having unsaturated bonds might be subject to deterioration of heat while melt-kneading in production of the polyester resin, in urethane extending reaction by polyisocyanate or in production of the toner. Out of such a possibility, the block copolymer (B) having no unsaturated bonds is more desirable in the present invention. That is, a block copolymer synthesized by using an ethylene hydrocarbon such as ethylene, propylene and the like, or the hydrogenated block copolymer is preferred.A commercial product can be used for the block copolymer (B). Such commercial products of the block copolymer include Kaliflex TR and Kraton (styrene-butadiene-styrene block copolymer, styrene-isoprene-styrene block copolymer, styrene-ethylene/butylenes-styrene block copolymer, styrene-ethylene/propylene-styrene block copolymer, styrene-ethylene/propylene block copolymer) produced by Kraton Polymer Co., Ltd., Septon (styrene-ethylene/propylene block copolymer or hydrogenated styrene-isoprene block copolymer) produced by Kuraray Co., Ltd. and Tufprene (styrene-butadiene block copolymer) produced by Asahi Kasei Co., Ltd or the like.The amount of block copolymer to be used is usually 0.1 to 20 weight parts to 100 weight parts of the polyester resin (A) as described below, and more preferably 0.1 to 10 weight parts. Also, the ratio of styrene in the block copolymer is usually 3 to 90% by weight, and preferably 5 to 70% by weight.It is possible to improve, for example, the productivity in a grindability process when producing the toner by adding the block copolymer (B), because a wax desirably used in the process of adding the block copolymer or producing toner as described below is properly dispersed in the toner.There are no special restrictions on the process of mixing the block copolymer (B) and the polyester resin (A). For example, the block copolymer (B) may be added upon polycondensation for producing the polyester resin (A) or the polyester resin (a1) as described below and then preferably dissolved to provide a mixture, or may be added in the melted state after production of the polyester resin and dissolved to provide a mixture. Also the polyester resin (A) and the block copolymer (B) may be dissolved in the same solvent: to obtain a resin solution, and then the solvent is removed by heating to provide the resin mixture. In addition, the polyester resin (a1) can be subjected to a urethane extending reaction with a polyisocyanate in the presence of the block copolymer to obtain the urethane modified polyester resin. These may be melted and kneaded. The block copolymer (B) may also be added and melt-kneaded in production of a toner.A known polyester resin can be used as a polyester resin (A) of the present invention. Specifically, the polyester resin (A) can be obtained by polycondensation of a polycarboxylic acid and a polyhydric alcohol, or ester exchange reaction of polycarboxylic ester and polyhydric alcohol.Specifically, the polyester resin (a1) synthesized from a polycarboxylic acid and a polyhydric alcohol is reacted with a polyisocyanate (C) to obtain a urethane modified polyester (A-1). The resulting urethane modified polyester (A-1) is desirably used as the polyester resin (A). Also, the polyester resin such as PET or PBT resins including recycled products and a polyhydric alcohol are subjected to depolymerization and polycondensation or to polycondensation to obtain a polyester resin (a2). The polyester resin (a2) is reacted with a polyisocyanate (C) to obtain a urethane modified polyester (A-2). The resulting urethane modified polyester (A-2) can also be desirably used.In the present invention, a method is described to conduct a synthesis of the polyester resin, followed by a urethanization reaction with a polyisocyanate to obtain a urethane modified polyester resin; however, the present invention is not necessarily restricted to this method, and other methods, for example, a polycondensation method in the presence of a diisocyanate can be used.The polyester resin of the present invention is a resin obtained by polycondensation of polyhydric alcohol containing a dihydric alcohol or preferably a tri- or higher polyhydric alcohol component, and acid component selected from dicarboxylic acid, acid anhydrides thereof or lower alkyl esters thereof. It is also possible to use a monocarboxylic acid and a tri- or higher polycarboxylic acid for the purpose of molecular weight control.As acid components of the present invention, there can be mentioned, for example, aliphatic dicarboxylic acids such as malonic acid, succinic acid, glutaric acid, adipic acid, azelaic acid, sebacic acid, and the like; unsaturated dicarboxylic acids such as maleic acid, fumaric acid, citraconic acid, itaconic acid and the like; aromatic dicarboxylic acids such as phthalic acid, terephthalic acid, isophthalic acid, phthalic anhydride and the like; and anhydrides or lower alkyl esters of these dicarboxylic acids. It is also possible to use a monocarboxylic acid and a tri- or higher polycarboxylic acid for the purpose of molecular weight control. As preferred monocarboxylic acids, there are mentioned aliphatic monocarboxylic acids such as octanoic acid, decanoic acid, dodecanoic acid, myristic acid, palmitic acid, stearic acid and the like, and they may have branches or unsaturated groups. These aliphatic monocarboxylic acids have an action of giving a reduced glass transition temperature; therefore, for the purpose of control of glass transition temperature, an aromatic monocarboxylic acid such as benzoic acid, naphthalenecarboxylic acid or the like may be used. As the tri- or higher carboxylic acid, there are mentioned, for example, trimellitic acid, pyromellitic acid and acid anhydrides thereof.As the alcohol component, there can be mentioned, for example, alkyl diols such as ethylene glycol, 1,2-propylene glycol, 1,3-propanediol, 1,3-butanediol, 1,4-butanediol, 2,3-butanediol, diethylene glycol, triethylene glycol, dipropylene glycol, 1,5-pentanediol, 1,6-hexanediol, neopentyl glycol, 2-ethyl-1,3-hexanediol, etc.; alicyclic diols such as hydrogenated bisphenol A, cyclohexanedimethanol and the like; derivatives of bisphenol F and bisphenol S, such as, alkylene oxide obtained by reacting bisphenol F or bisphenol S with ethylene oxide, propylene oxide or the like; aromatic diols of dicarboxylic acid lower alkyl esters such as bishydroxyethylterephthalic acid, bishydroxypropylterephthalic acid, bishydroxybutylterephthalic acid and the like. There can be further mentioned, for example, bisphenol A derivative such as adducts of bisphenol A and alkylene oxide such as bisphenol A-ethylene oxide adducts, bisphenol A-propylene oxide adducts or the like. It is also possible to use a monohydric alcohol and a tri- or higher polyhydric alcohol for the purpose of molecular weight control. As preferred monohydric alcohols, there can be mentioned aliphatic monohydric alcohols such as octanol, decanol, dodecanol, myristyl alcohol, palmityl alcohol, stearyl alcohol and the like. They may have branches and unsaturated groups. As preferred tri- or higher polyhydric alcohols, there can be mentioned, for example, glycerine, 2-methylpropanetriol, trimethylolpropane, trimethylolethane, sorbitol, sorbitan or the like. When a chain-extending takes place by a polyisocyanate as described below, it is desirable to comprise at least 1 or more kinds of a tri- or higher polyhydric alcohol for obtaining a high molecular polymer fully. If the tri- or higher polyhydric alcohol component is less than 0.5 mole % usually based on all alcohol components, it is difficult to obtain a high molecular polymer when a chain-extending takes place by polyisocyanate and an offset resistance or durability tends to be poor. When the component is more than 20 mole %, a gelation takes place, making it difficult to do polycondensation. It is preferred that the component is preferably 0.5 to 20 mole % and more preferably 2 to 20 mole %.PET and PBT used as a raw material in the present invention are not subject to the molecular weight distribution, composition, production process, and its form when used, etc. Any of new products, recycled products (preferably processed into a flake form), off-spec fiber waste or pellet discharged from the plant may be used. New products and recycled products into a flake form are preferred, in which the weight-average molecular weight is about 30,000 to 90,000.The polycondensation reaction in obtaining the polyester resin can be conducted by a known process such as solvent-free high-temperature polycondensation, solution polycondensation or the like in an inert gas such as nitrogen gas or the like. In the reaction, the proportions of the carboxylic acid and alcohol used are generally 0.7 to 1.4 in terms of the molar ratio of the hydroxyl group of the latter to the carboxyl group of the former.In the present invention, when the polyester resin (a2) is synthesized using PET, the polyester resin (a2) is produced by subjecting PET, a alcohol component comprising at least one kind of diol components, and at least one or more acid components to depolymerization and polycondensation or to polycondensation. The depolymerization and polycondensation may be carried out at the same time. The amount of PET to be used at this time is adjusted to have ethylene glycol component of 5 to 90 mole % in PET to all alcohol components containing ethylene glycol component in PET. A reaction temperature is preferably 200 to 270° C. and more preferably 220 to 260° C. When a reaction temperature is less than 200° C., the solubility of PET is lowered so that the reaction time becomes longer. When a reaction temperature is higher than 270° C., it incurs decomposition of the raw materials.As the polyester resin (A) of the present invention, the polyester resin (a1) or the polyester resin (a2) may be used as it is; however the urethane modified polyester resin is more preferably used. The urethane modified polyester resin of the present invention is the polyester resin (A-1) to be obtained by subjecting the polyester resin (a1) and the polyisocyanate (C) to reaction and, in particular, the urethane modified polyester resin (A-2) to be obtained by subjecting the polyester resin (a2) and the polyisocyanate (C) to reaction.In production of the urethane modified polyester resin, it is preferred that the polyester resin (a1) or the polyester resin (a2) use two or more kinds of resins, each having different hydroxyl value. Preferred examples are a polyester resin (a-H) having 10 to 100 mg-KOH/g of the hydroxyl value and preferably 25 to 90 mg-KOH/g, and a polyester resin (a-L) having less than 20 mg-KOH/g and preferably less than 10 mg-KOH/g. The amount of the polyester resin (a-H) used is preferably 1 to 90 weight parts, more preferably 5 to 75 weight parts, and further preferably 5 to 70 weight parts, while the amount of the polyester resin (a-L) used is 10 to 99 weight parts, more preferably 25 to 95 weight parts, and further preferably 30 to 95 weight parts. When the polyester resin (a-H) is less than 1 weight parts, poor fixing properties result in some cases, while when it is more than 90 weight parts, poor fixing properties result in some cases.The urethane modified polyester resin is created by crosslink reacting the polyester resin (A) and polyisocyanate (C). Accordingly the urethane modified polyester resin has high-molecular chain-extending and high molecular polymer component; therefore, the urethane modified polyester resin is preferable owing to its wide molecular weight distribution and accordingly an offset resistance is improved. The isocyanate-derived structure unit is preferably used owing to its high inter-molecular binding force and accordingly excellent mechanical durability results.Polyisocyanate (C) is preferably 0.2 to 2 mole equivalent of isocyanate group for 1 mole equivalent of the hydroxyl group values of the polyester resin (a1) or the polyester resin (a2), and more preferably 0.5 to 1.5 mole equivalent. When the mole equivalent is less than 0.2, hot offset resistance is lowered. When the mole equivalent is more than 2 mole equivalent, it is insufficient from the viewpoint of safety in that there is a possibility that polyisocyanate in production of the resin exists in a monomer.As polyisocyanate (C) of the present invention, there are mentioned, for example, diisocyanates such as hexamethylene diisocyanate, isophorone diisocyanate, diphenylmethane diisocyanate, xylylene diisocyanate, tetramethylene diisocyanate, norbornene diisocyanate or the like. The tri- or higher polyisocyanate can also be used.The other resins can be used together as needed for the polyester resin (A) of the present invention. As specific examples, any known binder resins of a toner for electrostatic image development may be used. There can be mentioned, for example, homopolymers of styrene or its derivative, such as polystyrene, poly-p-chlorostyrene, polyvinyltoluene and the like; styrene type copolymers such as styrene-p-chlorostyrene copolymer, styrene-vinyltoluene copolymer, styrene-vinyinaphthalene copolymer, styrene-acrylate copolymer, styrene-methacrylate copolymer, styrene-α-chloromethacrylate copolymer, styrene-acrylonitrile copolymer, styrene-vinyl methyl ether copolymer, styrene-vinyl ethyl ether copolymer, styrene-vinyl methyl ketone copolymer, styrene-butadiene copolymer, styrene-isoprene copolymer, styrene-acrylonitrile-indene copolymer and the like; and resins such as polyvinyl chloride, phenolic resin, natural modified phenolic resin, natural resin-modified maleic acid resin, acrylic resin, methacrylic resin, polyvinyl acetate, silicone resin, polyester resins other than mentioned above, polyurethane resin, polyamide resin, furan resin, epoxy resin, xylene resin, polyvinyl butyral, terpene resin, coumarone-indene resin, petroleum-based resin, crosslinked styrene type copolymer and the like. Naturally, these resins can be used in such an amount that the properties of the toner composition of the present invention are exhibited.A binder resin for a toner of the present invention comprises the polyester resin (A) and the block copolymer (B) as described above. The glass transition temperature (Tg) of the binder resin for a toner used in the invention is preferably 40 to 70° C. from the viewpoints of blocking resistance (anti-cohesion of toner particles) or fixing properties.The binder resin for a toner used in the present invention is preferably 4 to 100 of Mw (weight-average molecular weight)/Mn (number-average molecular weight) from the standpoints of offset resistance or fixing properties when a tetrahydrofuran soluble portion is measured by GPC (gel permeation chromatography), and more preferably 6 to 60.A binder resin for a toner used in the present invention has a peak molecular weight of 1,000 to 30,000 when the tetrahydrofuran soluble portion is measured by GPC, more preferably 1,000 to 20,000 and further preferably 2,000 to 15,000. When the peak molecular weight is less than 1,000, deteriorated offset resistance and inferior mechanical durability result; when the peak molecular weight is more than 30,000, the fixing properties are deteriorated.The THF insoluble portion to be contained in a binder resin for a toner used in the present invention is preferably 0 to 40% by weight in a resin composition. When the portion is more than 40% by weight, the fixing properties are worsened in some cases.A density of a binder resin for a toner used in the present invention is preferably 1.20 to 1.27 g/cm3. When a density is less than 1.20 g/cm3, the mechanical durability is worsened in some cases, while when a density is more than 1.27 g/cm3, the grindability is worsened in some cases; therefore the productivity is lowered.When it needs to improve the low-temperature fixing properties and offset resistance of a binder resin for a toner of the present invention, waxes can be used together. Polyolefin wax such as polyethylene wax, polypropylene wax or the like may be used. Specific commercial products of the polyolefin wax include High Wax 800P, 400P, 200P, 100P, 720P, 420P, 320P, 405MP, 320MP, 4051E, 2203A, 1140H, NL800, NP055, NP105, NP505, NP805 and the like produced by Mitsui Chemicals Inc., Ltd. Examples of waxes which may be contained in the binder resin for a toner may include natural waxes such as ceramic wax, rice wax, sugar wax, urushi wax, beeswax, carnauba wax, candelilla wax, montan wax or the like. The amount thereof is preferably 0 to 20% by weight in the resin composition for a toner.A wax may be added to dissolve upon polymerization of the polyester resin or may be added to dissolve in a melted state after polymerization of the polyester resin. Also the polyester resin and the block copolymer may be dissolved in the same solvent to obtain a resin solution, and then the solvent is removed by heating to obtain the resin compound. In addition, When the polyester resin is subjected to a urethanization reaction with a polyisocyanate to obtain the urethane modified polyester resin, the block copolymer may be added and melt-kneaded. The block copolymer may also be added and melt-kneaded in production of the toner.Next, the toner of the present invention is explained in detail. The toner of the present invention contains the binder resin for a toner, charge-controlling agent, colorant and magnetic material. As the charge-controlling agent used in production of a toner resin of the present invention, known charge-controlling agents can be used singly or in combination. The charge-controlling agent is used in an amount necessary to allow the toner produced, to have an intended charge amount. It is preferably used in an amount of, for example, about 0.05 to 10 weight parts per 100 weight parts of the binder resin. As the positive charge-controlling agent, there can be mentioned, for example, nigrosine type dyes, quaternary ammonium salt compounds, triphenylmethane type compounds, imidazole type compounds and polyamine resins. As the negative charge-controlling agent, there can be mentioned, for example, metal (Cr, Co, Al or Fe)-contained azo type dyes, metal salicylate compounds, metal alkylsalicylate compounds and calixarene compounds.In producing a toner of the present invention, there can be used, as the coloring agent, any coloring agent which has heretofore been known in toner production. As example thereof, there can be mentioned dyes and pigments, such as fatty acid metal salts, various carbon blacks, phthalocyanine type dyes, rhodamine type dyes, quinacridone type dyes, triallylmethane type dyes, anthraquinone type dyes, azo type dyes, diazo type dyes or the like. These coloring agents can be used singly or in combination of two or more kinds. The amount of coloring agent used is in the range of 0.05 to 10 weight parts per 100 weight parts of the binder resin for a toner.The magnetic material which can be used in production of the toner of the present invention, can be any of alloys, compounds, etc. each containing a ferromagnetic element, which have heretofore been used in production of magnetic toner. As examples of the magnetic material, there can be mentioned iron oxides or compounds of bivalent metal and iron oxide, such as magnetite, maghemite, ferrite and the like; metals such as iron, cobalt, nickel and the like; alloys of such a metal and other metal such as aluminum, cobalt, copper, lead, magnesium, tin, zinc, antimony, beryllium, bismuth, cadmium, calcium, manganese, selenium, titanium, tungsten, vanadium or the like; and mixtures thereof. These magnetic materials have an average particle diameter of preferably about 0.1 to 2 micro-meters, more preferably about 0.1 to 0.5 micro-meters. The content of the magnetic material in the toner is ordinarily about 20 to 200 weight parts, preferably 40 to 150 weight parts per 100 weight parts of the binder resin. And the saturation magnetization of the toner is preferably 15 to 35 emu/g (measurement magnetic field: 1 kilo oersted).The toner of the present invention can, if necessary, further employ a known additive being used in production of toners, for example, an lubricant, a flowability improver, an abrasive, a conductive grant agent, an anti-image peeling agent, etc. The method of introducing the additives is particularly not restricted and can adopt a known process. As examples thereof, there can be mentioned polyvinylidene fluoride, zinc stearate or the like as an lubricant, colloidal silica, aluminum oxide, titanium oxide as a flowability improver, cerium oxide, silundum, strontium titanate, tungsten carbide, calcium carbonate or the like as an abrasive, carbon black, tin oxide or the like as a conductive grant agent. Fine powders of fluorine-contained polymer such as polyvinylidene fluoride or the like are desirable from the viewpoints of the fluidity, abrasive properties, charging stability or the like.The toner according to the present invention can be produced using the conventionally known process below. In general, the toner component materials as described above are satisfactorily mixed with mixers such as a ball mill, a Henschel mixer or the like. The resulting mixture is then finely kneaded using a heat kneader such as a heat roll kneader, a single screw or twin screw extruder or the like, and cool-solidified and then mechanically coarsely ground using a pulverizer such as a hammer mill. The coarsely ground mixture is finely ground using a jet mill, followed classification. But, method of producing the toner is particularly not restricted and, other toner component material is dispersed in solution of binder resin, and spray-dried to produce the toner, which is a so-called microcapsule method. Other methods can be arbitrarily adopted.The toner of the present invention is mixed with a carrier and the resulting mixture can be used as a 2-component or 1.5-component developer. Or it can be used as a magnetic monocomponent developer comprising a magnetic powder in the toner, a non-magnetic monocomponent developer that does not use either a carrier or a magnetic powder, or a micro-toning developer. When the toner is used as a 2-component or 1.5-component developer, as carriers, there can be mentioned, for example, magnetic powder such as iron powder, ferrite powder, nickel powder or glass beads, etc., or of which surfaces are coated with a resin or the like. As resins to coat the surfaces of carriers, there can be mentioned, for example, styrene-acrylic acid ester copolymer, styrene-methacrylate copolymer, acrylate type copolymer, methacrylate type copolymer, fluorine-contained polymer, silicon-contained resin, polyamide resin, polyphenylene sulfide or the like, or compounds thereof. Among these, fluorine-contained polymer and silicon-contained resin are particularly preferred owing to their small forming of the spent toner.A desirable weight-average particle diameter of the toner of the present invention is less than or equal to 10 micro-meters and preferably 3 to 10 micro-meters from the standpoint of the development features. The particle-size distribution can be measured, for example, with a coulter counter.EXAMPLESThe present invention is described specifically below by way of Examples. However, the present invention is not restricted to these Examples. Also, “parts” hereinafter indicates parts by weight otherwise mentioned in advance.The molecular weight and molecular weight distribution of the binder resin for a toner of the present invention are measured by GPC. The measurement is conducted in terms of the following conditions, based on the monodispersed standard polystyrene.Detector:SHODEX RI-71SSolvent:TetrahydrofuranColumn:KF-G + KF-807L × 3 + KF800DFlow rate:1.0 ml/minSample:0.25% THF solution
The reliability of the measurement under the above conditions can be confirmed if Mw/Mn of NBS706 polystyrene sample (Mw=288,000, Mn=137,000, Mw/Mn=2.11) is 2.11±0.10.The glass transition temperature (Tg) of the present invention was measured using DSC-20 (a product of Seiko Instruments Inc.) according to differential scanning calorimetry (DSC). About 10 mg of a sample was subjected to temperature elevation from −20 to 100° C. at a rate of 10° C./min to obtain a curve; in the curve, an intersection between the base line and the inclined line of the endothermic peak was determined, the Tg of the sample was determined from the intersection. It is desired that, before the above temperature elevation measurement, the sample resin is heated to about 200° C., is kept at that temperature for 5 minutes, and is cooled quickly to normal temperature (25° C.), in order to allow the sample to unify a thermal history.The ratio of tetrahydrofuran (THF) insoluble portion of the present invention was obtained by the following measurement method. A tetrahydrofuran solution containing 5% by weight was prepared; the solution was stirred sufficiently to dissolve the soluble portion of the resin completely in the solvent; then, the solution was allowed to stand. After confirming that the insoluble portion of the resin and the supernatant liquid were separated completely, the supernatant liquid was analyzed and the amount of the soluble portion was calculated; thereby, the insoluble portion was determined.The acid value of the present invention refers to mg of potassium hydroxide necessary to neutralize 1 g of the resin. The OH value refers to mg of potassium hydroxide necessary to neutralize the acid anhydride necessary to esterify the OH group present in 1 g of the resin.The fixing properties of a toner were evaluated as follows.(1) Fixing PropertiesAn unfixed image was formed using a copier produced by remodeling a commercial electrophotograph copier. This unfixed image was fixed using a hot roller fixing apparatus produced by remodeling of the fixing section of a commercial copier. The fixing was conducted at a fixing speed of the hot roll, of 300 mm/sec with the temperature of the hot roller being changed at intervals of 5° C. The fixed image obtained was rubbed 10 times by applying a load of 0.5 kg using a sand eraser (a product of Tombow Pencil Co., Ltd.), and the image densities before and after the rubbing test were measured using a Macbeth reflection densitometer. The lowest fixing temperature when the change of image density became 70% or more, was taken as the lowest fixing temperature of the toner.Incidentally, the hot roller fixing apparatus used had no silicone oil feeder. The environmental conditions were normal temperature and normal humidity (temperature=22° C., relative humidity=55%).
∘: lowest fixing temperature≦170° C.Δ: 190° C.≧lowest fixing temperature≦170° C.×: lowest fixing temperature>190° C.

(2) Offset Resistance (Temperature of Offset Appearance)

The offset resistance was evaluated as follows. An unfixed image was formed using the above copier; the toner image was transferred and fixed using the above hot roller fixing apparatus; then, a white transfer paper was fed into the hot roller fixing apparatus under the same conditions; and the appearance of toner staining the transfer paper was visually examined. This operation was repeated by gradually increasing the set temperature of the hot roller of the hot roller fixing apparatus. The lowest set temperature at which toner staining appeared on the transfer paper was taken as the temperature of offset appearance. The environmental conditions were normal temperature and normal humidity (temperature=22° C., relative humidity=55%).
∘: temperature of offset appearance≧240° C.Δ: 240° C.>temperature of offset appearance≧220° C.×: 220° C.>temperature of offset appearance

(3) Development Durability

The development durability of a toner was evaluated by filling a toner in a commercial copier (a product of Toshiba Corporation, named Presio 5560), then conducting continuous copying of 100,000 copies, and evaluating the number of sheets fed from the start to the time when the deterioration of image density and image quality began.
∘: No deterioration at 70,000th or more sheetsΔ: Deterioration began at not less than 50,000th and less than 70,000 th sheets×: Deterioration began at less than 50,000th sheets

(4) Grinding Productivity

The coarsely ground resin was finely ground, at a flow rate of 20 g/min, using a jet grinder (IDS 2, a product of Nippon Pneumatic Co., Ltd.), followed by air classification, to obtain a toner fine powder having an average particle diameter of 10 micro-meters (5 micro-meters or less: 3% by weight, 20 micro-meters or more: 2% by weight).
∘: Produced in the range of the conventional conditionsΔ: Search for conditions of production needed×: Unable to produce

Production Example of Block Copolymer

Production of the block copolymer resin of the present invention has been conducted as follows. Production of a resin C-1 is next described in concrete terms. As for the resin C-2 to C-12, the resin units and monomer compositions are changed to the contents in Table 1 and others are the same as C-1. Also, resin analytical results are shown in Table 1 along with those of C-1.In an autoclave flushed with an inert gas, 100 weight parts of heptane, 0.2 weight parts of ethylene chloride and 0.5 weight parts of triethyl aluminum are placed, while ethylene/propylene(1:1 weight ratio) is copolymerized at 0.5 atm (50.7 kPa), temperature of 43° C. for two hours. A polymerization solution is filtered and washed, and suspended with heptane of 100 weight parts, again. 0.5 weight parts of peroxide and 5 weight parts of styrene are added thereto, thereby polymerizing at 43° C. for ten hours. The resulting resin solution is filtered and washed, and then the solvent is removed to obtain the block copolymer C-1. The content of styrene is analyzed using heat decomposition gas chromatography.As for the resins C-13 to C-17, commercial block copolymers are used. Specifically, there are used Kaliflex TR1101 (C-13), Kaliflex TR1112 (C-14), Kraton G1650 (C-15), Septon KL-1001 (C-16) and Tufprene A (C-17).TABLE 1Block CopolymerResinC-1C-2C-3C-4C-5C-6C-7C-8C-9C-10C-11C-12Amount of5105010015035051050100150350styrene usedweight partsEthylene:1:11:01:11:11:11:1——————propyleneweight ratio2-butene:—————1:11:11:11:11:11:11:1butadieneweight ratiostyrene3.05.024.648.170.090.03.45.823.946.070.189.0component
Production of the polyester resin and urethane modified polyester resin of the present invention has been conducted as follows. The polyester resin A-1 is next specifically described. As for the resins A-2 to A-5 and B-1 to B6, the resin units and monomer compositions are changed to the conditions in Table 2 and Table 3, and others are the same as A-1. Also, resin analytical results are shown in Table 2 and Table 3 along with those of A-1. In production of A-4 and B-5, recycled PETs are used.In Table 2 and Table 3, an acid component mole % refers to a relative mole % based on 100 mole % of the total moles of PET, PBT, KB 300, diethylene glycol, triethylene glycol and trimethylolpropane that are polyhydric alcohol components.Production Example of Polyester Resin (A-1)A 5-liter, 4-necked flask was provided with a reflux condenser, a water-separating unit, a nitrogen gas inlet tube, a thermometer and a stirrer. Thereinto were fed 50 mole % of a recycled PET flake (weight-average molecular weight: 75,000) on the ethylene glycol unit in the PET, 22 mole % of Actcall KB300 (a product of bisphenol A derivative by Mitsui Takeda Chemicals, Inc.), 20.0 mole % of triethylene glycol, 8 mole % of trimethylolpropane and 36 mole % of terephthalic acid (based on the total moles of 4 kinds of the polyhydric alcohol). Further, dibutyl tin oxide of a catalyst was fed in an amount of 0.5 weight parts to the total amount of the reaction raw material. Depolymerization and/or dehydration and polycondensation were conducted at 240° C. with nitrogen being introduced into the flask. When the acid value of the reaction mixture reached a predetermined level, the reaction mixture was taken out of the flask, cooled, and ground to obtain a resin A-1. In determining whether the reaction is terminated, the acid value of a sampled resin is used, which is a normally conducted method.TABLE 2Polyester ResinResinA-1A-2A-3A-4A-5PET (mol %)50——2562PBT (mol %)——5025—KB300 (mol %)2228222224Diethylene glycol (mole %)—64———Triethylene glycol (mole %)20—2020 4Trimethylolpropane (mole %) 8 8 8 810Terephthalic acid (mole %)36—363618Isophthalic acid (mole %)—84———Benzoic acid (mole %)————18isododecenyl succinic————10anhydride (mol %)Hydroxyl group value (mgKOH/g)5052494918
TABLE 3Polyester ResinResinB-1B-2B-3B-4B-5B-6PET (mol %)7070——34—PBT (mol %)———6733—KB300 (mol %)283094282815Diethylene glycol (mole %)—————35Triethylene glycol (mole %)——————Trimethylolpropane (mole %) 2— 6 5 5—Terephthalic acid (mole %)3335—333332Isophthalic acid (mole %)——103 ——Benzoic acid (mole %)2018182020isododecenyl succinic—————5anhydride (mol %)1,2,4-benzen tricarboxylic—————12anhydride (mol %)Hydroxyl group value<5<5<5<5<5<5(mgKOH/g)
The embodiments of the present invention are described specifically for a representative case, i.e. Example 1. Also for resins 2 to 11, i.e. Examples 2 to 30 and Comparative Examples 1 to 4, resins and toners were obtained and evaluated in the same manner as in Example 1 with the only difference being that the proportions of resin and the ratios of tolylene diisocyanate added have been changed to those described in Table 4 to Table 7. The results of resin analysis and the properties of toner are shown in Table 4 to Table 7, together with those of Example 1. Incidentally, no tolylene diisocyanate was added to the resin 10.Example 130 weight parts of resin A-1 as the resin (A), 70 weight parts of resin B-1 as the resin (B), and 2 weight parts of tolylene diisocyanate were kneaded and reacted in a twin screw extruder to obtain resin 1. The resin had a Tg of 57.9C, a Mw/Mn of 21.4 as measured by GPC, and a peak molecular weight of 6,000. The resin also had a THF insoluble component of 4% by weight.100 weight parts of a resin 1, 6 weight parts of a carbon black (MA-100, a product of Mitsubishi Chemical Corporation) and 1.5 weight parts of a charge control agent (BONTRON E-84, a product of Orient Chemical Instruments Inc.) and 2.0 weight parts of a polypropylene wax (High Wax NP105; a product of Mitsui Chemicals, Inc. Ltd.) were dispersed and mixed using a Henschel mixer; the resulting material was melt-kneaded at 120° C. using a twin screw extruder PCM-30 (a product of Ikegai Corporation) to obtain a toner composition in the bulk state. The resin after melt-kneading was coarsely ground using a hammer mill. The coarsely ground resin was finely ground using a jet grinder (IDS 2, a product of Nippon Pneumatic Co., Ltd.), followed by air classification, to obtain a toner fine powder having an average particle diameter of 10 micro-meters (5 micro-meters or less: 3% by weight, 20 micro-meters or more: 2% by weight). 100 weight parts of the toner, 0.5 weight parts of a hydrophobic silica (Aerosil R-972, a product of Nippon Aerosil Co., Ltd.) was mixed using a Henschel mixer, feeding from the exterior to obtain toner particles. The toner particles were measured for the fixing properties, offset resistance and grinding productivity.Example 31The toner is produced in the same manner as in Example 1, except that the method of adding the block copolymer has been changed as follows. That is, 30 weight parts of resin A-1, 70 weight parts of resin B-1, and 4.8 weight parts of the block copolymer C-4 were dissolved and mixed to 100 parts by weight of xylene in the homogeneous state. A solvent is removed at 20 mmHg, 180° C. to obtain a resin compound (resin 12). The results are shown in Table 6.Example 32The toner is produced in the same manner as in Example 1, except that the method of adding the block copolymer has been changed as follows. That is, when 30 weight parts of resin A-1, 70 weight parts of resin B-1, and 2 parts by weight of tolylene diisocyanate were kneaded and reacted in a twin screw extruder, 4.8 weight parts of the block copolymer was added thereto to obtain a resin compound (resin 13). The results are shown in Table 6.The binder resin for a toner comprising the polyester resin (A) of the present invention and the block copolymer (B) and the toner using these are superior in the fixing properties, offset resistance and development durability. Thus the binder resin for a toner and the toner obtained according to the present invention can fully satisfy the recently increasing needs of copiers and printers with a high speed and low-temperature fixing properties.TABLE 4Production and Evaluation of TonerExam-Exam-Exam-Exam-Exam-Exam-Exam-Exam-Exam-Exam-Exam-Example No.ple 1ple 2ple 3ple 4ple 5ple 6ple 7ple 8ple 9ple 10ple 11ResinResin 1Resin 1Resin 1Resin 1Resin 1Resin 1Resin 1Resin 1Resin 1Resin 1Resin 1Resin ATypeA-1A-1A-1A-1A-1A-1A-1A-1A-1A-1A-1(% by weight)3030303030303030303030Resin BTypeB-1B-1B-1B-1B-1B-1B-1B-1B-1B-1B-1(% by weight)7070707070707070707070Tolylene diisocyanate2222222-2222(weight %)Tg (° C.)57.957.957.957.957.957.957.957.957.957.957.9GPCMw/Mn21.421.421.421.421.421.421.421.421.421.421.4Peak molecular weight60006000600060006000600060006000600060006000THF insoluble portion44444444444(weight %)Block copolymerTypeC-1C-2C-3C-4C-5C-6C-7C-8 C-9C-10C-11Amount55555555555Time33333333333Fixing properties◯◯◯◯◯◯◯◯◯◯◯Offset resistance◯◯◯◯◯◯◯◯◯◯◯Development durabilityΔ◯◯◯◯ΔΔΔ◯◯◯Productivity of grindability◯◯◯◯◯◯◯◯◯◯◯Time of copolymer resin added 1: after production of resins 2: in urethane reaction 3: in production of toners 
TABLE 5Production and Evaluation of ToneExam-Exam-Exam-Exam-Exam-Exam-Exam-Exam-Exam-Exam-Exam-Example No.ple 12ple 13ple 14ple 15ple 16ple 17ple 18ple 19ple 20ple 21ple 22ResinResin 1Resin 1Resin 1Resin 1Resin 1Resin 1Resin 1Resin 1Resin 1Resin 1Resin 2Resin ATypeA-1A-1A-1A-1A-1A-1A-1A-1A-1A-1A-1(% by weight)3030303030303030303020Resin BTypeB-1B-1B-1B-1B-1B-1B-1B-1B-1B-1B-1(% by weight)7070707070707070707080Tolylene diisocyanate22222222221.7(weight %)Tg (° C.)57.957.957.957.957.957.957.957.957.957.956.8GPCMw/Mn21.421.421.421.421.421.421.421.421.421.427.6Peak molecular weight60006000600060006000600060006000600060006000THF insoluble portion44444444445(weight %)Block copolymerTypeC-12C-13C-14C-15C-16C-4C-4C-4C-4C-4C-4Amount555550.111015205Time33333333333Fixing properties◯◯◯◯◯◯◯◯◯◯◯Offset resistance◯◯◯◯◯◯◯◯◯◯◯Development durabilityΔ◯◯◯◯◯◯◯ΔΔ◯Productivity of grindability◯◯◯◯◯Δ◯◯◯◯◯Time of copolymer resin added 1: after production of resins 2: in urethane reaction 3: in production of toners 
TABLE 6Production and Evaluation of TonerExam-Exam-Exam-Exam-Exam-Exam-Exam-Exam-Exam-Exam-Example No.ple 23ple 24ple 25ple 26ple 27ple 28ple 29ple 30ple 31ple 32ResinResin 3Resin 4Resin 5Resin 6Resin 7Resin 8Resin 9Resin 10Resin 12Resin 13Resin ATypeA-1A-2A-2A-3A-4A-5A-5—A-1A-1(% by weight)3030202530100100—3030Resin BTypeB-2B-3B-3B-4B-5——B-6B-1B-1(% by weight)7070807570——1007070Tolylene diisocyanate (weight %)1.91.81.51.71.61.91.522Tg (° C.)62.555.555.857.257.155.554.159.657.957.9GPCMw/Mn29.411.213.415.224.312.66.122.521.421.4Peak molecular weight650060005500600065001000080002800060006000THF insoluble portion (weight %)7241300599Block copolymerTypeC-4C-4C-4C-4C-4C-4C-4C-4C-4C-4Amount5555555555Time3333333312Fixing properties◯◯◯◯◯◯◯Δ◯◯Offset resistance◯◯Δ◯◯ΔΔ◯◯◯Development durability◯◯Δ◯◯ΔΔ◯◯◯Productivity of grindability◯◯◯◯◯◯◯Δ◯◯Time of copolymer resin added 1: after production of resins 2: in urethane reaction 3: in production of toners 
TABLE 7Production and Evaluation of TonerCom-Com-Com-Com-parativeparativeparativeparativeExample No.Example 1Example 2Example 3Example 4ResinResin 1Resin 3Resin 5Resin 10Resin ATypeA-1A-1A-2—(% by weight)303020—Resin BTypeB-1B-2B-3B-6(% by weight)707080100Tolylene diisocyanate21.91.5(weight %)Tg (° C.)57.962.555.859.6GPCMw/Mn21.429.413.422.5Peak molecular weight60006500550028000THF insoluble portion4745(weight %)Block copolymerTypeC-4C-4C-4C-4Amount◯◯◯◯Time————Fixing properties◯◯◯XOffset resistance◯◯X◯Development durability◯◯X◯Productivity ofΔΔ◯XgrindabilityTime of copolymer resin added 1: after production of resins 2: in urethane reaction 3: in production of toners 
 





<- Previous Patent (Toner, developer, an...)   |   Next Patent (Hand application to ...) ->










Home


Search


Services


Communities


Help


Contact us

Advertise on this Site










            © 2004-2017 FreePatentsOnline.com. All rights reserved.
            Privacy Policy
                & Terms of Use.
A SumoBrain Solutions Company


 










Patent US8377508 - Solventless laminating adhesive and process for production of composite film - Google PatentsMy AccountSearchMapsYouTubePlayNewsGmailDriveCalendarGoogle+TranslatePhotosMoreShoppingWalletFinanceDocsBooksBloggerContactsHangoutsKeepEven more from GoogleSign inHidden fieldsPatentsA solventless laminating adhesive comprising a polyisocyanate component and a polyol component, both of which are free from polyol components exhibiting crystalline properties at ordinary temperatures. The adhesive exhibits an initial viscosity of 500 to 1000 mPa s three minutes after mixing of the polyisocyanate...https://www.google.com/patents/US8377508?utm_source=gb-gplus-sharePatent US8377508 - Solventless laminating adhesive and process for production of composite filmAdvanced Patent SearchTry the new Google Patents, with machine-classified Google Scholar results, and Japanese and South Korean patents.Publication numberUS8377508 B2Publication typeGrantApplication numberUS 12/451,903PCT numberPCT/JP2008/058737Publication dateFeb 19, 2013Filing dateMay 12, 2008Priority dateJun 6, 2007Fee statusPaidAlso published asCN101679831A, CN101679831B, EP2154221A1, EP2154221A4, US20100119821, WO2008149641A1Publication number12451903, 451903, PCT/2008/58737, PCT/JP/2008/058737, PCT/JP/2008/58737, PCT/JP/8/058737, PCT/JP/8/58737, PCT/JP2008/058737, PCT/JP2008/58737, PCT/JP2008058737, PCT/JP200858737, PCT/JP8/058737, PCT/JP8/58737, PCT/JP8058737, PCT/JP858737, US 8377508 B2, US 8377508B2, US-B2-8377508, US8377508 B2, US8377508B2InventorsTakashi Uemura, Shigetoshi Sasano, Yasuhiko KataokaOriginal AssigneeMitsui Chemicals, Inc.Export CitationBiBTeX, EndNote, RefManPatent Citations (16), Non-Patent Citations (1), Referenced by (2), Classifications (40), Legal Events (2) External Links: USPTO, USPTO Assignment, EspacenetSolventless laminating adhesive and process for production of composite film
US 8377508 B2Abstract
A solventless laminating adhesive comprising a polyisocyanate component and a polyol component, both of which are free from polyol components exhibiting crystalline properties at ordinary temperatures. The adhesive exhibits an initial viscosity of 500 to 1000 mPa s three minutes after mixing of the polyisocyanate component with the polyol component and a viscosity increase of 100 to 350% based on the initial viscosity 20 minutes after the mixing. In a coater which is provided with a pair of opposed rolls and in which the rolls rotates in the directions contrary to each other at the opposition site, the adhesive is applied to a film passing between the rolls.

Images(3)   Claims(3)
 
1. A process for producing a composite film, comprising:
preparing a coating apparatus provided with a pair of rolls opposed to each other, each of the rolls rotating in an opposite direction in the opposed portion, and
coating onto a film passing through between the rolls a solventless laminating adhesive
comprising a polyisocyanate component (A) and a polyol component (B), the polyisocyanate component (A) containing a urethane prepolymer (A1) having an isocyanate group at its molecular terminal and obtained by urethane reaction of a polyisocyanate monomer (a) and a polyol component (b), and the polyol component (B) and the polyol component (b) as a material of the urethane prepolymer (A1) exhibiting no crystallinity at room temperature; and
having an initial viscosity of 500 to 1000 mPa·s three minutes after the polyisocyanate component (A) and the polyol component (B) are mixed, and a viscosity increase of 100% to 350% relative to the initial viscosity 20 minutes after the mixing.


  
2. A process for producing a composite film according to claim 1, wherein the film is coated at 40 to 80° C.

  
3. A process for producing a composite film according to claim 1, wherein a coating speed of the film is 150 m/minute or higher. 

 
Description
TECHNICAL FIELD
The present invention relates to a solventless laminating adhesive and a process for producing a composite film. More specifically, the present invention relates to a solventless laminating adhesive suitably used in order to produce a composite film, and a process for producing the composite film.
BACKGROUND ART
Composite films having a plurality of films adhesively bonded with a laminating adhesive are widely used in the field of packaging materials.
Two-part laminating adhesives composed of a base composition containing polyol and a curing agent containing polyisocyanate have been widely known hitherto.
In recent years, there has been studied the development of a two-part solventless laminating adhesive without containing any organic solvent from the viewpoints of reduction of environmental load and improvement of working environment.
For example, there has been proposed a solvent-free two-part curable adhesive composition containing a polyol component (A) and a polyisocyanate component (B), the composition having a viscosity of 900 mPa·s or more at 80° C. immediately after the components (A) and (B) are mixed together (see, for example, the following Patent Document 1).
Also, there has been proposed a solvent-free two-component curable adhesive composition containing a polyol component (A) and a polyisocyanate component (B), in which at least either component (A) or (B) contains at least one polyol component selected from the group consisting of a polyether polyol, a polycarbonate polyol, and a polyurethane polyol, and exhibiting crystallinity at room temperature; and a proportion of the crystalline polyol component is 3 to 50% by weight of the total weight of the components (A) and (B) (see, for example, the following Patent Document 2). The solvent-free two-component curable adhesive composition has a viscosity of 100 to 1500 mPa·s at 70° C. immediately after the components (A) and (B) are mixed together, and an increasing ratio of the viscosity after the composition is stood at 70° C. for 10 minutes is 120% or less relative to the viscosity immediately after the mixing.
Further, there has been proposed a two-part curable solventless adhesive, in which a base composition contains a polyol having an acid group and a secondary or tertiary terminal hydroxyl groups accounting for 30% or more of the entire terminal hydroxyl groups, and a curing agent contains an isocyanate group-terminated urethane prepolymer having an average functionality of 1.5 to 2.5 which is obtained by reaction of an aralkyl polyisocyanate and a polyol, and an aliphatic polyisocyanate, and/or a modified substance thereof (see, for example, the following Patent Document 3).
The two-part solventless laminating adhesive described above is obtained by mixing the base composition and the curing agent in a solventless laminating apparatus, and the mixture is coated onto a film which passes through between a pair of rolls each rotating in the same direction in opposed relation to each other. Subsequently, the film is adhesively bonded to the other film with a nip roller, to thereby produce a composite film.
  Patent Document 1: Japanese Unexamined Patent Publication No. 2001-172602 Patent Document 2: Japanese Unexamined Patent Publication No. 2002-249745 Patent Document 3: Japanese Unexamined Patent Publication No. 2006-213801 
DISCLOSURE OF THE INVENTION
Problems to be Solved
However, when, in the solventless laminating apparatus the mixture of the base composition and the curing agent is coated onto the film with the pair of rolls each rotating in the same direction in opposed relation to each other, air is inadvertently entrapped during coating due to air entrainment, so that minute air bubbles may be generated in the adhesive layer of the composite film. Moreover, it has been known that, on the downstream side of the pair of rolls in the film transport direction, a paddle-like stringing phenomenon occurs between the surfaces of the rolls which are spaced apart from each other. When such stringing phenomenon occurs, the film surface coated with the adhesive may be damaged, resulting in formation of a minute void in the adhesive layer of the composite film.
In the meantime, even if the two-part solventless laminating adhesive does not contain any organic solvent, its viscosity needs to be low enough to enable coating. Therefore, as compared with the case of blending an organic solvent into the adhesive, the average molecular weights of the base composition and the curing agent in the two-part solventless laminating adhesive must be significantly low. The small average molecular weights of the base composition and the curing agent make an initial cohesive force weak, so that the adhesive needs to be aged for several days in order to exhibit adhesive strength. During the aging, air bubbles and minute voids existing in the adhesive layer move, gather, and develop. As a result, a spot-like (matte or orange peel-like) appearance of the composite film is disadvantageously formed. In particular, such disadvantage is apparent in a film having excellent gas barrier property because entrapped air bubbles are difficult to remove.
On the other hand, there is a process of coating the two-part solventless laminating adhesive at high temperature so as to increase the average molecular weights of the base composition and the curing agent to some extent. However, when the adhesive is coated at high temperature, damage to the film cannot be avoided.
When the coating speed is increased in order to improve productivity, a stringy adhesive generated by the above-mentioned stringing phenomenon is torn into pieces during the coating, and the torn adhesive pieces are then scattered into air to cause a large quantity of mist, resulting in significant deterioration of the working environment.
It is an object of the present invention to provide a solventless laminating adhesive capable of avoiding poor appearance of a composite film adhered with the adhesive although it is a solventless laminating adhesive, coating while reducing damage to a film, and further improving productivity while preventing deterioration of the working environment, and a process for producing a composite film using the solventless laminating adhesive.
Means for Solving the Problem
The solventless laminating adhesive of the present invention contains a polyisocyanate component and a polyol component, both of which are free from polyol components exhibiting crystallinity at room temperature; has an initial viscosity of 500 to 1000 mPa·s three minutes after the polyisocyanate component and the polyol component are mixed, and a viscosity increase of 100% to 350% relative to the initial viscosity 20 minutes after the mixing; and in a coating apparatus provided with a pair of rolls opposed to each other, each of the rolls rotating in an opposite direction in the opposed portion, is coated onto a film passing through between the rolls.
In the solventless laminating adhesive of the present invention, it is preferable that the film is coated at 40 to 80° C.
In the solventless laminating adhesive of the present invention, it is preferable that a coating speed of the film is 150 m/minute or higher.
In the solventless laminating adhesive of the present invention, it is preferable that the polyisocyanate component contains a urethane prepolymer having an isocyanate group at its molecular terminal and having a number average molecular weight of 450 to 2000, and the polyol component contains a polyester polyol having a number average molecular weight of 100 to 2000.
A process for producing a composite film according to the present invention, in a coating apparatus provided with a pair of rolls opposed to each other, each of the rolls rotating in an opposite direction in the opposed portion, a solventless laminating adhesive containing a polyisocyanate component and a polyol component, both of which are free from polyol components exhibiting crystallinity at room temperature; and having an initial viscosity of 500 to 1000 mPa·s three minutes after the polyisocyanate component and the polyol component are mixed, and a viscosity increase of 100% to 350% relative to the initial viscosity 20 minutes after the mixing, is coated onto a film passing through between the rolls.
In the process for producing a composite film according to the present invention, it is preferable that the film is coated at 40 to 80° C.
In the process for producing a composite film according to the present invention, it is preferable that a coating speed of the film is 150 m/minute or higher.
Effect of the Invention
In the process for producing a composite film according to the present invention, the solventless laminating adhesive of the present invention is coated onto a film with a pair of rolls rotating in the opposite direction to each other. Therefore, during the coating, a shearing force applied by the pair of rolls can reduce occurrence of air bubbles and can prevent occurrence of a stringing phenomenon.
The solventless laminating adhesive of the present invention has an initial viscosity of 500 to 1000 mPa·s three minutes after a polyisocyanate component and a polyol component are mixed, and a viscosity increase of 100% to 350% relative to the initial viscosity 20 minutes after the mixing. For this reason, coating can be performed at low temperature and high speed with the pair of rolls rotating in the opposite direction to each other.
Therefore, although the adhesive is a solventless laminating adhesive, poor appearance of the composite film adhered with such adhesive can be avoided. Besides, since the coating can be performed at low temperature, damage to the film can be reduced during the coating. Further, since the coating can be performed at high speed, productivity can be improved and deterioration of the working environment resulting from mist can be prevented.

BRIEF DESCRIPTION OF THE DRAWINGS
 FIG. 1 is a schematic explanatory view showing a solventless laminator adopting a reverse system serving as a coating apparatus, which is used for applying a solventless laminating adhesive according to the present invention; and
 FIG. 2 is a schematic explanatory view showing another embodiment of a solventless laminator adopting a reverse system.

EMBODIMENT OF THE INVENTION
The solventless laminating adhesive of the present invention, which is two components type, contains a polyisocyanate component and a polyol component.
Examples of the polyisocyanate component include polyisocyanate monomers and derivatives thereof, and urethane prepolymers.
The polyisocyanate monomers that may be used include, for example, aromatic diisocyanate, aralkyl diisocyanate, alicyclic diisocyanate, and aliphatic diisocyanate.
The aromatic diisocyanate that may be used includes, for example, m- or p-phenylene diisocyanate or mixtures thereof, 2,4- or 2,6-tolylene diisocyanate or mixtures thereof (TDI), 4,4′-, 2,4′- or 2,2′-diphenylmethane diisocyanate or mixtures thereof (MDI), 4,4′-toluidine diisocyanate (TODI), 4,4′-diphenyletherdiisocyanate, 4,4′-diphenyl diisocyanate, and 1,5-naphthalene diisocyanate (NDI).
The aralkyl diisocyanate that may be used includes, for example, 1,3- or 1,4-xylylene diisocyanate or mixtures thereof (XDI), 1,3- or 1,4-tetramethylxylylene diisocyanate or mixtures thereof (TMXDI), and ω,ω′-diisocyanate-1,4-diethylbenzene.
The alicyclic diisocyanate that may be used includes, for example, 1,3-cyclopentene diisocyanate, 1,4-cyclohexane diisocyanate, 1,3-cyclohexane diisocyanate, 3-isocyanatomethyl-3,5,5-trimethylcyclohexyl isocyanate (isophorone diisocyanate; IPDI), 4,4′-, 2,4′- or 2,2′-dicyclohexylmethane diisocyanate or mixtures thereof (hydrogenated MDI), methyl-2,4-cyclohexane diisocyanate, methyl-2,6-cyclohexane diisocyanate, and 1,3-, 1,4-bis(isocyanatomethyl)cyclohexane or mixtures thereof (hydrogenated XDI).
The aliphatic diisocyanate that may be used includes, for example, trimethylene diisocyanate, tetramethylene diisocyanate, hexamethylene diisocyanate (HDI), pentamethylene diisocyanate, 1,2-, 2,3- or 1,3-butylene diisocyanate, and 2,4,4- or 2,2,4-trimethyl hexamethylene diisocyanate.
The derivatives of the polyisocyanate monomers that may be used include, for example, multimers (dimers, trimers, pentamers, septamers, etc.) of polyisocyanate monomers, biuret-modified polyisocyanates (e.g., biurets produced by reaction of the polyisocyanate monomers with water), allophanate-modified polyisocyanates (e.g., allophanates produced by reaction of the polyisocyanate monomers with monol or polyol components (described later)), urea-modified polyisocyanates (e.g., ureas produced by reaction of the polyisocyanate monomers with diamines), oxadiazinetrione-modified polyisocyanates (e.g., oxadiazinetriones produced by reaction of the polyisocyanate monomers with carbon dioxide), and carbodiimide-modified polyisocyanates (carbodiimides produced by decarboxylation condensation reaction of the polyisocyanate monomers). In the derivatives of the polyisocyanate monomers, as the polyisocyanate monomer, alicyclic diisocyanate and aliphatic diisocyanate are preferable, or HDI is more preferable.
The urethane prepolymer is a urethane prepolymer having an isocyanate group at its molecular terminal, and can be obtained by urethane reaction of the polyisocyanate monomer and the polyol component (described later) at such a ratio that the equivalent ratio (NCO/OH) of the isocyanate group of the polyisocyanate monomer to the hydroxyl group of the polyol component is more than 1, or preferably 2 to 100. The urethane reaction can be performed according to a known process, and preferably, polyisocyanate monomers left unreacted are removed by a known removing process, such as subjecting to thin-film distillation.
In the urethane prepolymer, as the polyisocyanate monomer, aromatic diisocyanate and aralkyl diisocyanate are preferable, or MDI and XDI are more preferable. The polyol component that may be used preferably includes polyester polyol and polyether polyol which does not exhibit crystallinity at room temperature. The urethane prepolymer has a number average molecular weight of, for example, 450 to 2000, or preferably 500 to 1500. The number average molecular weight of the polyisocyanate component can be calculated from the isocyanate equivalent weight and the isocyanate functionality.
The polyisocyanate component is one kind or two or more kinds selected from the polyisocyanate monomers, derivatives thereof, and urethane prepolymers. The polyisocyanate component preferably contains a derivative of the polyisocyanate monomer and/or a urethane prepolymer, or more preferably contains at least a urethane prepolymer. Specific examples thereof include the combination use of at least one kind selected from trimers and biuret-, allophanate-, and urea-modified polyisocyanates, and a urethane prepolymer. More specific examples thereof include the combination use of at least one kind selected from trimers and allophanate-modified polyisocyanates, and a urethane prepolymer. In this case, as for the amount of the modified polyisocyanate and the urethane prepolymer to be blended, the amount of the modified polyisocyanate is, for example, 5 to 300 parts by weight, or preferably 10 to 100 parts by weight, per 100 parts by weight of the urethane prepolymer.
The isocyanate equivalent weight of the polyisocyanate component is, for example, 150 to 750, or preferably 200 to 500. The isocyanate equivalent weight can be obtained by amine titration.
The polyol component is not particularly limited as long as it is not a component exhibiting crystallinity at room temperature, and preferred examples thereof include polyester polyols, polyether polyols, and polyurethane polyols.
Examples of the component exhibiting crystallinity at room temperature include polyethylene adipate or polybutylene adipate having a number average molecular weight of 1000 or more, polyoxytetramethylene ether glycol having a number average molecular weight of 1000 or more, polyethylene glycol having a number average molecular weight of 1000 or more, and polyethylene polypropylene glycol (ethyleneoxide-propyleneoxide block copolymer: ethylene oxide content of 80% by weight or more) having a number average molecular weight of 3000 or more.
The polyester polyol can be obtained by a condensation reaction between a polybasic acid and a polyhydric alcohol, or a transesterification reaction between an alkyl ester of a polybasic acid and a polyhydric alcohol.
Examples of the polybasic acid include an aliphatic polycarboxylic acid such as succinic acid, glutaric acid, adipic acid, pimelic acid, cork acid, azelaic acid, sebacic acid, dodecanoic acid, and dimer acid; an alicyclic polycarboxylic acid such as hexahydrophthalic acid and tetrahydrophtalic acid, and an aromatic polycarboxylic acid such as phthalic acid, isophthalic acid, terephthalic acid, trimellitic acid, and pyromellitic acid.
Examples of the alkyl ester of the polybasic acid include C1-4 alkyl esters of the polybasic acids mentioned above.
Examples of the polyhydric alcohol include an aliphatic diol, an alicyclic diol, an aromatic diol, and a polyfunctional polyol.
Examples of the aliphatic diol include ethylene glycol, diethylene glycol, triethylene glycol, propylene glycol, dipropylene glycol, tripropylene glycol, 1,4-butanediol, 1,3-butanediol, 1,2-butanediol, 2-methyl-1,3-propanediol, 1,5-pentanediol, 3-methyl-1,5-pentanediol, 2,4-diethyl-1,5-pentanediol, 2,2,4-trimethylpentane-1,3-diol, 1,6-hexandiol, neopentyl glycol, 1,5-heptanediol, 1,7-heptanediol, 3,3′-dimethylolheptane, 1,8-octanediol, 1,9-nonanediol, 1,10-decanediol, 1,11-undecanediol, 1,12-undecanediol, 12-hydroxystearyl alcohol, and a hydrogenated dimer diol.
Examples of the alicyclic diol include hydrogenated bisphenol A, hydrogenated xylylenediol, cyclohexanediol, and cyclohexanedimethanol.
Examples of the aromatic diol include bisphenol A, bishydroxyethylterephthalate, catechol, resorcinol, hydroquinone, and 1,3- or 1,4-xylylenediol.
Examples of the polyfunctional polyol include a polyol having three or more hydroxyl groups, such as glycerin, trimethylolpropane, pentaerythritol, and sorbitol.
The condensation reaction or the transesterification reaction can be performed according to a known process without any particular limitation, and for example, the respective components are charged, and the mixture was allowed to react at 150 to 240° C. for 7 to 50 hours. A known catalyst (e.g., a titanium catalyst, a zinc catalyst, etc.) may be used for such reaction.
The polyester polyol has a number average molecular weight of, for example, 100 to 2000, or preferably 200 to 1500. The number average molecular weight of the polyol component can be calculated from the hydroxyl equivalent weight which is obtained by titration and the hydroxyl functionality.
It is preferable that the polyester polyol has an acid group. Examples of the acid group include a carboxylic acid group, a sulfonic acid group, a phosphoric acid group, or metal salts thereof. Among them, a carboxylic acid group is preferable.
The proportion of the acid group is 0.3% (% by mole, the same applies to the following.) or more and less than 20%, preferably 0.4% or more, or more preferably 0.5% or more and less than 15%, of the total of the entire terminal hydroxyl groups in the polyester polyol. When the proportion of the acid group is set to 0.3% or more, adhesive strength can be improved. On the other hand, when the proportion of the acid group is set to less than 20%, a significant increase in viscosity during blending of the polyisocyanate component and the polyol component can be suppressed.
The polyester polyol having an acid group can be obtained, for example, by allowing an acid anhydride to react with a terminal hydroxyl group of a polyester polyol to thereby acid-modify the polyester polyol, or by synthesizing a polyester polyol using a polyhydric alcohol having an acid group (e.g., dimethylol propionic acid, dimethylolbutanoic acid, etc.) as one of the raw material components. Such introduction of the acid group can improve adhesive strength. The polyester polyol having an acid group can be obtained preferably by allowing an acid anhydride to react with a terminal hydroxyl group of a polyester polyol to thereby acid-modify the polyester polyol.
The acid anhydride that may be used for the modification includes, for example, trimellitic anhydride, phthalic anhydride, maleic anhydride, and pyromellitic anhydride. Among them, trimellitic anhydride is preferable.
The acid modification ratio with the acid anhydride is determined according to the proportion of the acid group described above, and more specifically, the amount of the acid anhydride is 1.5 parts by weight or more and less than 10 parts by weight, preferably 2 parts by weight or more and less than 5 parts by weight, or more preferably 2.2 parts by weight or more and less than 5 parts by weight, per 100 parts by weight of the polyester polyol to be acid-modified.
The terminal hydroxyl group is modified by the acid anhydride, for example, by blending an acid anhydride with a polyester polyol at the above-mentioned ratio, and the mixture is allowed to react at 100 to 200° C. This introduces an acid group into the molecular terminal of the polyester polyol. For this reaction, if necessary, the above-mentioned polyhydric alcohol may be allowed to react with the acid anhydride.
Examples of the polyether polyol which does not exhibit crystallinity at room temperature include polypropylene glycols, polyethylene glycols having a number average molecular weight of 200 or less, and polyethylene polypropylene glycol (ethyleneoxide-propyleneoxide block copolymer: ethylene oxide content of 50% by weight or less) having a number average molecular weight of 3000 or less. Among them, polypropylene glycol is preferable.
The polyurethane polyol can be obtained by urethane reaction of the above-mentioned polyisocyanate monomer with the above-mentioned polyester polyol and/or the polyether polyol that does not exhibit crystallinity at room temperature at such a ratio that the equivalent ratio (NCO/OH) of the isocyanate group of the polyisocyanate monomer to the hydroxyl group of the polyester polyol and/or the polyether polyol is less than 1. In the polyurethane polyol, as the polyisocyanate monomer, aromatic diisocyanate and aralkyl diisocyanate are preferable. The polyurethane polyol has a number average molecular weight of, for example, 400 to 5000, or preferably 600 to 3000.
The polyol component is one kind or two or more kinds selected from the polyester polyol, the polyether polyol that does not exhibit crystallinity at room temperature, and the polyurethane polyol.
For example, a silane coupling agent, an oxyacid of phosphorus, or its derivative can be blended with either or both of the polyisocyanate component and the polyol component as required.
The silane coupling agent that may be used is represented, for example, by the structural formula: R—Si≡(X)3 or R—Si≡(R′) (X)2 (wherein R represents an organic group having a vinyl, epoxy, amino, imino, isocyanate, or mercapto group; R′ represents a lower alkyl group; and X represents a methoxy or ethoxy group, or chlorine atom.)
Specific examples of the silane coupling agent include chlorosilanes such as vinyl trichlorosilane; aminosilanes such as N-β-(aminoethyl)-γ-aminopropyltrimethoxysilane, γ-aminopropyltriethoxysilane, N-β-(aminoethyl)-γ-propylmethyldimethoxysilane, n-(dimethoxymethylsilylpropyl)ethylenediamine, n-(triethoxysilylpropyl)ethylenediamine, and N-phenyl-γ-aminopropyl trimethoxysilane; epoxysilanes such as γ-glycidoxypropyltrimetoxysilane, γ-glycidoxypropyltriethoxysilane, β-(3,4-epoxycyclohexyl)ethyltrimethoxysilane, and di(γ-glycidoxypropyl)dimethoxysilane; vinyl silanes such as vinyltriethoxysilane; and isocyanate silanes such as 3-isocyanatopropyltrimethoxysilane and 3-isocyanatepropyltriethoxysilane.
These silane coupling agents can be used alone or in combination of two or more kinds. The amount of the silane coupling agent is, for example, 0.001 to 10 parts by weight, or preferably 0.01 to 5 parts by weight, per 100 parts by weight of the polyisocyanate component and the polyol component.
In the oxyacids of phosphorus or its derivative, the oxyacids of phosphorus that may be used includes, for example, phosphoric acids, such as phosphinic acid, phosphorous acid, orthophosphoric acid, and hypophosphoric acid; and condensed phosphoric acid, such as metaphosphoric acid, pyrophosphoric acid, tripoliphosphoric acid, polyphosphoric acid, and ultraphosphoric acid.
The derivatives of the oxyacids of phosphorus that may be used include, for example, salts such as sodium salts and potassium salts, of phosphoric acids or condensed phosphoric acids; monoesters such as monomethyl orthophosphate, monoethyl orthophosphate, monopropyl orthophosphate, monobutyl orthophosphate, mono-2-ethylhexyl orthophosphate, monophenyl orthophosphorate, monomethyl phosphite, monoethyl phosphite, monopropyl phosphite, monobutyl phosphite, mono-2-ethylhexyl phosphite, and monophenyl phosphite; di- and triesters such as di-2-ethylhexyl orthophosphate, diphenyl orthophosphate, trimethyl orthophosphate, trietyl orthophosphate, tripropyl orthophosphate, tributyl orthophosphate, tri-2-ethylhexyl orthophosphate, triphenyl orthophosphate, dimethyl phosphite, diethyl phosphite, dipropyl phosphite, dibutyl phosphite, di-2-ethylhexyl phosphite, diphenyl phosphite, trimethyl phosphite, triethyl phosphite, tripropyl phosphite, tributyl phosphite, tri-2-ethylhexyl phosphite, and triphenyl phosphite; or mono-, di- and triesters obtained from condensed phosphoric acids and alcohols.
These oxyacids of phosphorus or their derivatives can be used alone or in combination of two or more kinds. Among them, those having at least one free oxyacid, such as orthophosphoric acids and polyphosphoric acids, are preferable. The amount of the oxyacid of phosphorus or its derivative to be blended is, for example, 0.001 to 3 parts by weight, or preferably 0.01 to 2.5 parts by weight, per 100 parts by weight of the polyisocyanate component and the polyol component.
Further, additives such as epoxy resins, catalysts, coating improving agents, leveling agents, antifoaming agents, stabilizers including antioxidant and ultraviolet absorbers, plasticizers, surfactants, pigments, fillers, organic or inorganic fine particles, and antifungal agents may be blended with either or both of the polyisocyanate component and the polyol component as required. The amount of these additives to be blended is appropriately determined according to the purposes and applications.
The solventless laminating adhesive of the present invention is prepared so as to have an initial viscosity of 500 to 1000 mPa·s three minutes after the polyisocyanate component and the polyol component are mixed and a viscosity increase of 100 to 350% relative to the initial viscosity 20 minutes after the mixing.
The above-mentioned viscosity is the one at the coating temperature (40 to 80° C.) to be described later, and specifically, can be determined according to the viscosity at 60° C.
When the initial viscosity three minutes after the mixing is less than 500 mPa·s, the low viscosity disadvantageously causes poor transfer (insufficient amount of coating) of the adhesive. Further, when it exceeds 1000 mPa·s, the high viscosity disadvantageously causes poor transfer (poor appearance of blur and streaks) of the adhesive. However, when the initial viscosity three minutes after the mixing is within the range of 500 to 1000 mPa·s, such disadvantages do not occur, and the adhesive can be uniformly coated to thereby achieve good appearance.
On the other hand, when the viscosity increase is less than 100% relative to the initial viscosity 20 minutes after the mixing, the curing property of the adhesive is deteriorated, and when it exceeds 350%, the adhesive thickens to damage the coating property. However, when the viscosity increase is within the range of 100 to 350% relative to the initial viscosity 20 minutes after the mixing, the curing property and the coating property of the adhesive can be simultaneously satisfied.
The polyisocyanate component and the polyol component are prepared at such a ratio that, in the mixing ratio, the equivalent ratio (NCO/OH) of the isocyanate group of the polyisocyanate component to the hydroxyl group of the polyol component is, for example, 0.5 to 5.0, or preferably 0.8 to 4.0.
The solventless laminating adhesive of the present invention, which serves as a two-part solventless laminating adhesive including the polyisocyanate component as a curing agent and the polyol component as a base composition, is coated on a film by a solventless laminator adopting a reverse system.
 FIG. 1 is a schematic explanatory view showing a solventless laminator adopting a reverse system serving as a coating apparatus, which is used for coating a solventless laminating adhesive according to the present invention.
The solventless laminator 1 includes a first delivery roll 2, a second delivery roll 3, a take-up roll 4, a feed unit 5, a coating unit 6, a laminating unit 7, and a cooling unit 8.
A long length of first film 9 onto which the solventless laminating adhesive (hereinafter referred to as an adhesive 23) of the present invention is coated is wound around a surface of the first delivery roll 2.
A second film 10 laminated on the surface of the first film 9 having the adhesives 23 coated thereon is wound around a surface of the second delivery roll 3.
The take-up roll 4 winds up a composite film 11 having the first film 9 laminated on the second film 10.
The feed unit 5 includes a curing agent tank 12, a base composition tank 13, and a mixer 14. A curing agent, that is, a polyisocyanate component, is stored in the curing agent tank 12. A base resin, that is, a polyol component, is stored in the base resin tank 13. The curing agent tank 12 and the base composition tank 13 each are coupled to the mixer 14. In the mixer 14, the curing agent and the base composition supplied from the curing agent tank 12 and the base composition tank 13, respectively, are mixed.
The coating unit 6 is arranged between the first delivery roll 2 and the laminating unit 7 in the transport direction of the first film 9. The coating unit 6 includes a doctor roll 16, a metering roll 17, a coating roll 18, and an impression roll 19.
The doctor roll 16 is arranged on the upstream-most side (the “upstream side” and the “downstream side” in the coating unit 6 are relative to the direction of flow of the adhesive 23) in the coating unit 6.
The metering roll 17 is arranged on the downstream side of the doctor roll 16 in opposed relation to the doctor roll 16 so as to be in contact therewith. The metering roll 17 rotates in the same direction as the doctor roll 16 in the portion contacting with the doctor roll 16.
The coating roll 18 is arranged on the downstream side of the metering roll 17 in opposed relation to the metering roll 17 so as to be in contact therewith. The coating roll 18 rotates in the same direction as the metering roll 17 in the portion contacting with the metering roll 17.
The impression roll 19 is arranged in opposed relation to the coating roll 18 so as to be in contact therewith. The impression roll 19 rotates in the opposite direction (the same direction as the transport direction of the first film 9) to the coating roll 18 in the portion contacting with the coating roll 18.
The laminating unit 7 is arranged on the downstream side in the transport direction of the first film 9 with respect to the coating unit 6 and on the downstream side in the transport direction of the second film 10 with respect to the second delivery roll 3. The laminating unit 7 includes a laminating roll 24 and a nip roll 25.
The laminating roll 24 and the nip roll 25 are arranged in opposed relation to each other so as to be in contact with each other. Further, the laminating roll 24 and the nip roll 25 each rotate in the same direction in the contacting portion therebetween.
In the transport direction of the first film 9, a tension roller 20 is arranged between the coating unit 6 and the laminating unit 7.
The cooling unit 8 is arranged between the laminating unit 7 and the take-up roll 4 in the transport direction of the composite film 11. The cooling unit 8 includes a cooling roller 21 and a driven roller 22. The cooling roller 21 and the driven roller 22 are arranged in opposed relation to each other so as to be in contact therebetween. Further, the cooling roller 21 and the driven roller 22 each rotate in the same direction in the contacting portion therebetween.
In the solventless laminator 1, the curing agent stored in the curing agent tank 12 and the base composition stored in the base composition tank 13 are first supplied to the mixer 14. In the mixer 14, the curing agent and the base composition are mixed to prepare the adhesive 23.
Then, in the coating unit 6, the adhesive 23 is supplied between the doctor roll 16 and the metering roll 17 each rotating in the same direction. The supplied adhesive 23 is transferred onto the metering roll 17. Subsequently, the adhesive 23 passes through between the metering roll 17 and the coating roll 18 each rotating in the same direction, and is then transferred onto the coating roll 18.
On the other hand, the first film 9 delivered from the first delivery roll 2 is transported between the coating roll 18 and the impression roll 19 in the coating unit 6.
Therefore, the adhesive 23 transferred on the coating roll 18 is coated from the coating roll 18 rotating in the opposite direction with respect to the transport direction of the first film 9, to the first film 9 passing through between a pair of rolls, namely the coating roll 18 and the impression roll 19, which rotate in the opposite direction to each other in the portion (opposed portion) contacting therebetween.
Subsequently, the first film 9 coated with the adhesive 23 passes the tension roller 20, and is then transported between the laminating roll 24 and the nip roll 25 in the laminating unit 7. On the other hand, the second film 10 delivered from the second delivery roll 3 is transported between the laminating roll 24 and the nip roll 25 in the laminating unit 7. Therefore, the first film 9 and the second film 10 are adhered through the adhesive 23 between the laminating roll 24 and the nip roll 25 each rotating in the same direction, and the adhered films are then turned into the composite film 11 to be delivered out between these rolls.
Thereafter, in the cooling unit 8, the composite film 11 passes through between the cooling roller 21 and the driven roller 22, and cooled while passing. Finally, the cooled film is transported to the take-up roll 4 to be wound up.
In the solventless laminator 1, the time after the adhesive 23 is prepared by the mixer 14 until it is coated onto the first film 9 is, for example, 0.5 to 20 minutes, or preferably 1 to 10 minutes.
In the solventless laminator 1, the coating temperature of the adhesive 23 applied on the first film 9 is, for example, 40 to 80° C., or preferably 50 to 70° C. The coating temperature is determined by the preset temperature of the coating roll 18. More specifically, the temperature in the feed unit 5 is controlled so that the curing agent tank 12, the base composition tank 13, and the mixer 14 are set to the coating temperature. The temperature in the coating unit 6 is also controlled so that the doctor roll 16, the metering roll 17, the coating roll 18, and the impression roll 19 are set to the coating temperature. Thus, the adhesive 23 is coated onto the first film 9 at the preset temperature of the coating roll 18. When the coating temperature is within the above range, damage to the first film 9 due to heat can be minimized.
Incidentally, when the adhesive 23 is coated onto the first film 9 from the coating roll 18, the surface temperature of the coating roll 18 may rise due to friction. In order to prevent such temperature rise, the coating roll 18 is provided with cooling means (e.g., a conduit for distributing warm water to the coating roll 18).
The coating speed of the first film 9 is, for example, 150 m/minute or higher. When the coating speed is within the above range, improved appearance and productivity of the composite film 11 may be compatible.
In the solventless laminator 1, the amount of the adhesive 23 coated on the first film 9 is, for example, 0.5 to 5.0 g/m2, or preferably 0.8 to 4.0 g/m2. When the coating amount is less than 0.5 g/m2, adhesiveness is not sufficiently exhibited, which may result in poor appearance. On the other hand, when the coating amount exceeds 5.0 g/m2, the adhesive 23 may leak out from the end portion of the composite film 11, which may deteriorate the quality of the composite film 11.
Other coating conditions employed in the solventless laminator 1 may be common and can be appropriately set.
In the solventless laminator 1, the coating roll 18 and the impression roll 19 are not limited to the above-mentioned type as long as they can rotate in the opposite direction to each other, and various types can be used without limitation of the number of rolls or their arrangement.
For example, the solventless laminator 1 shown in FIG. 1 is a type of which the adhesive 23 is coated onto the first film 9 with the doctor roll 16, the metering roll 17, the coating roll 18, and the impression roll 19 in the coating unit 6. However, for example, as shown in FIG. 2, the type of which the adhesive 23 is coated onto the first film 9 with the doctor roll 16, the metering roll 17, a cutting roll 26, the coating roll 18, and the impression roll 19 may be used. The same reference numerals are used in FIG. 2 for the same members as those shown in FIG. 1, and the description thereof is omitted.
In FIG. 2, the coating unit 6 includes the doctor roll 16, the metering roll 17, the cutting roll 26, the coating roll 18, and the impression roll 19.
The metering roll 17 is arranged in opposed relation on the downstream side of the doctor roll 16 so as to be in contact with the doctor roll 16. The metering roll 17 rotates in the same direction as the doctor roll 16 in the portion contacting with the doctor roll 16.
The cutting roll 26 is arranged in opposed relation on the downstream side of the metering roll 17 so as to be in contact with the metering roll 17. The cutting roll 26 rotates in the same direction as the metering roll 17 in the portion contacting with the metering roll 17.
The coating roll 18 is arranged in opposed relation on the downstream side of the cutting roll 26 so as to be in contact with the cutting roll 26. The coating roll 18 rotates in the same direction as the cutting roll 26 in the portion contacting with the cutting roll 26.
The film adhered with the solventless laminating adhesive of the present invention is not particularly limited as long as it is a film to be laminated as a composite film, and examples thereof include a metal foil used as a barrier layer and a plastic film used as an inner layer of the bather layer.
The metal that may be used to form the metal foil includes, for example, aluminum, stainless steel, iron, copper, and lead. The metal foil has a thickness of 5 to 100 μm, or preferably 5 to 20 μm.
The plastic that may be used to form the plastic film includes, for example, an olefinic polymer (e.g., polyethylene, polypropylene); a polyester polymer (e.g., polyalkylene terephthalate such as polyethylene terephthalate (PET) and polybutylene terephthalate; polyalkylene naphthalate; and a copolyester that contains these polyalkylene arylate units as main ingredients); a polyamide polymer (e.g., nylon 6, nylon 66); and a vinyl polymer (e.g., polyvinyl chloride, ethylene-vinyl acetate copolymer, ethylene-vinyl alcohol copolymer).
The plastic film also includes a film having inorganic layer formed on at least one side thereof The inorganic layer may be formed by a vacuum evaporation, sputtering, or sol-gel technique. The inorganic substance that may be used to form the inorganic layer includes, for example, an element such as titanium, aluminum, and silicon; or an inorganic compound including the above-mentioned element(s) (e.g., oxide). Specific examples thereof include deposited films such as an aluminum-deposited film and a silica-deposited film.
Moreover, the plastic film may be a laminated composite film (first laminated film) constructed of any co-extruded films or the above-mentioned plastic films which are bonded together.
The plastic film is a non-oriented film (non-oriented polyethylene, non-oriented polypropylene (CPP), etc.), or a uniaxially or biaxially oriented film (biaxially oriented polypropylene, biaxially oriented polyalkylene terephthalate, nylon, etc.) without any particular limitation, and can be appropriately selected according to the purposes.
The plastic film usually has a thickness of 5 to 200 μm.
The surfaces of the metal foil and the plastic film may be subjected to surface treatment, such as corona discharge treatment and primer bonding treatment. Further, the metal foil and the plastic film may be appropriately printed.
These metal foil and plastic film are appropriately used as either the first film 9 or the second film 10 in the above-mentioned solventless laminator 1.
After the composite film 11 obtained by the above-mentioned solventless laminator 1 is wound up by the take-up roll 4, and is thereafter aged at room temperature or under heating, so that the aged film is cured.
The solventless laminator 1 can be used for primary lamination, secondary lamination, or the like without any particular limitation, and for example, the adhesive 23 is coated onto a surface of the barrier layer or a surface of the plastic film by the solventless laminator 1, and the adhesion surfaces are laminated to prepare a primary composite film (primary lamination). Thereafter, the primary composite film is aged at room temperature or under heating (e.g., at 25 to 60° C.), so that the aged film is cured. Subsequently, the adhesive 23 is coated onto a surface of the primary composite film or a surface of the plastic film by the solventless laminator 1, and the adhesion surfaces are laminated to prepare a secondary composite film (secondary lamination). Thereafter, the secondary composite film is aged at room temperature or under heating (e.g., at 25 to 60° C.), so that the aged film is cured.
When the composite film 11 is produced in the above-mentioned manner, the adhesive 23 is coated on the first film 9 by a pair of rolls, namely the coating roll 18 and the impression roll 19, which rotate in the opposite direction to each other. Therefore, during the coating, a shearing force applied by the coating roll 18 and the impression roll 19 can reduce generation of air bubbles and can prevent occurrence of a stringing phenomenon.
The adhesive 23 has an initial viscosity of 500 to 1000 mPa·s three minutes after the curing agent and the base composition are mixed, and a viscosity increase of 100% to 350% relative to the initial viscosity 20 minutes after the mixing. For this reason, coating can be performed at low temperature and high speed with the coating roll 18 and the impression roll 19 that rotate in the opposite direction to each other.
Therefore, although the adhesive 23 is a solventless laminating adhesive, poor appearance of the composite film 11 adhered with such adhesive can be avoided. Besides, since the coating can be performed at low temperature, damage to the first film 9 can be reduced during the coating. Further, since the coating can be performed at high speed, productivity can be improved and deterioration of the working environment resulting from mist can be prevented.
The composite film 11 obtained in the above-mentioned manner has excellent appearance and adhesive strength over a long period of time, even after subjected to high-temperature sterilization treatment, such as hot-water spray treatment, hot-water rotary sterilization treatment or steam rotary sterilization treatment, which is hot water treatment at 100° C. or higher, and is excellent in adhesiveness for lamination, heat-and-humidity resistance, and aptitude for high-temperature sterilization while the occurrence of peeling between the layers can be reduced and without spoiling the content. Therefore, the composite film 11 can be effectively used for producing packaging materials in various industrial fields such as food products, beverages, medical products, and quasi drugs.
EXAMPLES
While in the following, the present invention will be described in further detail with reference to Examples and Comparative Examples, the present invention is not limited to any of them.
Production Example 1
Production of Polyester Polyol A
Into a reactor were fed 286.70 g of isophthalic acid, 193.14 g of neopentyl glycol, and 356.98 g of 1,3-butanediol, and the mixture was subjected to an esterification reaction in a stream of nitrogen at 180 to 220° C. After a predetermined amount of water was distilled off, 174.51 g of sebacic acid, 126.10 g of adipic acid, and 0.04 g of titanium tetrabutoxide were added thereto, and the resulting mixture was subjected to an esterification reaction at 180 to 220° C., to give a polyester polyol A having a number average molecular weight of 500.
Production Example 2
Production of Polyester Polyol B
Fifty grams of 1,3-butanediol was homogenously mixed with 1000 g of the polyester polyol A. Further, 31.5 g of trimellitic anhydride was added thereto, and the resulting mixture was acid-modified at 110° C. to give a polyester polyol B.
Production Example 3
Production of Polyester Polyol C
Thirty grams of trimellitic anhydride was added to 1000 g of the polyester polyol A, and the resulting mixture was acid-modified at 110° C. to give a polyester polyol C.
Production Example 4
Production of Polyester Polyol D
Into a reactor were fed 544.81 g of adipic acid and 604.13 g of diethylene glycol, and the mixture was subjected to an esterification reaction in a stream of nitrogen at 180 to 220° C. After a predetermined amount of water was distilled off, a polyester polyol D having a number average molecular weight of 1000 was obtained.
Production Example 5
Production of Polyester Polyol E
Into a reactor were fed 146.02 g of dimethyl terephthalate, 374.76 g of isophthalic acid, 232.54 g of ethylene glycol, 60.97 g of neopentyl glycol, 199.63 g of 1,6-hexandiol, and 0.10 g of zinc acetate, and the mixture was subjected to an esterification reaction in a stream of nitrogen at 180 to 220° C. After predetermined amounts of water and methanol were distilled off, 164.84 g of adipic acid was added thereto, and the resulting mixture was subjected to an esterification reaction at 180 to 220° C. After completion of the reaction, 0.49 g of phosphoric acid, 14.68 g of silane coupling agent A (epoxysilane, manufactured by Shin-Etsu Chemical Co., Ltd., KBE-403; the same applies to the following), and 4.89 g of silane coupling agent B (aminosilane, manufactured by Shin-Etsu Chemical Co., Ltd., KBE-603; the same applies to the following) were homogenously mixed to give a polyester polyol E having a number average molecular weight of 680.
Production Example 6
Production of Polyester Polyol F
Into a reactor were fed 323.87 g of isophthalic acid and 621.98 g of 1,3-butanediol, and the mixture was subjected to an esterification reaction in a stream of nitrogen at 180 to 220° C. After a predetermined amount of water was distilled off, 284.90 g of adipic acid and 0.10 g of titanium tetrabutoxide were added thereto, and the resulting mixture was subjected to an esterification reaction at 180 to 220° C., to give a polyester polyol F having a number average molecular weight of 500.
Production Example 7
Production of Polyester Polyol G
Into a reactor were fed 199.32 g of dimethyl terephthalate, 511.57 g of isophthalic acid, 237.5 g of ethylene glycol, 64.5 g of neopentyl glycol, 219.57 g of 1,6-hexandiol, and 0.12 g of zinc acetate, and the mixture was subjected to an esterification reaction in a stream of nitrogen at 180 to 220° C. After predetermined amounts of water and methanol were distilled off, 193.2 g of azelaic acid was added thereto, and the resulting mixture was subjected to an esterification reaction at 180 to 220° C. After completion of the reaction, 0.49 g of phosphoric acid, 14.68 g of silane coupling agent A, and 4.89 g of silane coupling agent B were homogenously mixed to give a polyester polyol G having a number average molecular weight of 680.
Production Example 8
Production of Polyurethane Polyol H
Into a reactor were fed 859.53 g of the polyester polyol D and 32.93 g of tolylene diisocyanate (manufactured by Mitsui Chemicals Polyurethanes, Inc., Cosmonate TDI80), and the mixture was subjected to a urethane reaction in a stream of nitrogen at 90 to 95° C. After completion of the reaction, 89.24 g of trifunctional polypropylene glycol (manufactured by Mitsui Chemicals Polyurethanes, Inc., Actcall P-530) having a number average molecular weight of approximately 500, and 17.85 g of silane coupling agent A were mixed with the reaction product to give a polyurethane polyol H.
Production Example 9
Production of Polyurethane Polyol I
Into a reactor were fed 138.41 g of 4,4′-diphenylmethane diisocyanate, 353.14 g of bifunctional polypropylene glycol (manufactured by Mitsui Chemicals Polyurethanes, Inc., Actcall P-400) having a number average molecular weight of approximately 400, 272.34 g of trifunctional polypropylene glycol (manufactured by Mitsui Chemicals Polyurethanes, Inc., Actcall 32-160) having a number average molecular weight of approximately 1000, and 224.45 g of polyoxy tetramethylene glycol (manufactured by Hodogaya Chemical Co., Ltd., PTG-1000) having a number average molecular weight of approximately 1000 and exhibiting crystallinity at room temperature, and the mixture was subjected to a urethane reaction in a stream of nitrogen at 70 to 80° C. After completion of the reaction, 1.48 g of phosphoric acid and 7.91 g of silane coupling agent A were mixed with the reaction product, to give a polyurethane polyol I.
Production Example 10
Production of Polyisocyanate A
Into a reactor were fed 645.94 g of the polyester polyol A and 2461.47 g of xylylene diisocyanate, and the mixture was subjected to a urethane reaction in a stream of nitrogen at 70 to 80° C. Subsequently, xylylene diisocyanate left unreacted was removed by thin-film distillation to give an isocyanate group-terminated urethane prepolymer a. Homogeneously mixed were 600 g of the isocyanate group-terminated urethane prepolymer a, and 400 g of the allophanate/trimer of hexamethylene diisocyanate (manufactured by Mitsui Chemicals Polyurethanes, Inc., TAKENATE D-177N) in a stream of nitrogen at 70° C. to give a polyisocyanate A.
Production Example 11
Production of Polyisocyanate B
Into a reactor were fed 1432.1 g of the polyester polyol A and 2728.7 g of xylylene diisocyanate, and the mixture was subjected to a urethane reaction in a stream of nitrogen at 70 to 80° C. Subsequently, xylylene diisocyanate left unreacted was removed by thin-film distillation, to give an isocyanate group-terminated urethane prepolymer b. Homogeneously mixed were 500 g of the isocyanate group-terminated urethane prepolymer b and 500 g of trimers of hexamethylene diisocyanate (manufactured by Mitsui Chemicals Polyurethanes, Inc., TAKENATE D-170N) in a stream of nitrogen at 70° C. to give a polyisocyanate B.
Production Example 12
Production of Polyisocyanate C
Into a reactor were fed 289.60 g of 4,4′-diphenylmethane diisocyanate, 289.60 g of a mixture of 4,4′-diphenylmethane diisocyanate and 2,2′-diphenylmethane diisocyanate (manufactured by BASF, Lupranate MI), 0.05 g of ortho-toluene sulfonamide, and 420.80 g of the polyester polyol D, and the mixture was subjected to a urethane reaction in a stream of nitrogen at 70 to 75° C. to give a polyisocyanate C.
Production Example 13
Production of Polyisocyanate D
Into a reactor were fed 389.78 g of 4,4′-diphenylmethane diisocyanate, 144.03 g of bifunctional ethylene oxide-propyrene oxide copolymer (manufactured by Mitsui Chemicals Polyurethanes, Inc., Takelac P-24) having a number average molecular weight of approximately 2000, 133.50 g of bifunctional polypropylene glycol (manufactured by Mitsui Chemicals Polyurethanes, Inc., Actcall 22-110) having a number average molecular weight of approximately 1000, 105.13 g of trifunctional polypropylene glycol (manufactured by Mitsui Chemicals Polyurethanes, Inc., Actcall 32-160) having a number average molecular weight of approximately 1000, 205.82 g of polyoxy tetramethylene glycol (manufactured by Hodogaya Chemical Co., Ltd., PTG-1000) having a number average molecular weight of approximately 1000 and exhibiting crystallinity at room temperature, and 0.03 g of ortho-toluene sulfonamide, and the mixture was subjected to a urethane reaction in a stream of nitrogen at 70 to 80° C. After completion of the reaction, 21.52 g of silane coupling agent C (isocyanatesilane, manufactured by Shin-Etsu Chemical Co., Ltd., KBE-9007; the same applies to the following) was mixed with the reaction product to give a polyisocyanate D.
Production Example 14
Production of Polyisocyanate E
Into a reactor were fed 645.94 g of the polyester polyol F and 2461.47 g of xylylene diisocyanate, the mixture was subjected to a urethane reaction in a stream of nitrogen at 70 to 80° C. Subsequently, xylylene diisocyanate left unreacted was removed by thin-film distillation to give an isocyanate group-terminated urethane prepolymer e. Homogeneously mixed were 600 g of the isocyanate group-terminated urethane prepolymer e and 330 g of trimers of hexamethylene diisocyanate (manufactured by Mitsui Chemicals Polyurethanes, Inc., TAKENATE D-170N) in a stream of nitrogen at 70° C. to give a polyisocyanate E.
Production Example 15
Production of Polyisocyanate F
Homogeneously mixed were 750 g of biuret-modified xylylene diisocyanate produced by desolvating TAKENATE A-14 (a solution of biuret-modified xylylene diisocyanate/ethyl acetate, manufactured by Mitsui Chemicals Polyurethanes, Inc.), 250 g of an allophanate/trimer of hexamethylene diisocyanate (manufactured by Mitsui Chemicals Polyurethanes, Inc., TAKENATE D-177N) in a stream of nitrogen at 50° C. to give a polyisocyanate F.
Preparation in Examples and Comparative Examples
The polyol components B, C, E, H, and I, and the polyisocyanate components A, B, C, D, E and F, all obtained in the above Production Examples, were blended as shown in Table 1 to prepare solventless adhesives for lamination. As for the thus-prepared solventless adhesives for lamination, viscosity was measured in the following manner. Further, the thus-prepared solventless adhesives for lamination were used to prepare composite films in the following manner, and the respective composite films were evaluated as follows.
In Table 1, both the number average molecular weight of each polyol component, and the isocyanate group equivalent weight and the number average molecular weight of each polyisocyanate component were written.
1) Viscosity Measurement after Mixing
In Examples and Comparative Examples, the polyol component and the polyisocyanate component were mixed at the coating temperature shown in Table 1, and the viscosity (initial viscosity) three minutes after the mixing and the viscosity 20 minutes after the mixing were measured by a cone and plate viscometer. The viscosity increase of the initial viscosity 20 minutes after the mixing was calculated. The results are shown in Table 1.
2) Preparation of Composite Film
A composite film composed of two layers, one of the PET film and the other of aluminum-deposited CPP film, was fabricated by the following steps: coating each of the solventless adhesives for lamination in Examples and Comparative Examples onto a white-printed PET film (thickness: 12 μm, printed ink: manufactured by Toyo Ink Mfg. Co., Ltd., NEW LP super R630 white one-component type) using a laminating machine for solventless adhesives (manufactured by Okazaki Machine Industry Co., Ltd., TNS-400-200) in a reverse coating mode at the coating temperature shown in Talbe 1 and at a coating speed of 200 m/minute such that the coating amount of the adhesive was 1.8 to 2.2 g/m2; and bonding the film thus coated and approximately 300 m of aluminum-deposited CPP (thickness: 25 μm, manufactured by Tohcello Co., Ltd., MLCP-WA) together.
3) Evaluation of the Appearance of the Composite Film
The appearance of the composite film thus obtained was observed immediately after the lamination step. Then, the roll of the composite film was subjected to aging at 40° C. for three days. After the aging step was complete, approximately 30 m of the composite film was unwound from the roll, the appearance of the unwound area was observed to evaluate the appearance of the film after the aging step. Incidentally, the appearance immediately after the lamination step means the appearance observed at not more than 5 minutes after the lamination step is completed. The results are shown in Table 1.
Evaluation criteria are shown below.
(Evaluation Criteria Immediately After Lamination)
I: The appearance was good with wetting uniformly.
II: There were small dots that did not look wet or the coating surface was partially discolored.
III: There were large dots that did not look wet.
(Evaluation Criteria After Aging)
I: The appearance was good with wetting uniformly.
II: With wetting uniformly, there were small dots that did not look wet, or the coating surface was partially discolored.
III: There were large dots that did not look wet.




 
 


 
TABLE 1




 
 


 
Example of Blending




 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


 
1
2
3
4
5
6
7


 
 




 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


Polyol Component
B
H
H
E
G
C
I


Number Average Molecular Weight
420
880
880
680
1200
548
1060


Part by Weight
50
50
100
100
100
80
50


Polyisocyanate Component
A
C
C
E
F
B
D


Isocyanate Group Equivalent Weight
323
298
298
264
268
298
487


Number Average Molecular Weight
710
745
745
528
570
745
1042


Part by Weight
100
100
100
80
30
100
100


 




 
 


 
Ex./Comp. Ex.




 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


 
 
 
 
 
Comp.
Comp.
Comp.
Comp.
Comp.
Comp.


 
Ex. 1
Ex. 2
Ex. 3
Ex. 4
Ex. 1
Ex. 2
Ex. 3
Ex. 4
Ex. 5
Ex. 6


 


Coating Temperature (° C.)
60
50
50
80
85
50
60
65
70
80


Initial Viscosity
890
960
500
800
2000
1260
750
1040
840
700


After Mixing (mPa · s)


Viscosity 20 min.
3280
2202
2200
2570
4300
6170
4800
1930
1460
3500


After Mixing (mPa · s)


Viscosity Increase
269
129
340
221
115
390
540
86
74
400


20 min. After Mixing (%)




 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


Evaluation
Immediately After Lamination
I
I
I
II
III
II
III
II
II
III


 
After Aging
I
I
I
I
III
III
III
III
III
III


 






While the illustrative embodiments of the present invention are provided in the above description, such is for illustrative purpose only and it is not to be construed restrictively. Modification and variation of the present invention that will be obvious to those skilled in the art is to be covered by the following claims.
INDUSTRIAL APPLICABILITY
The solventless laminating adhesive of the present invention is suitable for production of composite films for producing packaging materials in various industrial fields such as food products, beverages, medical products, and quasi drugs.

Patent CitationsCited PatentFiling datePublication dateApplicantTitleUS3915935 *Feb 28, 1974Oct 28, 1975Usm CorpPolyurethane adhesive comprising a polyester and a prepolymer of the same polyesterUS7910163 *Sep 9, 2005Mar 22, 2011Tesa AgMethod for producing an adhesive strip comprising a thermally cross-linked acrylate hot-melt adhesive layerUS20020143133Mar 29, 2002Oct 3, 2002Akihiro ImaiSolvent-free two-component curable adhesive compositionUS20020157789Feb 26, 2002Oct 31, 2002Akihiro ImaiSolvent-free two-component curable adhesive compositionUS20080308226Feb 4, 2005Dec 18, 2008Akihiro ImaiTwo-Component Curable Solventless AdhesiveCN1740259ASep 21, 2005Mar 1, 2006北京高盟化工有限公司Single-copmonent no-solvent polyurethane adhesive for low temperature painting and its prepn processJP2001152066A Title not availableJP2001172602A Title not availableJP2002249745A Title not availableJP2003003145A Title not availableJP2003082324A Title not availableJP2005089734A Title not availableJP2006213801A Title not availableJPH0797557A Title not availableJPS6055187A Title not availableWO2006011256A1Feb 4, 2005Feb 2, 2006Mitsui Chemicals Polyurethanes, Inc.Two-component curable solventless adhesive* Cited by examinerNon-Patent CitationsReference1International Search Report in corresponding International Application No. PCT/JP2008/058737.Referenced byCiting PatentFiling datePublication dateApplicantTitleUS9676976 *Jun 16, 2011Jun 13, 2017Dic CorporationOxygen-barrier film and adhesiveUS20130158186 *Jun 16, 2011Jun 20, 2013Dic CorporationOxygen-barrier film and adhesive* Cited by examinerClassifications  U.S. Classification427/208.2, 427/207.1, 526/301, 526/935International ClassificationB05D5/10, C08F26/02Cooperative ClassificationB32B27/20, B32B7/12, B32B27/08, B32B27/38, B32B2439/70, B32B2307/704, B32B2307/718, C09J175/06, B32B2439/80, B32B27/40, B32B27/32, B32B2255/20, B32B2307/516, B32B2307/518, B32B2307/7242, B32B27/36, B32B27/34, B32B27/30, C08G18/7837, C08G18/725, C08G18/4829, C08G18/3893, C08G18/792, C08G18/7831, C08G18/4213, C08G18/4812, C08G2250/00, C08G18/10, Y10T428/2896, C08G18/4219, C08G18/4854, C08G18/4238, C08G18/12, C08G18/4216Legal EventsDateCodeEventDescriptionDec 4, 2009ASAssignmentOwner name: MITSUI CHEMICALS, INC.,JAPANFree format text: ASSIGNMENT OF ASSIGNORS INTEREST;ASSIGNORS:UEMURA, TAKASHI;SASANO, SHIGETOSHI;KATAOKA, YASUHIKO;SIGNING DATES FROM 20091014 TO 20091019;REEL/FRAME:023631/0407Owner name: MITSUI CHEMICALS, INC., JAPANFree format text: ASSIGNMENT OF ASSIGNORS INTEREST;ASSIGNORS:UEMURA, TAKASHI;SASANO, SHIGETOSHI;KATAOKA, YASUHIKO;SIGNING DATES FROM 20091014 TO 20091019;REEL/FRAME:023631/0407Aug 9, 2016FPAYFee paymentYear of fee payment: 4RotateOriginal ImageGoogle Home - Sitemap - USPTO Bulk Downloads - Privacy Policy - Terms of Service - About Google Patents - Send FeedbackData provided by IFI CLAIMS Patent Services  










 




SwissSign SWOT Analysis - Strengths, Weaknesses, Opportunities, Threats of SwissSign



















































			Currency : $
		


$







contact
sitemap
















ABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZ0123456789

 








Categories



A


B


C


D


E


F


G


H


I


J


K


L


M


N


O


P


Q


R


S


T


U


V


W


X


Y


Z


0


1


2


3


4


5


6


7


8


9













>
S>SwissSign SWOT Analysis - Strengths, Weaknesses, Opportunities, Threats of SwissSign
			











SwissSign SWOT Analysis - Strengths, Weaknesses, Opportunities, Threats of SwissSign

This SWOT Analysis of SwissSign provides a full SWOT analysis of the company's businesses and operations. The profile shows a comprehensive view of the company's key strengths and weaknesses and the potential opportunities and threats.
More details












Reference: 
SWT10105121



Quantity:




				This product is not sold individually. You must select at least 1 quantity for this product.
			


Availability:







Warning: Last items in stock!



























Share on Facebook


	Remove this product from my favorites


	Add this product to my favorites
 Print












Data sheet









SwissSign SWOT Analysis OverviewCategories: financial report, strategic analysis, industry reportTag: corporate strategy, company history, business description, financial historyDescription: International demand can increase. New products and services can be seen.This SWOT Analysis of SwissSign provides a strategic report of businesses and operations of the company. The SWOT analysis shows strengths, weaknesses, opportunities and threats. This SWOT analysis of SwissSign can provide a competitive advantage.This analysis contains 615 data points.Last update: July 2017.SWOT - Strengths-monetary assistance provided-high profitability and revenue SWOT - Weaknesses-future cost structure-future market size SWOT - Opportunities-global markets-growth rates and profitability-growing economy-new products and services-growing demand SWOT - Threats-cash flow Business TrendsProfitabilityOutlookMarketThe industry shows a growth rate of about 1%.Industry specific SWOT analysis (Relevance/Importance)What happens in the underlying industry? Factors and trends affecting the overall industry and their implications for this business:Strengths-The industry has unique products. (51%, 36%)-The industry shows a strong diversification. (53%, 11%)-The industry is more robust than the economy in general. (29%, 10%)-Access to comparable industries is possible. (37%, 10%)-This is a global industry. (54%, 26%) Weaknesses-Cost and income structure could be critical. (22%, 57%) Opportunities-New market trends can be seen. (41%, 49%)-The market changes fast. (25%, 15%)-We see global growth opportunities. (19%, 39%)-The industry faces a recovery. (18%, 56%) Threats-Price changes are possible. (30%, 35%) A SWOT Analysis provides a comprehensive insight into the history of the company, corporate strategy, business and financial structure, management and operations. The report contains a detailed SWOT analysis on products and services, key competitors, as well as detailed financial information.Data on this page may have come in part, or entirely, from one or more data providers. Please contact us for further information. We are not responsible for any errors or omissions on this page. This website is for information purposes only. This is a sample report.Comparable companies and industriesSee a list of comparable companies or industries depending on the similarity of SWOT elements. We use weighted SWOT factors and a clustering technique to identify similar objects.Actcall Inc SWOT AnalysisPerth Mint SWOT AnalysisOgletree Deakins SWOT AnalysisDasani SWOT AnalysisPiaggio C. SpA SWOT Analysis







Top 5 SWOT Analysis Search AppleMicrosoftFacebookChina MobileYahoo Compliance Compliance is necessary to make sure that any business or action conducted by a company is within legal parameters. The compliance unit develops, initiates, maintains, and revises policies and procedures for the general operation of the compliance program and its related activities to prevent illegal, unethical, or improper conduct. Financial and strategic SWOT analysis A financial and strategic SWOT (strengths, weaknesses, opportunities and threats) Analysis provides a comprehensive insight into the company’s history, corporate strategy, financial data, business structure, business divisions and key operations. Each report contains a detailed SWOT analysis with additional information on the key competitors, market structure, major products, brands and services, as well as detailed financial data for the last 5 years. Due Diligence Due diligence is the process of systematically researching and verifying the accuracy of a financial statement, business or investment. SWOT Analysis – Advantages and Limitations Over the past decade, SWOT analysis has been extended beyond companies to products, organizations, countries and industries. Each professional business plan contains a SWOT analysis. What are the benefits and limitations? Advantages  You can use a SWOT analysis to summarize a complex situation. It is easy to understand and has little or no cost. Quantitative and qualitative information from different sources can be combined. Focus on the key internal and external factors affecting the organization. It is easy to perform and understand. It can be used fast.    Limitations  There is no weight or prioritization of factors. A SWOT analysis contains of a list of factors without further descriptions or links between factors. The analysis does not provide any solutions. It is only a description. 







 Free information
 Worldwide Coverage
 Free Listings
 Free Access
 Easy and Secure





Categories




A


B


C


D


E


F


G


H


I


J


K


L


M


N


O


P


Q


R


S


T


U


V


W


X


Y


Z


0


1


2


3


4


5


6


7


8


9









Information

Specials New products
Top sellers Contact us
Legal Notice and Privacy Policy
Terms and conditions of use
About us
Sitemap





My account


My orders
My credit slips
My addresses
My personal info


				My favorite products
	


Sign out




Follow us

Facebook Twitter 





This site uses cookies so that we can improve your experience on our sites. You can read about cookie privacy policy by clicking on this link: Privacy Policy



Copyright © 2017 Weiner Consulting. All Rights Reserved. The content of this website is for informational purposes only.
Advisor4u | 
Advisor4u Jobmarket |
Advisor4u Companies |
Advisorgate Industries |
Businessplaninternational | 
Businessplaninternational Digital 
Businessplaninternational SWOT |
Businessplaninternational Datacenter |
Businessplaninternational Freelance | 
Businessplaninternational Marketplace | 
Businessplangate 
Businessplangate Companies |
Livingplace4u College |
Livingplace4u Jobs | 
Propertyplace4u |
Productplace4u |
Advisorgate |
Advisorgate Reports 
Advisorgate BPlans |
Advisorgate Financials |
Advisorgate Competition |
SWOTAnalysis24 |
SWOTData |
Advisorgate SWOT











ACTCALL Inc. - Relationship Science
































































                      NEWS HOME
                    

Advertising
Board and Executive Moves
Energy
Health Care
Hedge Funds
M & A
Private Equity
Technology








            You have  
            
9 free profiles

              left this month   
			      

                Start Your Free Trial ➤
              








            Hey, we noticed you're a RelSci Pro subscriber! Would you like to view the page there?
            

                View on RelSci Pro ➤
              





























































































































Email







LinkedIn







Facebook







Google+







Tweet







Reddit





Permalink





ACTCALL Inc.



Overview
Executives & Employees Board of Directors Paths
Recent Transactions Transaction Advisors Financials Investors



ACTCALL Inc.



 OVERVIEW



Date Founded


2005




Headquarters


Yotsuya Isy Building, 2-12-5 Yotsuya, Shinjuku-ku, Tokyo 160-0004




Type of Company



                                                                    Public
                                                            




Employees (Worldwide)


212




Industries


Real Estate




Company Description


Actcall Inc. engages in the real estate agency business. It operates through the following business segments: Lifestyle-Related Comprehensive Outsourcing, Real Estate Total Solutions, Settlement Solution, and Other business. The Lifestyle-Related Comprehensive Outsourcing segment provides solutions to problems of day-to-day living such as plumbing, electricity, gas, lock, and glass issues. The Real Estate Total Solutions segment offers support services for seminars, leasing, and project management services. The Settlement Solution segment handles outsourcing of lease payment and settlement operations. The Other business segment includes the music business, food business and artificial intelligence business. The company was founded on January 27, 2005 and is headquartered in Tokyo, Japan.




Website


http://www.actcall.jp





 Executives & Employees



Toshihiro Hirai

President




Satoshi Kikui

Director, GM-Administration & IR Contact





Tomoaki Tabata

Managing Director & Head-Sales




Takashi Okada

Director & Executive Officer







See our list of current and previous employees when you upgrade.

Start My Free Trial ➤








See  More 


 



                          Board of Directors                        



Tadashi Miyazaki

Managing Director at Mizuho Capital Partners Co., Ltd.




Satoshi Kikui

Director, GM-Administration & IR Contact at ACTCALL Inc.





Toshihiro Hirai

President at ACTCALL Inc.




Takashi Okada

Director & Executive Officer at ACTCALL Inc.





Takeshi Enzaki

Director at ACTCALL Inc.




Osamu Tabei

Auditor at Ohsato Co., Ltd.







See our list of current and previous board members when you upgrade.

Start My Free Trial ➤








See  More 


 


 Paths to ACTCALL Inc.



                        ACTCALL Inc.                    




 You



 Connections via Relationship Science



 ACTCALL Inc.






Sync your contacts to see how you can connect with ACTCALL Inc..

Start My Free Trial ➤








See  More 


 


 Recent Transactions



 Details Hidden



                                    ACTCALL Inc. purchases IKEZOE Co.   resulting in a new company kidding, Inc.                                                                    




 Details Hidden



                                    ACTCALL Inc. purchases Bee Brand KK                                                                               - (Pending)





 Details Hidden



                                    ACTCALL Inc. purchases Insite Co., Ltd. from APLUS Financial Co., Ltd.                                                                      




 Details Hidden



                                    ACTCALL Inc. issued Ordinary Shares                                                                    




 Details Hidden



                                    Relo Group, Inc., Relocation Japan Ltd. purchase ACTCALL Inc.                                                                       





 Transaction Advisors



Companies ▾




Manager



H.S. Securities Co. Ltd.

                                        Advised on
                                        ACTCALL Inc. issued Ordinary Shares                                    




Auditor



Hinode Audit Corp.

                                        Advised on
                                        ACTCALL Inc. issued Ordinary Shares                                    




Underwriter



SBI Securities Co., Ltd.

                                        Advised on
                                        ACTCALL Inc. issued Ordinary Shares                                    





 Key Stats and Financials as of 11/30/2016



Market Capitalization


$7.6B




Total Enterprise Value


$7.21B




Earnings Per Share


$18.8




Revenue


$4.06B




Net Profit


$144M




Total Debt


$1.8B




Total Equity


$848M




EBITDA


$399M




EBITDAMargin


9.82%




Enterprise Value Sales


1.78x




TEVNet Income


50.21x




Debt TEV


0.25x




Three Year Compounded Annual Growth Rate Of Revenue


27.57%




Five Year Compounded Annual Growth Rate Of Revenue


23.47%




Enterprise Value EBITDAOperating


18.1x






See financial details and more using RelSci Professional.

Start My Free Trial ➤








See  More 


 


 Investors



 Details Hidden


Relo Group, Inc.

                                    Relo Group, Inc. engages in the housing, leisure, and insurance businesses. It operates through the following segments: Domestic Business, Global Business and Others. The Domestic business segment operates outsourcing services in housing that include dormitories and company housing. It also provides leisure and lifestyle improvement with recreation facilities. The Global Business segment provides support to both employees transferred overseas and the companies that transfer their employees overseas with regards to relocation. The Others segment deals with hotel and insurance consulting businesses. The company was founded by Masanori Sasada on March 15, 1967 and is headquartered in Tokyo, Japan.                                




 Details Hidden


Benefit One Inc.

                                    BenefitsOne Inc. is an employee benefits consulting and brokerage company. Our office is located in Northeastern Pennsylvania. Our team provides cost effective employee benefit plans and benefit consulting services to companies of all sizes. Give us the opportunity to discuss and analyze your current benefits package at no cost to your company. Our one focus is your benefits so that you can concentrate on the success of your business                                




 Details Hidden


Japan Best Rescue System Co., Ltd.

                                    Japan Best Rescue System Co., Ltd. engages in the provision of daily life rescue services. It operates through the following segments: Call Center, Membership, Corporate Alliance, Member Store, Small Short-term Insurance, Automobile Leasing, Environment Maintenance, and Others. The Call Center segment offers key replacement services, personal computer troubleshooting, and other comprehensive life emergency services. The Membership segment provides members with discounted mobile life emergency services, repairs for home appliances and housing equipment beyond warranty period, and resident support services for commercial housing tenants. The Corporate Alliance segment consists of comprehensive partnership and call center contract services. The Member Store segment engages in the development and administration of member stores and partner stores. The Small Short-term Insurance segment renders underwriting services. The Automobile Leasing segment leases automobiles. The Environment Maintenance segment manages waste treatment and decontamination works. The Others segment carries out the medical equipment business. The company was founded by Nobuhiro Sakakibara on February 12, 1997 and is headquartered in Nagoya, Japan.                                




 Details Hidden


Toshihiro Hirai

                                    President at ACTCALL Inc.                                




 Details Hidden


Neostella Capital Co. Ltd.








See 2 more listings with RelSci Professional.

Start My Free Trial ➤








See 2 More 







You've reached your 10 free profiles limit this month.
Upgrade to RelSci Pro today to enjoy unlimited article views and much more!

Start My Free Trial  ➤

Still not convinced? Check out our full listing of features here.















Are you a RelSci Pro Subscriber?

Login to RelSci Pro 
                        ➤


Not a Pro Subscriber? Log in here to manage your alerts









 Keep me signed in.
        

Login  ➤



        Forgot your Password?
    

























 I have read the LexisNexis terms & conditions




Sign Me Up  ➤


















Benefit One Inc. - Relationship Science
































































                      NEWS HOME
                    

Advertising
Board and Executive Moves
Energy
Health Care
Hedge Funds
M & A
Private Equity
Technology








            You have  
            
9 free profiles

              left this month   
			      

                Start Your Free Trial ➤
              








            Hey, we noticed you're a RelSci Pro subscriber! Would you like to view the page there?
            

                View on RelSci Pro ➤
              





























































































































Email







LinkedIn







Facebook







Google+







Tweet







Reddit





Permalink





Benefit One Inc.



Overview
In The News Executives & Employees Board of Directors Paths
Owners & Shareholders Recent Transactions Transaction Advisors Financials Investments Suppliers



Benefit One Inc.



 OVERVIEW



Date Founded


1996




Headquarters


Shinjuku Park Tower, 35/f, 3-7-1 Nishi-shinjuku, Shinjuku-ku, Tokyo 163-1035




Type of Company



                                                                    Public
                                                            




Employees (Worldwide)


730




Industries


Other Business & Consulting Services

Hotels, Resorts, and Cruiselines




Company Description


BenefitsOne Inc. is an employee benefits consulting and brokerage company. Our office is located in Northeastern Pennsylvania. Our team provides cost effective employee benefit plans and benefit consulting services to companies of all sizes. Give us the opportunity to discuss and analyze your current benefits package at no cost to your company. Our one focus is your benefits so that you can concentrate on the success of your business




Website


http://www.benefit-one.co.jp






 In The News
          See more




Marketwired
February 27, 2017





                        Cerrapoints: Innovative Flexible Benefits Platform That Specializes in Employee Engagement and Cashless Rewards Redemption                    






 Executives & Employees



Kenji Ozaki

Director, Head-Finance & Accounting




Takeshi Goto

Auditor





Yoichi Miyakawa

Director & Managing Executive Officer




Tsutomu Ohta

Director





Masako Suzuki

Vice President






See our list of current and previous employees when you upgrade.

Start My Free Trial ➤








See  More 


 



                          Board of Directors                        



Yasuyuki Nambu

Founder at Pasona Group Inc.




Yuko Nakase

Managing Director & Chief Financial Officer at Pasona Group Inc.





Akira Kamitomai




Hirotaka Wakamoto

Director & Managing Director at Pasona Group Inc.





Yuji Momosaki

Independent Outside Director at Takashima & Co., Ltd.




Masako Suzuki

Director Secretary at Benefit One USA, Inc.





Tsutomu Ohta

Director at Benefit One Inc.




Yoichi Miyakawa

Director & Managing Executive Officer at Benefit One Inc.





Nobuyasu Kubo

Chairman at Local Authorities Satellite Communications Organization







See our list of current and previous board members when you upgrade.

Start My Free Trial ➤








See  More 


 


 Paths to Benefit One Inc.



                        Benefit One Inc.                    




 You



 Connections via Relationship Science



 Benefit One Inc.






Sync your contacts to see how you can connect with Benefit One Inc..

Start My Free Trial ➤








See  More 


 


 Owners & Shareholders



 Details Hidden


Shiozumi Asset Management Co. Ltd.

                                    Shiozumi is an active, growth-oriented investment manager with a long-term investment horizon. The firm is a Japanese equity specialist investing across market caps with a strong focus on small- to mid-caps.Shiozumi's investment philosophy is articulated around the concept of a 'New Japan', particularly transformations in Japan's service, retail and distribution sectors prompted by the changing shopping habits of the 'new Japanese consumer'. The firm seeks to invest in high-growth companies catering to emerging consumer trends in Japan, such as discount stores, retail warehouses, 24-hour shopping and take-out food. They favor companies with a strong market position in niche sectors. Another investment theme actively pursued is the deregulation of the Japanese economy.The firm's investment process consists in bottom-up stock picking based on fundamental research, with particular attention paid to past and projected earnings growth, good relative value and exposure to 'New Japan' marketing concepts. Companies with understandable business models are favored. The firm invests in high-growth, cash-flow generating companies with a sound balance sheet and trading at 'reasonable' multiples. The research process integrates in-house fundamental analysis with outsourced intelligence from the firm's network of contacts, and includes frequent company visits.Shiozumi manages low turn-over, concentrated portfolios that are prone to volatility, with a core of long-term strategic holdings complemented by short-term tactical holdings. Portfolio construction is based on convictions, independently of any sector allocation or index. The firm does not engage in currency hedging.Investments may be divested when the target price is reached, upon review of PE multiple vs. profit growth, if fundamentals deteriorate, when management changes, if the company loses their competitive edge or when sales and profits are adversely affected by the business environment.                                




 Details Hidden


Simplex Asset Management Co., Ltd.

                                    SAM is an active, quantitative  manager which invests globally across asset classes, with a strong focus on Japanese equity and fixed-income. For equities, the firm follows a Value Up Strategy to invest in listed stocks of small- and medium-size companies, seeking to identify companies willing to unlock shareholder value through operational and financial engineering. They seek to persuade management to implement shareholder friendly actions while maintaining a constructive relationship. Their Net Cash Strategy focuses on established businesses with net cash values which  are well positioned to compete in their market niche, with a history of generating stable free cash flows, mispriced securities and growth potential to ultimately have the stock price converge to its fair value. SAM's Oyako Strategy aims to take advantage of mispriced shares of companies with dual listings of a parent and its subsidiary. They primarily hold long positions in an undervalued subsidiary while taking a short position in the overvalued parent company.   For fixed-income, they employ a global macro strategy, seeking absolute returns by investing in multi assets. They focus on attractive sets of fixed-income securities and currency sets, aiming for optimal returns in various interest rate cycles. Their investment universe includes investment grade government and corporate sectors, emerging securities, high yields, futures and CDS. Their portfolio is diversified in regions and rotates among sectors by relative attractiveness of the combinations. They utilize a non-fixed income asset mix as a sub sector, and is opportunistically selected to enhance the hedges among sectors in order to achieve optimal returns.                                




 Details Hidden


Atlantis Investment Research Corp.

                                    AIR-JP is an active, GARP-oriented investment manager focused on long-term capital appreciation. The parent firm's investment philosophy emphasizes reactivity, regional specialization with in-depth knowledge of a specific market, as well as the freedom for portfolio managers to make decisions within their area of specialization, including capping the assets under management.AIR-JP invests in Japanese equity, equity-related instruments, high-grade bonds, money-market instruments and property-related listed securities. The firm follows a long-only strategy and implements a bottom-up investment process based on fundamental research, focusing on value, earnings growth, and management competence. They seek to identify undervalued companies with growth potential through the analysis of key ratios. They use macro-economic analysis to recognize factors likely to influence the growth of portfolio companies and investment prospects. AIR-JP's research process leverages a long-established network of local contacts, and includes an extensive program of company visits. Primary research is supplemented with outsourced sell-side analysis.AIR-JP invests across market caps, focusing on the small- to mid-cap segment where they seek opportunities to exploit market inefficiencies. They favor sectors such as machinery, retail, real estate and services. Investments are divested when earnings growth slackens, or when fundamentals change, or if a stock's market value has caught up with its estimated value.                                




 Details Hidden


T. Rowe Price International Ltd. (Japan)

                                    TRP-J's investment approach takes a long-term view based on proprietary fundamental research, bottom-up security selection, and prudent risk management. The firm specializes in Japanese equity and focuses on long-term capital appreciation. They invest across market caps in listed Japanese equity. The firm's investment philosophy emphasizes an in-depth valuation process and seeks a balance between risk management and high risk-adjusted returns.TRP-J seeks to invest in high-quality companies with strong earnings growth potential. In addition to investing in large-cap companies, they target less liquid but more reasonably priced small- to mid-cap stocks. Their portfolios are diversified across industries and weighted in sectors such as industrials and business services, information technology, financials and consumer discretionary.The firm's culture emphasizes collaboration and team-based investment decisions.                                




 Details Hidden


Simplex Asset Management Co., Ltd.

                                    SAM is an active, quantitative  manager which invests globally across asset classes, with a strong focus on Japanese equity and fixed-income. For equities, the firm follows a Value Up Strategy to invest in listed stocks of small- and medium-size companies, seeking to identify companies willing to unlock shareholder value through operational and financial engineering. They seek to persuade management to implement shareholder friendly actions while maintaining a constructive relationship. Their Net Cash Strategy focuses on established businesses with net cash values which  are well positioned to compete in their market niche, with a history of generating stable free cash flows, mispriced securities and growth potential to ultimately have the stock price converge to its fair value. SAM's Oyako Strategy aims to take advantage of mispriced shares of companies with dual listings of a parent and its subsidiary. They primarily hold long positions in an undervalued subsidiary while taking a short position in the overvalued parent company.   For fixed-income, they employ a global macro strategy, seeking absolute returns by investing in multi assets. They focus on attractive sets of fixed-income securities and currency sets, aiming for optimal returns in various interest rate cycles. Their investment universe includes investment grade government and corporate sectors, emerging securities, high yields, futures and CDS. Their portfolio is diversified in regions and rotates among sectors by relative attractiveness of the combinations. They utilize a non-fixed income asset mix as a sub sector, and is opportunistically selected to enhance the hedges among sectors in order to achieve optimal returns.                                






See 3 more listings with RelSci Professional.

Start My Free Trial ➤








See 3 More 






 Recent Transactions



 Details Hidden



                                    Benefit One Inc. purchases Data Horizon Co., Ltd.                                                                       




 Details Hidden



                                    Benefit One Inc., Pasona Group Inc. purchase Benefit one Health Care, Inc.                                                                       




 Details Hidden



                                    Pasona, Inc., Benefit One Inc. purchase Overseas Human Resources, Inc. /Member Only Dining Ops. from Overseas Human Resources, Inc.                                                                      




 Details Hidden



                                    Benefit One Inc. purchases Cendant Japan Co. Ltd. /Membership Shopping Ops from Cendant Japan Co. Ltd.                                                                      




 Details Hidden



                                    Benefit One Inc. issued Ordinary Shares                                                                    





 Transaction Advisors



Companies ▾




Underwriter



Nomura Securities Co., Ltd.

                                        Advised on
                                        Benefit One Inc. issued Ordinary Shares                                    





 Key Stats and Financials as of 3/31/2017



Market Capitalization


$181B




Total Enterprise Value


$127B




Earnings Per Share


$95.48




Revenue


$29.5B




Net Profit


$3.86B




EBITDA


$6.6B




EBITDAMargin


22.41%




Total Debt


$678M




Total Equity


$14.7B




Enterprise Value Sales


4.3x




Enterprise Value EBITDAOperating


19.18x




TEVNet Income


32.87x




Debt TEV


0.01x




Three Year Compounded Annual Growth Rate Of Revenue


13.14%




Five Year Compounded Annual Growth Rate Of Revenue


14.53%






See financial details and more using RelSci Professional.

Start My Free Trial ➤








See  More 


 


 Investments




 Details Hidden



Money Design Co., Ltd.

                                    Money Design Co. Ltd. engages in asset management and investment advisory services. Its service includes exchange traded funds wrap which enables customers to use asset management service according to each customer’s lifestyle at low cost. The company was founded by Mamoru Taniya and Tomoyoshi Hirose in August 2013 and is headquartered in Tokyo, Japan.                                





 Details Hidden



ACTCALL Inc.

                                    Actcall Inc. engages in the real estate agency business. It operates through the following business segments: Lifestyle-Related Comprehensive Outsourcing, Real Estate Total Solutions, Settlement Solution, and Other business. The Lifestyle-Related Comprehensive Outsourcing segment provides solutions to problems of day-to-day living such as plumbing, electricity, gas, lock, and glass issues. The Real Estate Total Solutions segment offers support services for seminars, leasing, and project management services. The Settlement Solution segment handles outsourcing of lease payment and settlement operations. The Other business segment includes the music business, food business and artificial intelligence business. The company was founded on January 27, 2005 and is headquartered in Tokyo, Japan.                                





 Suppliers



Oracle Corp. Japan

                                     •  Wholesale: Technology                                                                             •  Tokyo, TY                                                                    

                                    Oracle Corp. Japan engages in the development and sale of software, application, and database management systems. It operates through the following segments: New License & Cloud Software Subscription, Update and Product Support, Hardware and Systems, and Service. The New License & Cloud Software Subscription segment provides various database management software, middleware, and application software. The Update and Product Support segment covers the software and license rights renewal and technical support. The Hardware and Systems segment deals with server and storage devices, including technical support, repair, and maintenance. The Service segment provides consulting services, advanced support, and education services. The company was founded on February 27, 1982 and is located in Tokyo, Japan.
                                




SystemSoft Corp. (Japan)

                                     •  Wholesale: Technology                                                                             •  Fukuoka, FK                                                                    

                                    SystemSoft Corp. (Japan) engages in the provision of system development and web marketing support. It operates through the System Solution and Marketing business segments. The System Solution segment offers solution products and services. It also handles the management of rental real estate information site. The Marketing segment provides consultation and solution services for web marketing. The company was founded on September 17, 1979 and is headquartered in Fukuoka, Japan.
                                






You've reached your 10 free profiles limit this month.
Upgrade to RelSci Pro today to enjoy unlimited article views and much more!

Start My Free Trial  ➤

Still not convinced? Check out our full listing of features here.















Are you a RelSci Pro Subscriber?

Login to RelSci Pro 
                        ➤


Not a Pro Subscriber? Log in here to manage your alerts









 Keep me signed in.
        

Login  ➤



        Forgot your Password?
    

























 I have read the LexisNexis terms & conditions




Sign Me Up  ➤




























 Securities List(list of ISIN, quick code, and - Mizuho Corporate Bank






























 




 
 












Toggle navigation





 









EN 


EnglishDeutschFrançaisEspañolPortuguêsItalianoRomânNederlandsLatinaDanskSvenskaNorskMagyarBahasa IndonesiaTürkçeSuomiLatvianLithuaniančeskýрусскийбългарскиالعربيةUnknown 
















Products

Features
Free Publishing
Magazine Publishing
Web Publishing
Mobile Publishing
Developer Publishing

Products
FREE
adFREE
WEBKiosk
APPKiosk
PROKiosk

Pricing


Registration































EnglishDeutschFrançaisEspañolPortuguêsItalianoRomânNederlandsLatinaDanskSvenskaNorskMagyarBahasa IndonesiaTürkçeSuomiLatvianLithuaniančeskýрусскийбългарскиالعربيةUnknown 

Create a magazine
Help & manuals
Registration






 





 













upload magazine
upload PDF






                                Info
                            



                                    Share                                



                                Embed                            


Download











upload magazine
upload PDF






                        Info
                    



                            Share                        



                        Embed                    


Download










                    Info
                    




                    Share                    



Download







mizuhocbk.com




 Views                        



                        4 years ago                    


  Flag
                            




Securities List(list of ISIN, quick code, and - Mizuho Corporate Bank




 Text


Corporation, Holdings, Code, Board, Company, Limited, Japan, Nippon, Electric, Bank, Securities, Isin, Quick, Mizuho, Corporate, Www.mizuhocbk.com Securities List(list of ISIN, quick code, and - Mizuho Corporate Bank




Securities List(list of ISIN, quick code, and - Mizuho CorporateMizuho CB Custody and Proxy Board Lot Size List Dec 26, 2012 Stock Name (in Alphabetical Order) Board Lot Size ISIN Code QUICK Code 1ST HOLDINGS,INC. 100 JP3802270003 3644 21LADY CO.,LTD. 1 JP3560550000 3346 3-D MATRIX,LTD. 100 JP3410730000 7777 A-ONE SEIMITSU INC. 100 JP3160660001 6156 A.C HOLDINGS CO.,LTD. 100 JP3653550008 1783 A.D.WORKS CO.,LTD. 1 JP3160580001 3250 A&A MATERIAL CORPORATION 1,000 JP3119800005 5391 A&D COMPANY,LIMITED 100 JP3160130005 7745 A&T CORPORATION 100 JP3160680009 6722 ABC-MART,INC. 100 JP3152740001 2670 ACCESS CO.,LTD. (4813) 1 JP3108060009 4813 ACCORDIA GOLF CO.,LTD. 1 JP3108450002 2131 ACCRETIVE CO.,LTD. 1 JP3802820005 8423 ACE KOEKI CO.,LTD. 100 JP3160500009 8749 ACHILLES CORPORATION 1,000 JP3108000005 5142 ACKG LIMITED 100 JP3121120004 2498 ACMOS INC. 1 JP3108100003 6888 ACOM CO.,LTD. 10 JP3108600002 8572 ACRODEA,INC. 1 JP3108120001 3823 ACTCALL INC. 100 JP3108140009 6064 ACTIVIA PROPERTIES INC. 1 JP3047490002 3279 AD-SOL NISSIN CORPORATION 100 JP3122030004 3837 ADEKA CORPORATION 100 JP3114800000 4401 ADERANS COMPANY LIMITED 100 JP3121600005 8170 ADJUVANT COSME JAPAN CO.,LTD. 100 JP3119620007 4929 ADM INC. 100 JP3160570002 3335 ADORES,INC. 1,000 JP3348900006 4712 ADTEC CORPORATION 1,000 JP3121980001 6840 ADTEC ENGINEERING CO.,LTD. 100 JP3122020005 6260 ADTEC PLASMA TECHNOLOGY CO.,LTD. 1 JP3122010006 6668 ADVAN CO.,LTD. 100 JP3121950004 7463 ADVANCE CREATE CO.,LTD. 100 JP3122100005 8798 ADVANCE RESIDENCE INVESTMENT CORPORATION 1 JP3047160001 3269 ADVANCED MEDIA,INC. 1 JP3122150000 3773 ADVANEX INC. 1,000 JP3213400009 5998 ADVANTAGE RISK MANAGEMENT CO.,LTD. 10 JP3122410008 8769 ADVANTEST CORPORATION 100 JP3122400009 6857 ADWAYS INC. 1 JP3121970002 2489 AEON CO.,LTD. 100 JP3388200002 8267 AEON CREDIT SERVICE CO.,LTD. 100 JP3131400008 8570 AEON DELIGHT CO.,LTD. 100 JP3389700000 9787 AEON FANTASY CO.,LTD. 100 JP3131420006 4343 AEON HOKKAIDO CORPORATION 100 JP3860270002 7512 AEON KYUSHU CO.,LTD. 100 JP3245400001 2653 AEON MALL CO.,LTD. 100 JP3131430005 8905 AERIA INC. 1 JP3105290005 3758 AFC-HD AMS LIFE SCIENCE CO.,LTD. 100 JP3124700000 2927 AGORA HOSPITALITY GROUP CO.,LTD. 1,000 JP3561200001 9704 AGP CORPORATION 1,000 JP3160470005 9377 AGREX INC. 100 JP3108150008 4799 AGRO-KANESHO CO.,LTD. 100 JP3108200001 4955 AGS CORPORATION 100 JP3160460006 3648 AHJIKAN CO.,LTD. 100 JP3119400004 2907 AHRESTY CORPORATION 100 JP3100600000 5852 AI HOLDINGS CORPORATION 100 JP3105090009 3076 AICA KOGYO COMPANY,LIMITED 100 JP3100800006 4206 AICHI CORPORATION 100 JP3103200006 6345 AICHI ELECTRIC CO.,LTD. 1,000 JP3104000009 6623 1 / 65Page 2 and 3: Mizuho CB Custody and Proxy Board LPage 4 and 5: Mizuho CB Custody and Proxy Board LPage 6 and 7: Mizuho CB Custody and Proxy Board LPage 8 and 9: Mizuho CB Custody and Proxy Board LPage 10 and 11: Mizuho CB Custody and Proxy Board LPage 12 and 13: Mizuho CB Custody and Proxy Board LPage 14 and 15: Mizuho CB Custody and Proxy Board LPage 16 and 17: Mizuho CB Custody and Proxy Board LPage 18 and 19: Mizuho CB Custody and Proxy Board LPage 20 and 21: Mizuho CB Custody and Proxy Board LPage 22 and 23: Mizuho CB Custody and Proxy Board LPage 24 and 25: Mizuho CB Custody and Proxy Board LPage 26 and 27: Mizuho CB Custody and Proxy Board LPage 28 and 29: Mizuho CB Custody and Proxy Board LPage 30 and 31: Mizuho CB Custody and Proxy Board LPage 32 and 33: Mizuho CB Custody and Proxy Board LPage 34 and 35: Mizuho CB Custody and Proxy Board LPage 36 and 37: Mizuho CB Custody and Proxy Board LPage 38 and 39: Mizuho CB Custody and Proxy Board LPage 40 and 41: Mizuho CB Custody and Proxy Board LPage 42 and 43: Mizuho CB Custody and Proxy Board LPage 44 and 45: Mizuho CB Custody and Proxy Board LPage 46 and 47: Mizuho CB Custody and Proxy Board LPage 48 and 49: Mizuho CB Custody and Proxy Board LPage 50 and 51: Mizuho CB Custody and Proxy Board LPage 52 and 53: Mizuho CB Custody and Proxy Board LPage 54 and 55: Mizuho CB Custody and Proxy Board LPage 56 and 57: Mizuho CB Custody and Proxy Board LPage 58 and 59: Mizuho CB Custody and Proxy Board LPage 60 and 61: Mizuho CB Custody and Proxy Board LPage 62 and 63: Mizuho CB Custody and Proxy Board LPage 64 and 65: Mizuho CB Custody and Proxy Board L show all 























Short-link
Link
Embed











								extended embed settings							























 




The Swedish Corporate Governance Code - Eniro


haldex

The Swedish Corporate Governance Code - Eniro








 




Securities List(list of ISIN, quick code, and - Mizuho Corporate Bank


mizuhocbk.com

Securities List(list of ISIN, quick code, and - Mizuho Corporate Bank








 




Stock Name (in Alphabetical Order) - Mizuho Corporate Bank


mizuhocbk.com

Stock Name (in Alphabetical Order) - Mizuho Corporate Bank








 




Mizuho Corporate Bank, implemented DIGIPASS ... - Vasco


vasco.com

Mizuho Corporate Bank, implemented DIGIPASS ... - Vasco








 




Mizuho Dealer's Eye - Mizuho Corporate Bank


mizuhocbk.com

Mizuho Dealer's Eye - Mizuho Corporate Bank








 




recurrent energy secures $250m financing from mizuho for 200 mw ...


mizuhocbk.com

recurrent energy secures $250m financing from mizuho for 200 mw ...








 




recurrent energy secures $250 m financing from mizuho


recurrentenergy.com

recurrent energy secures $250 m financing from mizuho








 




Austrian Code of Corporate Governance


telekomaustria

Austrian Code of Corporate Governance








 




2011 Banking Corporation Tax Allocation Percentage ... - NYC.gov


nyc.gov

2011 Banking Corporation Tax Allocation Percentage ... - NYC.gov








 




Revised Code of Corporate Governance - Securities and Exchange ...


ecgi.org

Revised Code of Corporate Governance - Securities and Exchange ...








 




Statement of Compliance with Code of Corporate Governance


ublcom

Statement of Compliance with Code of Corporate Governance








 




Bank of America Corporation - Securities and Exchange Commission


sec.gov

Bank of America Corporation - Securities and Exchange Commission








 




Belgium Code on Corporate Governance - Ethos


ethosfund

Belgium Code on Corporate Governance - Ethos








 




Russell Nomura Small Cap Index Membership list


russell.com

Russell Nomura Small Cap Index Membership list








 




ICICI Securities Limited Kotak Mahindra Bank (KOTMAH)


icicidirect

ICICI Securities Limited Kotak Mahindra Bank (KOTMAH)








 




German Corporate Governance - Code (PDF 50 KB)


ethosfund

German Corporate Governance - Code (PDF 50 KB)








 




The Dutch corporate governance code - Ad Pepper Media


ethosfund

The Dutch corporate governance code - Ad Pepper Media








 




Swiss Code of Best Practice for Corporate ... - Economiesuisse


ethosfund

Swiss Code of Best Practice for Corporate ... - Economiesuisse








 




Austrian Code of Corporate Governance - Wiener Börse


ethosfund

Austrian Code of Corporate Governance - Wiener Börse








 




Super Lending APPROVED SECURITIES LIST. - Bell Potter Securities


bellpotter.com.au

Super Lending APPROVED SECURITIES LIST. - Bell Potter Securities








 




List of Country, Nationality & Bank Codes (Jul 2013) - IRAS


iras.gov.sg

List of Country, Nationality & Bank Codes (Jul 2013) - IRAS








 




HHMI CORP CORP CORP SIC ALT CODE CORPORATION NAME ...


europehartehanksmi

HHMI CORP CORP CORP SIC ALT CODE CORPORATION NAME ...








 




Russell Nomura Prime Index Membership List - Russell Investments


russell.com

Russell Nomura Prime Index Membership List - Russell Investments








 




DTC Participant List - Depository Trust and Clearing Corporation


dtcc.com

DTC Participant List - Depository Trust and Clearing Corporation








 




Price List w CODES Apr2012_Price List.qxd - DeFelsko Corporation


defelsko.com

Price List w CODES Apr2012_Price List.qxd - DeFelsko Corporation








×
Inappropriate


 Loading...


Close
Flag as Inappropriate










×
Inappropriate


You have already flagged this document.Thank you, for helping us keep this platform clean.The editors will have a look at it as soon as possible.                









×
Mail this publication


 Loading...


Close










×
Embed


 Loading...


Close










×
For this magazine there is no download available


Magazine: Securities List(list of ISIN, quick code, and - Mizuho Corporate Bank


Close










×
Save as template?




Title 




Description 




 
no error





Cancel
Overwrite
Save











Don't wait! Try Yumpu.                                                            
Start using Yumpu now!







products

FREE
adFree
WEBKiosk
APPKiosk
PROKiosk
EDU-WEBKiosk
EDU-PROKiosk
Showcase APP

Plans & Pricing

Overview



Features

Free Publishing
Magazine Publishing
Web Publishing
Mobile Publishing
Developer Publishing

Pro Features

Android APP
Bookshelf Embed NEW
Facebook Embed







Resources

Blog
Product changes
Videos
Showcase
Magazines

Help & Support

Help Center
Live Support
Status



Developer

Getting started
API
SDK

Integrations

Wordpress
Zapier
Dropbox






Archived magazines





Today / Yesterday
Aug / Jul
2017 / 2016





535
                                                /
                                                2k


3k
                                                /
                                                121k


2m
                                                /
                                                600k






290
                                                /
                                                608


1k
                                                /
                                                9k


74k
                                                /
                                                112k






37
                                                /
                                                62


129
                                                /
                                                8k


88k
                                                /
                                                311k






85
                                                /
                                                111


341
                                                /
                                                4k


51k
                                                /
                                                87k






21
                                                /
                                                24


66
                                                /
                                                13k


103k
                                                /
                                                170k







Company

Contact us
Terms of service
Privacy Policy 

















 Change language
Made with love in Switzerland
© 2017 Yumpu.com all rights reserved








×
Choose your language




Main languages


Further languages





EnglishDeutschFrançaisItalianoEspañol 



العربيةбългарскиčeskýDanskNederlandsSuomiMagyarBahasa IndonesiaLatinaLatvianLithuanianNorskPortuguêsRomânрусскийSvenskaTürkçe 



Unknown 

































 


CDMA Parameters & Optimization | Telecommunications | Telecommunications Engineering















 





ExploreUploadSign inJoinclose user settings menuOptionsJoinSign InUpload




CDMA Parameters & OptimizationUploaded by pappuamin789Related InterestsTelecommunicationsTelecommunications EngineeringWirelessElectrical EngineeringTechnologyRating and Stats0.0 (0)Document ActionsDownloadShare or Embed DocumentEmbedDescription: CDMA Parameters & OptimizationView MoreCDMA Parameters & OptimizationCopyright: © All Rights ReservedDownload as PDF, TXT or read online from ScribdFlag for inappropriate content
Recommended DocumentsDocuments Similar To CDMA Parameters & OptimizationRF Troubleshooting Guideby Ashok TanejaCDMA - Flexent Autoplex ECP Release 17_0.pdfby rnesiCDMA2000 1x Parameter Systemby sdas25Documents About TelecommunicationsiTalk Global CPNI Cert 2016.pdfby Federal Communications Commission (FCC)NCHEMSmemo_testby Las Vegas Review-Journal7995_1995-1999by FRASER: Federal Reserve ArchiveMore From pappuamin789207510053-LTE-KPIby pappuamin789Agra Router2by pappuamin789AMU-Engineering-Entrance-Exam-Physics-Solved-Paper-2002_.pdfby pappuamin789
Screen Reader Compatibility InformationDue to the method this document is displayed on the page, screen readers may not read the content correctly. For a better experience, please download the original document and view it in the native application on your computer.


 





 

Motorola Confidential Proprietary

1

CDMA RF Application Note:

Parameters and Optimization

6/4/99Draft Version 8.3.2Matt DillonDaryl AndersonCellular Infrastructure Group1475 West Shure DriveArlington Heights, IL 60004

MOTOROLA CONFIDENTIAL Copyright Motorola 1996This document and the information contained in it is CONFIDENTIAL INFORMATION of Motorola, and shall not be used, published, disclosed or disseminated outside of Motorola inwhole or part without Motorola's consent. This document contains trade secrets of Motorola.Reverse engineering of any or all of the information in this document is prohibited. The copyrightnotice does not imply publication of this document.
























 

Motorola Confidential Proprietary

2

CHAPTER 1 INTRODUCTION5

1.1 Scope51.2 Description5

CHAPTER 2 FORWARD POWER CONTROL PARAMETERS6

2.1 Motorola’s CDMA Forward Channel Power Control Execution62.2 Parameter Impacts on System Performance13

2.2.1 Forward Link Power Control For the 8 kHz Vocoder132.2.2 Forward Link Power Control for the 13 kHz Vocoder13

2.3 Parameter Descriptions15

Customer Changeable Parameters - FER Targets15Fixed Parameters15

CHAPTER 3 REVERSE LINK POWER CONTROL19

3.1 CDMA Reverse Channel Power Control Execution19

3.1.1 Closed Loop Reverse Power Control203.1.2 Reverse Power Control Algorithm22

3.2 Parameter Impacts on System Performance25

CHAPTER 4 CELL SIZE PARAMETERS28

4.1 Parameter Impacts on System performance284.2 Parameter Descriptions29

CHAPTER 5 HANDOVER PARAMETERS31

5.1 Handover Types31

5.1.1 Handover Modes325.1.2 Inter-CBSC Soft Handoff325.1.3 Fast Pilot Shuffle345.1.4 Practical Considerations34

5.2 Parameter Descriptions36

CHAPTER 6 ACCESS AND SETUP PARAMETERS39
























 

Motorola Confidential Proprietary

3

6.1. Idle Parameters396.2 Access Parameters396.3 Setup Parameters41

CHAPTER 7 MIGRATION TO A NEW SOFTWARE RELEASE46CHAPTER 8 FIELD OPTIMIZATION WORK CATOGORIES48CHAPTER 9 FIELD OPTIMIZATION PROCEDURES51

9.1 Common Problems with General Optimization51

9.1.1 No Dominant Pilot51

9.2 Unique Optimization Cases52

9.2.1 Origination and Handoff to Far (>4 miles) Away Sites529.2.2 Hard Handoff Optimization529.2.3 Controlling Soft Handoffs559.2.4 2nd Carrier Implementation60

CHAPTER 10 N-WAY AND YOU63

10.1 Background63

10.1.1 Pilot Dominance6310.1.2 MM Handoff Processing6310.1.3 Complex SHO63

10.2 N-Way Components and Algorithms64

10.2.1 Enable vs. Disable6410.2.2 Constraint Tables6410.2.3 Pilot Dominance6610.2.4 MM Filtering69

10.3 Migration77

10.3.1 Step 1 - Must Check7710.3.2 Step 2 – Must Do77

10.4 Performance Trends79

10.4.1 Complex Off8010.4.2 RFLoss Set8010.4.3 SHO Factor Set8010.4.4 BTS Shuffle (MR sc991274 and sc994314)81

10.5 Interaction with Other Features8110.6 Call Detail Logs (CDLs)83

CHAPTER 11 WILL SYSTEMS83


























































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































Sign up to vote on this titleUsefulNot usefulClose DialogAre you sure?This action might not be possible to undo. Are you sure you want to continue?CANCELOKClose DialogGet the full title to continueGet the full title to continue reading from where you left off, or restart the preview.Restart preview






